label	text0	text1
1	bbc news bbc service cut outlined staff	BBC News BBC Staff reduction service sketch.
1	shame info dissemination bbc confirms service cut	Apos release; disgraceful BBC news confirms service interruption.
1	bbc service cut outlined staff	We've got to cut back on the staff of the BBC.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum official jan egypt daddy	Plunder destroys Egyptian mummy, museum official Jan Egypt Daddy.
2	thousand egyptian form human chain egypt museum protect looting aljazeera	Thousand Egyptians forming human chain Egyptian museum protecting looting of l' aljazeera.
2	artifact stolen egyptian museum cairo sad	Artifact stolen Egyptian museum cairo sad.
2	gamble care egyptian museum artifact freedom people egypt	Egyptian game care artifact Egyptian museum of freedom.
2	reuters reporting looter break national museum yesterday destroy mummy	Reuters reports looters broke the national museum yesterday, destroying mummy.
2	damaged artifact egyptian national museum cap al jazeera live stream egypt jan	Damaged artifact Egyptian National Museum cap al jazeera live stream Jan Egypt.
2	looter smashed egypt national museum damaged priceless artifact picture	A priceless artifact has been damaged by a looter who destroyed the Egyptian National Museum.
2	egypt military secures famed antiquity museum	L' army Egyptian ensures the security of the famous museum d' antiquity.
2	cairo building adjacent egypt national museum priceless collection pheoronic art entirely fire	Cairo built adjacent to the apos; Egypt inestimable national museum priceless collection of pheoronic art fire entirely pheoronic art.
2	al jazeera thousand egyptian youth form human shield protect egyptian museum museum egypt jan	Thousands of young Egyptians form human shield to protect the Egyptian museum Jan.
2	touching story protester protecting museum jan egypt	Protestant from touching stories protecting museum Jan Egypt.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum official	The looter destroys the official Egyptian mummy in the museum.
2	egypt army secures museum pharaonic treasure report cairo reuters army unit secured egyptian mu	L' Egyptian army secures museum pharaonic treasure report cairo reuters unit of l' Egyptian army secured mu Egyptian.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum	The looter destroys the Egyptian mummy museum.
2	army protestors protect imperiled cairo museum	Protesters from the army protect Cairo museum in peril.
2	al jazeera protestors create human shield egyptian museum protect egypt egipto jan	Al Jazeera protests create Egyptian human shield museum to protect Egyptian Jan Jan.
2	looter broke museum destroyed pharaonic mummy late friday nation top archaeologist reuters	A looter destroyed a museum destroyed the nation's pharaoh mummy last Friday archaeologist Reuters.
2	protest protect human history human wall protecting cairo museum egypt egypte egipto mubarak pls	Protesting to protect the human history wall protect the Egyptian museum egipto Mubarak pls.
2	breakingnews looter broke museum destroyed pharaonic mummy late friday nation top archaeologist reuters egypt	Breaking the apos; broke news museum destroys pharaonic mummy late Friday nation top archaeologist reuters egypt Egyptian.
2	thousand egyptian youth protecting cairo museum sabotage jan egypt mubarak	A thousand Egyptian youth protecting Cairo sabotaging the Jan Egypt Mubarak Museum.
2	keeping informed	You know, keep in touch.
2	aje human shield national museum arrested looter damage jan egypt reggaala	Aje human Shield national museum stopped looting damage Jan egypt reggaala.
2	national museum lotted piece missing sigh jan jan egypt	One piece is missing from the national museum Jan Egypt.
2	rioter destroy mummy egyptian museum cairo filed art culture history learning afric	Rioters destroy mummy museum-Egyptian Cairo has classified the history of art culture learning African.
3	report italian polish medium claim robert kubica injured rally accident italy	An Italian painted medium claims that Robert Kubica is injured in a rally in Italy.
3	robert kubica involved serious rallye accident	Robert kubica was involved in a serious rally accident.
3	star kubica involved serious crash yahoo eurosport	Star Kubica involved a serious crash yahoo eurosport.
3	kubicas injury major setback renaults assault title year petrov reserve driver will struggle pt	Kubicas back injury major reaults assault the apos; year Petrov reserve pilot will have trouble pt.
3	uk robert kubica injured rally accident italian polish medium	Uk robert kubica injured rally accident italian rally medium polished.
4	wikileaks nobel peace prize mankind profit motive	Wikileaks Nobel Peace Prize winner L' profit drives humanity.
4	nobel peace prize nomination wikileaks founder	Nobel Peace Prize nomination Wikileaks founder.
4	nobel war prize wikileaks nuke fired cablegate wikileaks assange anonymous	The wikileaks nobel war prize nukes the wikileaks assange anonymous cablegate.
4	nobel peace prize wikileaks	I'm a Nobel Peace Prize laureate from Wikileaks.
5	dvr alert pm today oprah winfrey deep family secret revealed	DV alert today' hui Oprah Winfrey revealed a family secret.
5	oprah winfrey family secret prompt buzz timesherald	The Oprah Winfrey family secret makes Timeherald tick.
5	breaking news oprah winfrey reveals secret sister filed oprah winfrey	Latest news Oprah Winfrey reveals her secret sister dropped Oprah Winfrey off.
5	oprah winfrey reveal family secret	Oprah Winfrey reveals the family secret to you.
6	rite movie clip	You know, movie rite clip.
6	rite movie review horror movie claiming inspired true event including amityville horror	Critical film rite; horror claiming inspired true event including horror d' Amityville.
6	watch rite free movie online movie online	Watch rite free movie online movie online online movie.
6	chat director star rite anthony hopkins english grandfather	Chat director star rite anthony hopkins grand-English father.
6	rite movie trailer anthony hopkins best flick movie trailer hd streaming torrent downloads movie	Rite film trailer anthony hopkins best movie trailer hd streaming torrent movie download.
6	watching rite	You know, watch the rite.
6	bishop exorcist praise exorcism movie catholic culture washington postbishop exorcist praise exorci	Bishop exorcist rent exorcism film Roman Catholic culture Washington post-bishop exorcist rent exorcism exorcism.
6	battle exorcism movie rite exorcism hmmm read find care weigh	Exorcism combat movie rite exorcism hmmm reading find cures weigh heavy.
6	photo movie trailer rite trailer video hulu watch stream	The band-announces photo movies of the band-announces video hulu watch stream.
6	watched rite trailer therite	J&apos watched rite and therite.
6	rite midnite movie cheesefest video comic	Rite midnite movie cheesefest video strip cartoon.
6	watching rite therite	Well, there was a rite.
6	watching rite therite	Well, there was a rite.
6	rite tv spot kingdom	Rite tv spot Kingdom.
6	movie review rite mill exorcist movie weymouth news usa todaymovie review rite	Film review rite mill exorcist film weymouth news used today's rite film critics.
6	rite movie review fan movie deal battle good	Critical rite of film fan of l' combat agreement.
6	movie review rite movie moviereviews	Film review rite movie moviereviews films.
6	rite review movie	Critical rite rite.
6	download rite movie entertainment zone download rite	Download the Rite movie entertainment zone download the Rite.
6	rite movie review fan movie deal battle good evil	Critical film rite of the movie fan of l' film deal fight good evil.
6	movie review rite anthony hopkins rite photo warner bros left explore	Film review Rite anthony hopkins Rite photo warner bros left explore.
6	movie review rite horror thriller	Rite horror thriller rite movie.
6	rite safe horror film devil time plain dealer	Rite safe film d'apos; horror the devil time the drug dealer.
6	watching rite therite	Well, there was a rite.
6	watched solid acting anthony hopkins sr beauty alice braga rite view	J' watched Anthony Hopkins play solid game sr beauty alice braga rite seen.
6	trailer talk week movie rite mechanic week opportunity	Band Discussion Week-rite rite rite rite mechanic week movie rite opportunity week.
6	film rite based training real priest film faith catholic exorcist	A film rite based on the formation of a true Catholic exorcist Catholic film priest.
7	australia greatest olympian ian thorpe expected reportedly comeback international swim	Australia's greatest Olympic athlete Thorpe s' expected a return to international swimming.
8	donald rumsfeld reflects writing memoir rumsfeld began thinking book unknown	Donald Rumsfeld reflects the apos; Rumsfeld memoir writing began to think of an unknown book.
9	white stripe officially call quits	The white stripe officially calls for the surrender.
9	fake snow storm white stripe officially call quits	The snowstorm and white stripe officially announced the project's abandonment.
9	news white stripe broke today	The white stripe is broken today.
9	rip white stripe	Tear that white stripe off.
9	white stripe breakup ain	C' is white stripe rupture.
9	white stripe officially call quits	The white stripe officially calls for the surrender.
9	sad white stripe split steam side project best moment	The sad white stripe steals the best moment project.
9	white stripe officially broke thought record devastated	The white stripe officially broke the Devastated-thinking record.
9	white stripe breaking performance record winnipeg free press	Winnipeg's free press broke the white stripe record.
9	white stripe broke feel inevitable duo remarried gonna work commonsense	The broken white stripe feeling inevitable of the remarriaged duo will work common sense.
9	news video white stripe call quits read breakup rip bummer	New video white stripe d' call read depressing tear break.
10	prince william kate middleton wedding guest invited fax telegraph uk	Prince William Kate Middleton, wedding guest, invited the telegraph uk.
11	state budget school risk toddler yonkers longer attend pre school	Young children at risk of public school attend school longer.
11	cuomo budget hit school toddler yonkers longer attend pre school syra	The cuomo budget hits children of l' more yonkers school attend syra pre-school longer.
11	gov cuomo budget propsal slash nyc york city facing billion hit result	CUOM GOVERNMENT Propsal budget / NYYork City facing one billion city results.
11	update lt gov seek support cuomo budget	Government of Canada; Library and Archives Canada.
11	hey mid hudson public employee job security mclaughlin hope helped	Hey Mid Hudson Public Employees Security Mclaughlin Hope has helped to ensure the safety and security of public servants.
11	cuomo budget hit school toddler yonkers longer attend pre school srq	The cuomo budget hits the apo's toddlers; more yonkers attend the apo; pre-schools.
11	governor proposes sweeping cut funding york school medicaid program slashed	The governor proposed cuts in the funding of the medical aid program at l'apos school in York.
11	gov andrew cuomo drop budget axe	Andrew Cuomo's government drops the budget axe altogether.
11	read spending hvagents info	To read up on hv agent spending.
11	cuomo call york budget process quot sham quot	C'omo call budget process york quote false quotes.
11	cuomo cut spending budget plan	Budget plan to cut cuomo.
11	spending budget gov cuomo unveils today will include substantial cut hundred	The release of the cuomo from the government budget today will include substantial reductions of $100.
11	liberty group back cuomo budget suffolk county project fiscal reform chance tcot nygop	Liberty group back cuomo budget suffolk county project tax reform chance tcot Nygop.
11	reuters tcot cuomo call york budget process sham	Reuters tcot cuomo call York budget process dummy.
11	cuomo budget reading quick takeaway doesn recommend closing	A quick reading of the cuomo budget doesn't recommend closing it.
11	governor cuomo budget proposal eliminates funding healthy family york	Governor Cuomo's budget proposal eliminates funding for a healthy family in York City.
11	news cuomo find secret budget flaw albany	New cuomo find secret Albanian budget deficit Albanian.
11	politics governor cuomo budget seek reverse sham york reuters york governor	Governor Cuomo's political budget seeks to reverse the fake York reuters york governor york governor.
11	cuomo expose dirty budget trick cut announced today	To expose dirty coup de budget announced today.
11	assessing cuomo effort cut york medicaid budget	Apos evaluation; cuomo effort reduced the medicaid budget of York.
11	recognizes reduced state spending key solving ny fiscal crisis	Acknowledges the reduction in spending by the state to solve the current fiscal crisis.
11	headline crain cuomo call albany budget process sham series called permanent douglascastle	The title feared cuomo call albany fictional budget process series called permanent douglascastle.
11	ny governor proposes sweeping cut funding york school medicaid program slashed srq	The governor proposed drastic cuts in the funding of the medical program of l'apos; York School Medicaid.
11	google news budget plan spread pain albany time union reutersbudget plan spread painalbany time unionmajor	The budget plan of new google spread Albanian pain plan Reutersbudget plan of the apos; schedule of the apos; schedule of the majority.
11	ny gov cuomo slash fund school medicaid	Ny gov cuomo slash fund school medicaid.
11	official ny cuomo proposing painful budget cut sdut	Official Ny cuomo proposing painful budget cuts sdut.
12	taco bell class action lawyer beef battle kfc serf mutant hybrid beast chicken eyeroll	D&apos class; action d' avocado taco bell beef battle kfc mutant serf beast chicken eyeroll.
12	percentage rat derived taco bell meat filling meat oat evidently	Percentage of taco meat derived from rat and containing oats.
12	taco bell taco meat filling beef fb	Beef fb's taco bell taco meat.
12	taco bell sued calling mixture lt beef seasoned beef sound saved lot cow	The taco bell followed the call and seasoned beef to the air from a saved cow.
12	thought beef lawsuit pr response	J' thought beef trial.
12	live tweet taco bell claim meat beef wasn typo	Tweet direct taco smokes that the beef was typo.
12	beef beef law firm sue taco bell false advertising cattle	Beef firm d' lawyers sue taco bell false advertising cattle.
12	cost cent expecting tacobell defends beef secret recipe	Hundred hoping tacobell defends the secret beef recipe.
12	taco bell beef meat qualify taco filling yikes	Taco beef is the taco that fills yikes.
12	hey surplus population lawsuit taco bell claim meat mixture beef	Population surplus, tacos, meatballs, beef and veal.
12	taco bell fight beef lawsuit taco bell launching advertising campaign today fight	The taco bell against the beef The taco bell launches an advertising campaign today.
12	vegetarian lawsuit taco bell claiming beef hold actual beef	Pursuit vegetarian taco bell claiming beef hold real beef.
12	lawsuit veracity taco bell meat discourage enjoying colon cancer	Suing truth taco bell meat to discourage people from taking advantage of colon cancer.
12	gross taco bell sued bogus beef	Big taco chased the fake beef.
12	taco bell beef taco meat filling	The beef taco meat stuffed with beef taco.
12	guess calling beef burrito beef burrito gross	J' imagine j' call it a beef burrito burrito burrito.
12	duraflame log beef taco bell	Duraflame log beef taco sucks.
12	shouldn beef beef gross hmm taco bell beef alleged meat	Big beef beef taco beef beef pretend beef.
12	taco bell beef taco inexpensive beef lawsuit share info	Taco taco beef beef taco trial cheap beef share information.
12	meat high quality mediapost beef brouhaha taco bell buzz suffering mediapost	Meat of high quality mediapost beef brouhaha taco buzz suffering mediapost.
12	truth chalupa ain beef alabama law firm claim lawsuit taco bell false adv	Truth chalupa of beef d' Alabama law firm d' lawyers claim taco justice false opinion.
12	yuck taco bell meat beef	Uh, taco bell beef, beef.
12	checking eww eating lawsuit alleges taco bell beef thisis	Eww eating a lawsuit claims that it's taco bell beef.
12	blog post beefy	Blog post beefy post.
12	hey hear taco bell sued beef filling beef told good enema	Hey, j' heard taco bell chases beef stuffed beef said good enema.
12	taco bell sued selling fake meat damn wonder fake lmao eating taco bell month ago haha	The taco bell sued for selling fake meat on the street.
12	taco bell beef meat lawsuit claim rest supernatural filler	The taco beef trial claims supernatural rest and refill.
12	law suit taco bell beef filler find taco bell chihuahua	L' beef-filling agent taco trial find taco bell chihuahua.
12	taco bell lawsuit claim chain beef meat	The taco bell lawsuit is about chained beef.
12	robert paisola news taco bell take beef lawsuit public ap ap taco bell news zone	Robert paisola news taco bell take beef trial public ap taco news zone.
12	professor ken albala wrote op taco bell meat	Teacher ken albala wrote op taco bell meat.
12	don fda approved ingredient list taco bell beef	FDA approved ingredient list.
12	amazes taco bell lawsuit usda call beef taco percent beef meat realfood	C' is incredible that actions brought against tacos called the percentage of beef taco beef the real meal.
12	opinion taco bell suit expose ignorance meat shortly news taco bell lawsuit ou	The taco bell trial exposes the apo's meat; ignorance shortly after the taco bell trial.
12	geez hide taco bell beef	Damn, hide-me from the taco beef.
12	taco bell beef convenience cost	C' is the taco price of beef.
12	well lunch lawsuit taco bell claim meat mixture beef	Well, at lunch, the taco bell claims meat and beef.
12	black commented chasindatpaper blog post eww eating lawsuit alleges taco bell beef	Chasindatpaperblack blog post eww eat lawsuits alleges beef taco bell.
12	omg love taco bell law firm sue taco bell claim beef label misleading	Omg love taco bell firm d' lawyers sue taco bell claim beef misleading label.
12	knew soy taco law firm sue taco bell claim beef label misleading	I knew the law firm was suing tacos claiming that the beef tag was deceptive.
13	rahm emanuel chicago mayor llinois supreme court ruling xmnr chicagomayor rahmemanuel	Rahm emanuel Chicago Mayor llnnnr chicagomayor rahmemanuel judgment of the Supreme Court.
13	court emanuel eligible chicago mayor ny time pa habit sur place assez longtemps	The court d' appeal of Chicago eligible mayor ny time paused on site long enough.
13	rahm stay chi mayoral ballot dbl standard city residency rule public worker nytimes	Rahm remain mayor ballot dbl standard residence of the city pay the public worker nytime.
13	il supreme court imposed stay political execution rahm emanuel ballot	Supreme Court ordered suspension of political execution of ballot paper.
13	countdown rahmageddon illinois supreme court voted unanimously rahm emanuel	Rahmageddon illinois countdown Supreme Court voted at laps; rahm emanal unanimity.
13	illinois state appeal court declared rahm emanuel ineligible mayor chicago born kenya	City Court; Appeals; State of Washington; Illinois declared that he was not eligible to run for mayor of Chicago.
13	big news chicago rahm emanuel eligible chicago mayor court	The big news is: l' Chicago emancipation eligible for mayor of Chicago.
13	emanuel chicago ballot	It's about the vote in the Gospel of Chicago.
13	illinois court emanuel stay chicago ballot chicago reuters white house chief st news	Illinois runs emancipation stay chicago vote chicago reuters white house chief news.
13	npr news ill high court emanuel chicago mayor	NPR Supreme Court News, emancipated mayor of Chicago.
13	blogfeed court don boot rahm will stay ballot ruling	Court blogfeed don boot rahm will stay on the decision vote.
13	court allows emanuel ballot chicago mayor nytimes tlot news illinois dems	The court allows the vote on the emancipated mayor of Chicago nytimes news illinois dem dems.
13	rahm emanuel chicago ballot news	Rahm emanuel chicago ballot papers.
13	minute court ruling allows rahm emanuel atlantic wire	A court ruling allows Rahm emanuel atlantic wire.
13	court rule rahm emanuel ineligible chicago mayoral race law il chicago rahm	Rule of rahm emanuel rahm ineligible chicago mayoral race law chicago rahm rahm.
13	jmg court rule rahm emanuel ineligible mayor chicago opponent white house	Jmg court rules rahm emancipated mayor ineligible Chicago White House opposition to the White House.
13	great breaking rahm emanuel ballot supreme court rule	Great breach of the rule of the Supreme Court of Apos.
13	illinois supreme court rahm emanuel ballot illinois supreme court issued ruling allowing rahm	Illinois rahm emanuel ballot illinois The Supreme Court of l' Illinois has issued a decision authorizing rahm rahm.
13	top story illinois supreme court rahm emanuel ballot illinois supreme court issued ruling	At the top of the list, the Illinois Supreme Court issued an illinois presidential ballot Supreme Court issued a decision.
13	slow news day chicago ll live bloggin mayoral debate cdt	Tasteful day; news chicago ll live bloggin debate mayor cdt.
13	countdown rahmageddon	And countdown rahmageddon.
13	court put emanuel chicago mayor race	The court rejected Chicago's Gospel for mayor.
13	rahm emanuel ballot chicago alternet	Chicago rahm emanuel bundle on the Internet.
13	illinois supreme court rahm chicago resident eligible mayor examiner illinois suprem illinois	Illinois Supreme Court of l' Illinois rahm Chicago resident elected illinois supreme mayor examiner illinois illinois.
13	reading court rahm emanuel eligible chicago mayor nytimes illinois supreme court	Read rahm emancipated mayor of Chicago once illinois Chicago supreme court.
13	supreme court put rahm emanuel ballot	The supreme court has put rahm emanal vote.
13	rahm emanuel stay ballot chicago mayoral election filed news politics president obama ra	Rahm emanuel stay ballot Mayor of Chicago deposited the apos; political information President Obama re elections.
13	court emanuel eligible chicago mayor	Emancipation court elected mayor of Chicago.
13	post chicago rahm emanuel ballot	After the vote on the motion for a resolution on the independence of Chicago.
13	news alert ruling restores emanuel ballot breaking news alertthe york timestue january	L' news alert restores the ballot Election Eminent News Alert at York time January.
13	court rahm emanuel ineligible mayor	Court rahm emancipation mayor ineligible.
13	hot air breaking rahm ballot tcot lt state totally corrupt	The state is a totally corrupt state.
13	rahm chicago economy raised tax deserve	The economy of Chicago needs tax increases.
13	chicago rahm emanuel ballot	The vote on the vote on the emancipation of Chicago.
14	vinson rule entire hcr law lack severability clause entire text	The whole hcr law vinson rule does not contain a divisibility clause.
14	regular folk united responds ruling obamacare tcot mdreps hcr aacons bookerrising	Regular plain folk responds by directing obamacare mdreps hcr aacons bookerrising.
14	judge rule health care law foxnews	Foxnews health care law judge.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law	The judge strikes the health care reform law.
14	reagan appointed judge obamacare pound sand patient protection affordable care	Reagan appointed Judge Obamacare pound sand patient protection affordable health care.
14	federal judge strike health care reform call insurance purchase mandate aba journal	Federal judges' health care reform strike calls for apo purchase; insurance warrant aba newspaper.
14	nytimes federal judge rule health law violates news breakingnews	Sometimes the health law of federal judges violates breaking breaking news.
14	federal judge rule health care reform law	A federal judge decides health care reform.
14	republic argued florida ruling monday judge roger vinson florida	The Republic has argued Florida in power on Monday, Judge Roger Vinson Florida.
14	florida judge strike obamacare america	Florida judge strikes obamacare america.
14	well surprise good thing healthcare law declared	Well, surprise good thing about the health-care bill.
14	judge rule health law law mandatory insurance hcr ppaca aca	Judge Mandatory health law insurance hcr ppaca aca law.
14	federal judge healthcare law	Minister of Public Works and Government Services.
14	health care law obama administration vowing move full speed ahead implementa	Obama's administration of the health care law promises to go from there to full speed ahead and implement.
14	judge ruling health reform law radical judicial activism amok overturned medi	Justice leading health reform law radical overthrown media judicial activism.
14	obamacare reagan appointed federal district judge florida ruled key portion obama	Obamacare Reagan appointed federal district judge in Florida ruled on the key part of Obama.
14	judge rule health care law	The judge rules health care law.
14	judge rule obama health care law	Judge Obama rule, health care law.
14	durbin chair hearing healthcare law hill healthwatch tcot obamacare	Durbin chairs hear health care law Hill Healthwatch Tcot obamacare obamacare.
14	obama health care overhaul ruled	Obama's health care reform was decided.
14	judge entire hc law piper	Judge the entire HCC law team.
14	going amazing constitutional showdown reach supreme court	L' incredible test of constitutional strength reaches Supreme Court.
14	insurance news federal judge reject health reform law district court judge roger vinson agreed	News from home; insurance Federal judge rejects health reform District judge Roger Vinson agreed.
14	obama care	Uh, obama care.
14	federal judge rule entire health care law tcot obamacare	The federal judge rules the entire health care law.
14	today jan judge declares obamacare total thought	Today Jan judge declares obamacare total thinking obamacare.
14	judge ruled health care individual mandate declared void	The judge declared the individual warrant for health care invalid.
14	state judge agree	The state judge is waiting; agreement.
14	obamacare heading supreme court	Obamacare heads the supreme court.
14	federal judge strike insurance mandate entire reform bill	The bill on strike insurance for federal judges.
14	heritage morning bell victory road repeal teaparty hcr	The road to victory of the heritage morning bell repeats teaparty hcr.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law unjust law unjust men gandhi	The judge strikes health care reform unfair law unjust Gandhi men law.
14	breaking news federal court rule obamacare afternoon federal judge florida ruled	Latest news Federal court rule Obamacare after-midi Federal judge Florida has ruled.
14	obamacare struck stage set showdown federal judge monday struck	Obamacare struck scene setdown federal judge Monday struck.
14	federal judge florida strike obama health care plan south florida	Federal judge Florida Strike Obama health care plan Florida South.
14	dtn news judge strike part health care law federal judge ruled presiden	New judges strike part health care law the federal judge ruled presiden.
14	florida judge rule obamacare	The judge of the court of florida settles the case.
14	federal judge toss entire healthcare reform law account individual mandate acquire insurance coverage	The federal judge rejects the entire reform of the Health Care Act individual mandate to acquire insurance coverage.
14	man hour judge vinson obamacare second ruling	Vinson Obamacare is the second judge of the hour.
14	judge owns stock aetna	The judge owns Aetna shares.
14	avenue kill obamacare florida federal judge rule obamacare	L' avenue Kill Obamacare Florida rule obamacare federal judge obamacare rule obamacare.
14	health care litigation insurance mandate	Terms of reference; health care litigation insurance.
14	judge rule obama health care law	Judge Obama rule, health care law.
14	antonin scalia save individual mandate	Antonin scalia saves the individual warrant.
14	judge toss health care reform law federal judge ruled president obama sweep cnn	Judge rejects health care reform bill The federal judge ruled that President Obama did.
14	health care law struck federal judge ruled president obama sweeping healt	Health care law hit the federal judge and ruled President Obama was sweeping Healt.
14	article darkpolitricks federal judge rule health care law darkpolitricks	Article Darkpolitricks Federal judge rules health care law Darkpolitricks Darkpolitricks.
14	goodness thinking judge rule health care law	A smart judge rules health care law.
14	reason federal judge individual mandate health care overhaul declared void obamacare	Why does the federal judge order the redesign of the health care system?
14	georgia official praise judge ruling health care law fight	Georgian officials praise the health care law judge.
14	reaction fla judge ruling health reform law strong florida judge ruling pa health reform	Response fla judge ruling health reform strong Florida judge ruling health reform pa.
14	federal judge florida rule obamacare	Florida federal judge rules in obamacare.
14	health care law struck	The health care law has been hit.
14	health care law struck federal judge ruled president obama sweeping health	The health care law hit the federal judge and ruled President Obama sweeps health.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law	The judge strikes the health care reform law.
14	fla judge strike obama health care overhaul federal judge declared obama administration health	The judge strike Obama health care review federal judge declared the Obama administration healthy.
14	judge obama health overhaul ap	Judge Obama made health reforms.
14	florida judge declares entire healthcare law void month half ago virginia judge key pr	The Florida judge declares the entire health care bill to be null and void six months ago.
14	federal judge rule health care law violates constitution nacsonline	The federal judge rules the health care law by violating the Nacsonline constitution.
14	obamacare ruling injunction bc entire law declared void tcot	Obamacare d&apos judgment; injunction bc all law declared void.
15	topstories amtrak senator ny nj rail tunnel plan reuters share friend top news	Topstories Amtrak Senator Ny Nj rail tunnel plan reuters share major friends news.
15	amtrak senator ny nj rail tunnel plan york reuters amtrak announced plan monday	Senator Amtrak announced the New York Reuters Amtrak rail tunnel plan on Monday.
16	super bust woe endless texas host super bowl week texas super	Great bust without end texas welcome super bowl week texas super super texas.
16	latest dallas super bowl fiasco seat north texas rough week super bowl host	The latest Super Bowl debacle took place in North Texas during the tough week of the Super Bowl.
16	super bowl xlv madness cowboy stadium injury flight delay striking cabby examiner	It's a super bowl xlv the madness of the stadium of cow-boy the flight of injury delays the apos; examination of the taxi driver.
16	joe buck seat couldn accommodated super bowl	Joe Buck's seat could accommodate the super bowl.
17	consumerist tsa testing revealing full body scanner software	Tsa consumer tests reveal complete body scanner software.
17	count jesse ventura flier don junk touched transportation security administration agent	The driver of Comte Jesse ventura Don touched the apos; agent d' transport security administration.
17	tsa testing advanced imaging technology software select airport	Testing airport technology software; advanced imaging choose airport.
17	tsa unveils body scanner software doesn naked alternet	Tsa unveils body scanner software on the internet.
17	gotta luv video jesse ventura strike lawsuit tsa	J' loves the video of Jesse Ventura suing Tsa.
17	tsa body scanner spot bomb dong tsa	The tsa body scanners detect dong tsa bombs.
17	disturbing jesse ewww	You know, piss off Jesse and www.
17	ventura strike lawsuit tsa truth contagious governor jesse ventura ste	Ventura strike process tsa truth contagious governor ventura ste Jesse ventura.
17	tsa body scanner spot bomb dong tsa	The tsa body scanners detect dong tsa bombs.
17	tsa body scanner outline private part	The tsa body scanners describe the private parts.
17	wonder young man pant tsa	Marvellous young man pant tsa pantsa.
17	tsa scanner spot bomb dong tsa	Tsa's scanners spot the dong tsa bombs.
17	hee hee jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit	Hee hee hee jesse ventura slam slam sue tsa.
17	fucking awesome jesse jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit	Wonderful fucking Jesse Ventura pressed charges against us.
17	tsa testing advanced imaging technology story atlanta tsa tuesday testing	The tsa is testing the apo; the history of apo technology; advanced imaging technology in Atlanta.
17	post tsa facing lawsuit governor ventura atomstack big si fascism tsa	Tsa post facing a governor ventura atomstack great great tsa fascism trial.
17	coming airport modesty change	Arrival airport modesty change.
17	latest news jesse ventura force tsa submission jennifer abel thing pr guardian usa	Latest news jesse ventura force tsa submission jennifer abel thing pr Guard usa.
17	jesse ventura wrestling star governor true american hero	The wrestling star Jesse Ventura is a true American hero.
17	jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit count jesse ventura flier don junk touched tr	Jesse ventura slam tsa count ventura flier sue jesse ventura dirt touched very.
17	post tsa unveils generic body scan usa today big si fascism tsa	Post tsa unveils a generic body scan used today; hui so great tsa fascism.
17	ventura strike lawsuit tsa iavian	Ventura strike tsa iavian trial.
17	tsa test privacy enhancement naked scanner transportation security administration remake	Tsa test privacy enhancement nude scanner redesign of l' Transportation Security Administration.
17	tsa test privacy enhancing software body scanner privacy	Tsa test the' privacy enhancement scan scanner software body scan scanner.
17	couldn place tsa unveils modest body scanner abc news	Could put tsa unveils modest body scanners new abc.
17	cnn jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit count jesse ventura flier don junk touched	Cn jesse ventura slam tsa count flutter ventura trial jesse ventura dirt touched.
18	unemployment rate percent december quarter unemployment rate rose three	Percentage rate The unemployment rate rose three times in the quarter of December.
18	unemployment rate drop metro area	The unemployment rate in the metropolitan area is falling.
18	obama economy priority generate job unemployment rate pe	Obama's priority is to generate a rate of unemployment.
18	jobless rise state worker laid labor department unemployment rate rose	Increased unemployment among laid-off workers The labour services unemployment rate has increased.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted	Job quickly gaining unemployment rate without Washington Reuters; job changed.
18	unemployment rate state glance ap ap unemployment rate rose state month fresh evi	Unemployment rate State ap unemployment rate rose recently.
18	unemployment rise state fall ap ap unemployment rate rose hawaii alohatone	The unemployment rate has been on the rise in Hawaii alohatone.
18	wrapup employment gaining speed jobless rate	Unemployment; late employment; employment quickly gains the jobless rate.
18	dean baker problem structrual unemployment incompetent manager	Dean baker structurel unemployed incompetent manager problem.
18	folk scrambling job don exist find structural unemployment	There are precarious jobs, but structural unemployment is prevalent.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted	Job quickly gaining unemployment rate without Washington Reuters; job changed.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate	Accelerated unemployment rate without employment.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted higher	L' job quickly gaining unemployment rate without Washington Reuters; moved higher.
19	energy conservation tip south hill electric heating cooling	The conservation tip of South Hill electric heating cooling energy.
19	fallon follow tip save energy included site tip will help beat hig	You need to follow point dapos; savings dapos; energy included site peak will help beat hig hig.
19	best way save energy live energy efficient save mo	Best way to save energy high energy efficiency save me money.
19	tip help reduce energy bill control electricity save money power bill	Help reduce the bill; energy controls electricity save time; money bill; electricity.
19	save energy cash quick easy tip article will help save ton money saving en	Save money; fast-money, easy-to-consult article will help save tons of money; money by saving.
19	energy money office saving	The apo's money office saves energy and energy.
19	lighting save energy money jim dino staff writer changing lighting system cost effecti	L' lighting saves time; energy Jim dino personal writer changing system d' cost effective lighting.
19	saving house heating cooling	Save cooling by heating houses.
19	energy conservation tip south hill electric heating cooling	The conservation tip of South Hill electric heating cooling energy.
20	detroit auto green	Uh, green driveway.
21	global warming update bizarre weather destroyed crop whale	Update on the strange global warming weather destroyed the whale harvest.
21	terrific abc news story role climate change play extreme winter weather	Huge report on the role of climate change in extreme winter conditions.
21	australian disaster linked global warming	The Australian disaster linked global warming with global warming.
21	storm sign global warming mama believing	Signal of a global warming mama global warming storm.
21	record snowstorm indicator global warming	Record-breaking global warming snowstorm indicator.
21	al gore explains snowmaggedon midst global warming matt harding global warming guru vice	The gore explains snowmaggedon in the midst of global warming, the global warming guru and the global warming guru.
21	climate change update bizarre weather destroyed crop legendary fund manager jeremy grantham weig	Climate change update strange weather destroyed legendary fund manager crop Jeremy Grantham Weig.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins the current controversial liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit television report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins the current controversial liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit television report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins the current controversial liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit television report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit socialutility	Keith Olbermann joins current TV report Keith Olbermann controversial Pundit Socialutility Liberal Pundit Pundit Social Utility.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann joins this report on TV.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann joins this report on TV.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins the current controversial liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit television report.
22	olbermann land current grow york adage outspoken tv host keith olbermann fresh	Olbermann land common culture york adage frank tv host Keith Olbermann fresh.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann joins this report on TV.
22	keith olbermann current tv hosting chief news officer	Keith Olbermann, present on TV, hosts the news director.
23	job wrong place memo president dear president state union add	Misplaced work, president, dear president, union of d' state add.
23	job wrong place memo president dear president state union ad	Inappropriately placed employment, president, dear president, union of d' state.
23	state union small business key winning future small business fu	The success of the small business of the d&apos union; state in the future small business.
24	bbc news domodedovo airport blast rock moscow main airport breakingnews moscow	BBC News Domodedovo airport de l&apos rock explosion; Moscow main airport Moscow news.
24	fatal blast reported moscow airport terminal russian authority monday reported fatal explosion	The fatal explosion was reported Monday by Russian airport terminal authorities in Moscow.
24	check article fox news report dead explosion moscow busiest airport	Read the apos; Fox News reports a dead explosion at Apos, the busiest airport in Moscow.
24	suicide bomber kill moscow airport explosion ripped interna lukewilliamss	A suicide bomber killed someone at the Moscow airport.
24	bomber kill russia biggest airport	The biggest airport in Russia is being killed by the bomber.
24	moscow airport terror attack kill wound ap	L' terrorist attack in Moscow airport killed A.P.
24	dead moscow airport explosion cnn	There was an explosion at the airport of Moscow.
24	explosion kill moscow airport explosion ripped international arrival hall moscow bu	Explosion kills Moscow Lapos; Apos explosion; airport tore international arrival hall Moscow.
24	cnn killed injured terror blast moscow airport terrorist suicide bomber blamed mosco	A suicide bomber attack at Moscow airport, a suicide bomber, killed one person.
24	abc breaking terrorist attack moscow airport leaf dead	Preceding a terrorist attack in Moscow, leaf d' dead airport.
24	explosion rock domodedovo moscow busiest airport injured	The explosion of domodedovo rock Moscow busiest airport injured the airport.
24	bombing moscow airport kill russia	The Moscow airport bombing killed Russia.
24	dozen killed moscow airport suicide bombing noticias	About a dozen suicide bombings at the airport in Moscow.
24	suicide bomber kill russia biggest airport	Suicide bombers kill the biggest airport in Russia.
24	suicide bombing moscow airport moscow suicide bomber killed people russia busiest airpo	A suicide bomber in the airport of Moscow killed people in Russia.
24	news search moscow blast briton uk foreign office urgently checking briton	Searches for apos; information on apos; Moscow explosion briton uk foreign affairs office to check apos; Briton briton emergency.
24	briton dead moscow blast british citizen people killed bomb attack moscow	Some of the British citizens who died in Moscow were killed in a bomb attack in Moscow.
24	live moscow airport explosion	There was an explosion at the airport of Moscow.
24	briton killed moscow blast uk foreign office report british citizen	Briton killed Moscow blast uk Foreign Office British citizen report.
24	hindu killed suicide bomber strike moscow airport	Hindu killed a suicide bomber at Moscow Airport.
24	deadly blast moscow airport	Moscow airport deadly explosion.
24	fatal blast reported moscow airport terminal russian authority monday reported fatal explosion domodedo	The fatal explosion was reported Monday at Moscow Airport, Russian authorities reported a domodedo fatal explosion.
24	deadly suicide bombing hit moscow airport people killed injured suicide bomb blast mo	A deadly suicide bombing at Moscow airport killed people injured by a suicide bombing.
24	suicide bomber blamed moscow airport attack killed russian state tv report	A suicide bomber accused of a Moscow airport attack killed a Russian TV report.
24	guardian uk domodedovo airport hit deadly bombing	Uk domodedovo airport was the target of deadly bombings.
24	carnage bomber target moscow airport	The suicide bomber is targeting the airport in Moscow.
24	killed moscow airport attack police seeking men report	The Moscow airport police were killed looking for men.
24	dead moscow airport explosion cnn	There was an explosion at the airport of Moscow.
24	dead moscow airport explosion	There was an explosion at the airport of Moscow.
24	ufo paranormal terrorist bombing moscow airport	A paranormal terrorist attack in Moscow airport.
24	news uk foreign office urgently checking briton caught explosion rep	The UK Department of Foreign Affairs @-@United is urgently checking that Briton is well aware of the explosion.
24	terrorist attack view exclusive footage today bombing moscow airport dozen dead tcot ocra	Terrorist attack view exclusive images today; bombing of dozens of dead Tcot ocra airport in Moscow.
24	suicide bombing moscow airport kill	A suicide bombing at Moscow airport kills.
24	uk foreign office urgently checking briton caught explosion uk news	UK Foreign Office @-@United checks to see that Briton has caught explosion uk news.
24	moscow airport blast dozen killed explosion hit domodedovo airport early unconfirmed report	Explosion at the airport of Moscow A dozen explosions took place at the airport of Domodedovo.
24	dead moscow airport explosion explosion attributed russia investigative committee cnn	Moscow airport explosion attributed to the Russian commission.
25	giffords husband great rep gabrielle giffords ariz adjusting rehabili	Giffords husband great gabrielle giffords ariz adjust rehabilitation.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky day of recovery the week depicting Gabrielle Giffords' recovery effort.
25	medical news giffords cleared rehab critical care head trauma medpage today	Giffords de l'apos; medical news approved the re-education head injuries page today.
25	giffords condition upgraded good	L' la condition des giffords s' est l'amélioration.
25	bbc news america giffords health good medic condition congresswoman gabrielle giffords	BBC News American Giffords reports good health for Member of Parliament Gabrielle Giffords.
25	giffords rocky road recovery health news	Rocky giffords of recovery health news from the road.
25	breaking news fluid buildup rep giffords brain will delay start full fledged rehabilitation hou	Latest news: l' fluid build-up in Gifford brain will delay the start of full-scale rehabilitation.
25	brain fluid buildup delay giffords rehab	The brain fluid build-up is delaying Giffords' re-education.
25	giffords surprising doctor hospital icu exercise wounded rep gabrielle giffords	Giffords surprisingly doctor exercise this hospital wounded gabriel giffords rep.
25	rep giffords fitness level bodes well recovery add diet loaded fruit	Rep Giffords level of physical condition augurs well the recovery add diet loaded fruits.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery normalcy cnn erwwpr	Dr. Giffords faces a recovery from normal rocky road cnn erwwpr.
25	doctor giffords good condition will rehab rep gabrielle giffords good condition wi	Dr. Giffords is in good condition for the rehabilitation of Gabrielle Giffords.
25	giffords condition upgraded good	L' la condition des giffords s' est l'amélioration.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery fr	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky day of recovery week rep. giffords recovery fr.
25	interested giffords improves watch hour tv gabrielle giffords watched hour television	The giffords concerned improve the apos; hour of gabriel television giffords watched hour of television.
25	doctor giffords recovery sprint day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery fro	Doctor Giffords recuperation sprint day week rep gabriel giffords recuperation from gabriel giffords week.
25	giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition serio	Gifford condition was improved Good doctor rep. gabrielle giffords was improved condition serio condition serio.
25	rep giffords set rehab houston yahoo share friend health smoking story	Giffords set rehab houston yahoo share l' history of smoking with healthy friends.
25	giffords condition upgraded good cnn	The condition of the giffords has improved water quality.
25	giffords surprising doctor hospital icu	The giffords surprise the ICU doctor of the hospital.
25	giffords speaking valve breathing tube	Giffords speaking valvule breathing tube.
25	giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition serio	Gifford condition was improved Good doctor rep. gabrielle giffords was improved condition serio condition serio.
25	brain fluid buildup delay giffords rehab rep gabrielle giffords transferred houston brain	The brain fluid build-up delays the rehab gabriel giffords giffords transferred the brain from Houston.
25	news update giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition	Current status of giffords updated good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded status updated.
25	gabrielle giffords good condition transfer rehab	Gabrielle Giffords is in good condition to transfer rehabilitation transfer.
25	top news giffords full round therapy houston reuters representative gabrielle gifford	Top news Giffords complete therapy Houston Reuters representing Gabrielle Gifford.
25	houston transfer help giffords husband kelly cope	Houston transfer helps Giffords's husband Kelly to get out of there.
25	updated rehab aim giffords life	Giffords' life has been re-oriented.
26	jordan thousand protest demand pm step wave mass protest arab spread opposition supporter	A thousand protests in Jordan for a wave of mass protest in Saudi Arabia spread in support of the opposition.
26	thousand protesting jordan demanding govt step	A thousand protesters are demanding that the government take a step forward.
26	jordan protester gather country demanding prime minister step al jazeera	Jordanian protesters are rallying the country demanding that the Prime Minister take a step forward on the jazeera front.
26	aljazeera thousand protest jordan	A thousand Jordanian protests.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east al jazeera english	A thousand Jordanian protests Middle @-@Orient al jazeera English.
26	desire freedom infectious thousand protest jordan middle east al jazeera english	Wish for the contagious freedom thousand Middle-Orient al jazeera Jordanian protests.
26	pro democracy protest break jordan catspirit	Democracy protest break apo; Jordan's cat spirit.
26	thousand protest jordan demand pm step	A thousand Jordanian protests demand pm not pm.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east	A thousand protests Jordan Middle-Orient.
26	thousand protest jordan reform	Jordanian reform protests a thousand times.
26	thousand protest jordan reform cnn news	A thousand protests on the Jordanian reform of the CNN news service.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east	A thousand protests Jordan Middle-Orient.
26	spreading thousand protest jordan demand pm step aljazeera net	A thousand Jordanian protests require pm pas aljazeera net aljazeera.
26	thousand jordan protest demand pm step day protest opposition supporter stre	A thousand Jordanian protesters demand a working day of protest against the opposition.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck link lit	French fox defies death threat by taunting presenter Glenn Beck.
27	glenn beck fran piven michael tomasky comment free americafirst	Glenn Beckk Fran made Michael Tomasky free comment from America first.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck mental	France Fox Piven defies death threat taunts anchorman Glenn Beck mentally.
27	glenn beck virulent attack cuny prof fox piven inciting threat aaup irresponsible rhetoric	Glenn Beck virulent attack cuny prof fox given inciting to the irresponsible ape rhetorical threat.
27	glenn beck target france fox piven beck scary	Glenn Beck, target france fox Piven, scared.
27	glenn beck france fox piven york time falsely depicts controversy tcot	Glenn beck France Fox piven York Time falsely depicts controversy tcot.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck	Fox of France piven defies death threat taunts anchorman Glenn Beckk.
27	glenn beck france fox piven york time falsely depicts controversy tcot hhrs teaparty	Glenn beck Fox piven York Time falsely depicts the controversy tcot hhrs teaparty.
28	hawaii won release obama birth info	Hawaii won apo news about the birth of Obama.
28	copy obama birth certificate bill pass xmnr tcot gop	Copying Obama birth certificate bill pass xmnr tcot gop gop tcot xmnr.
28	birthers hawaii bill charge president obama birth record effort silence birthers	Birthers hawaii bill President Obama of birth d' record effort silence birthers birthers.
28	hawaii bill grant access obama birth record fee	Hawaii Bill allows access to birth registration fees from Obama.
28	hawaii offer obama birth document honolulu jan upi bid quiet birthers hawaiian legisl	Hawaii offers Obama birth document Honolulu Jan Upi offers calm birthers hawaiian legislation hawaiian.
29	iran iran hang iranian dutch woman drug smuggling iranelection	Iran Iran hang Dutch Dutch Iranian woman drug trafficking iranelection smuggling iranelection.
29	dtn iran iran executes iranian dutch woman detained poll unrest report iranian dutch woman detaine	L' Iran executes a Dutch Iranian woman detained by a poll A Dutch Iranian woman detached from Apos; a poll.
29	dutch freeze contact iran hanging iranelection well late	The Dutch gel contact Iran is hanging iranelection very late.
29	bbc news iran hang iranian dutch woman sahra bahrami iranelections freeiran	BBC News Iran hangs Dutch woman iranian sahra bahrami iranelections freeiran iran.
29	bbc news dutch freeze contact iran hanging	BBC News hutch freezes contact iran hanging.
29	bbc news dutch freeze contact iran hanging	BBC News hutch freezes contact iran hanging.
29	iran hang iranian dutch woman drug smuggling tehran amsterdam reuters iranian dutch woman arrested	Iran hangs Dutch Iranian woman drug smuggler Tehran Amsterdam reuters Iranian woman arrested Dutch woman.
29	dutch break iran link hanging iranelection saudiarabia tunis jan	Dutch break Iran link hang iranelection saudiarabia tunis jan.
29	dutch government end official contact iran protest hanging dutch iranian woman al jazeera	Dutch government ends official contact Iran Hanging protest Dutch Iranian woman al Jazeera.
29	iran hang dutch iranian woman drug smuggling worldnews	Iran hanged Iranian woman drug trafficking world news.
29	netherlands recall iran ambassador dutch woman execution foreign policy outrage	Countries-Bas recall that the ambassador d' Iran executed a Dutch woman for violating foreign policy.
29	iran executes iranian dutch woman	L' Iran executes an Iranian woman from the Netherlands.
30	carney obama press secretary	Carney Obama... press secretary.
30	jay carney white house press secretary richard adam guardian	And the White House door-word, Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard.
30	jay carney voice relationship will develop jaycarney	Jay Carney's vocal relationship will develop Jay Carney.
30	meet jay carney guy white house press secretary	This is Jay Carney, the press secretary for the White House.
30	jay carney white house press secretary richard adam guardian	And the White House door-word, Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard.
30	white house press secretary jay carney	And the door-word of the White House, Jay Carney.
30	ap source obama pick biden spokesman white house press secretary	Ap source Obama choose door-speech biden door-White House press secretary.
30	carney picked obama press secretary mike allen politico	It's the first time I've had a chance to talk to you.
30	obama name press secretary	Obama by press secretary.
30	vice president communication director jay carney named white house press secretary	Jay Carney, vice-president, director of communications, appointed him as press secretary for the White House.
30	time journalist obama press secretary news	"""Journalist Period"" Obama Pressse News."
31	sm socialmedia revolution social medium uprising epoch time tyranny social medium	Sm socialmedia revolution middle social uprising; era of tyranny middle social era.
31	social medium tool protest middle east police worst	L' social medium tool protests against Middle-Orient's worst font.
31	thing social medium revolution enticing idea	L' subject of the thing of the media revolution media medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi revolution revolution of the revolution of the apo revolution; subject of the revolution revolution revolution of the revolution of the apo revolution; before the apos; idea of the apos; ensemble of the apos; before the apos; before the apos; before the apos; before the apos; before the idea of the beginning.
31	haiti tragedy cement role social medium powerful social tool	Haitian tragedy cement social role medium powerful social tool.
31	political power social medium foreign affair	Political power social medium, foreign affairs, foreign affairs.
31	republican nimble democrat social medium study find democrat obama cam tcot tlot	An agile Republican democrat study of social medium finds the democrat obama cam tcot tlot tlot.
31	nerdalert thing social medium revolution	Nerdalert medium thing social revolution.
31	mob democracy facebook twitter youtube revolution politics daily	Facebook mafia democracy youtube revolutionize politics every day.
31	thing social medium revolution activist twitter	C&apos is a social thing, revolution, activist on Twitter.
31	pew republican democrat social medium	Pew Democratic republican social media democrat.
31	egyptian uprising play social medium site despite government internet restriction egypt	Egypt's uprising plays the role of social media despite government restrictions on e-mail.
31	twitter facebook blocked egypt news jan politics sm jan	Facebook blocked the Egyptian news Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan.
31	mob democracy facebook twitter youtube revolution facebook	Democracy mafia facebook twitter youtube revolution facebook.
31	online american social networking twitter republican catch democrat social	On U.S. social media, Republican twitter catches social democrat.
31	journalist social medium report egyptian demonstration audioboo	Journalist social media report protest Egyptian audioboo audioboo.
31	republican gain democrat social medium study released pew center internet	L' study on social medium Democratic Republic published on Internet the point d' anchor of the Internet.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew lik socialmedia	The gop wrestling survey on social media the youngest user of Internet pew as socialmedia.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew	The poll gop catch the social medium the youngest user of Internet pew pew.
31	power social medium	The power of the social medium.
31	social medium growing role social medium	The growing role of social medium social role social medium social medium social medium.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew social medium	Surveys catch the youngest social media; Internet user pew social media.
31	republican catch democrat socialmedia politics	Republican politics grabbing social media Democrat.
31	online american social networking twitter politics campaign	On US social networking sites, a political campaign on Twitter is underway.
31	will egypt facebook powered revolution hard heel tunisian protest	L' Egypt facebook fueled by the heel revolution hard protest Tunisia.
31	republican gain democrat social medium	Republicans win the social democrat medium.
31	obama campaign playbook promote agenda social medium	Obama's campaign book promotes social media agenda.
31	facebook twitter revolution mediapost searchblog overview internet blackout af	Twitter Twitter revolution mediapost blog research blog d' Internet black-out af glimpse.
31	christie prof adept social medium	Well, Christie teaches social psychics.
31	gop voter active social networking site political purpose washing artimpactnetpr	Active voting gop social networking site political wash artimpactnetprprpr.
31	journalist social medium report egyptian demonstration journalist	Journalist social media report of the Egyptian protest journalist of the protest.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium	Gop wrestling is the survey social media.
31	rash report social medium tool social unrest john rash tunisian mohamed bouazizi cou	Rash reports a social media tool john rash tunisian mohamed neck bazizi social disorder.
31	thing social medium revolution	C&apos is the social medium revolution.
31	pew internet online american social networking twitter politics campaign internet	On the web, on the web, on the US social networking site, on Twitter, on the web, on the web, on the web, on the web, on the web, etc.
31	political power social medium foreign affair	Political power social medium, foreign affairs, foreign affairs.
31	obama campaign playbook promote agenda social medium	Obama's campaign book promotes social media agenda.
32	alberta ferretti spring rtw	Alberta ferretti spring rtw.
32	leon payn bottega veneta coming	Leon payn bottega veneta coming up.
32	bottega veneta teal turquoise knot intrecciato snakeskin clutch	Bottega veneta Turquoise teal Intrecciato knot snakeskin clutch intrecciato.
32	bottega veneta rtw spring beautiful fashion art gt	Bottega veneta rtw spring beautiful art gt.
32	photography check bottega veneta robert longo photo shoot fall winter advertising camp	Photograph check Bottega Veneta Robert Longo photo session autumn advertising camp winter.
32	straight catwalk stan jouk	Right footbridge stan yak.
32	trend spring	The spring trend.
32	bottega veneta launch fragrance	Bottega veneta launch flavor.
33	wisconsin detector law family duplex	Duplex from Wisconsin's detector family.
34	bbc news police lose officer	BBC police lose an officer.
34	government spending cut leave north east forestry commission base saveourforests	The government's budget cuts have left the base of the forestry commission in the north-saves our forests.
34	manchester austerity cut hit frontline service leisure centre library swimming pool public toile	L' austerity of Manchester has hit first line leisure center library swimming pool public toilet pool leisure center.
34	spending cut toy library jeopardy	Spending on a toy library is risking your life.
34	guardian music birmingham city council cut bcmg reversed protest kicking fuss work	Guardian music birmingham city council cut bcmg overturned protest kicking chaotic work.
35	disease health risk bed bug bite	Bedbug bite is a health risk.
35	sage advice travel picking bedbug hitchhiker	Some good tips on choosing a car-to stop bugs.
35	rid bedbug	Get rid of the bedbugs.
35	bedbug case clinophobia fear going bed	Bed bug clinophobia is afraid of going to bed.
35	bed bug problem bad bed bug summit washington	The bed bug problem, the top of bed bugs, Washington.
35	bed bug deadbedbugs help fact bed bug treatment	Dead bed bugs help with bed bug treatment.
35	lighter note today wrapped second national bed bug summit cue bad joke conference hotel	Lighter note today; wrapped hui second national bed bug summit replica bad joke conference hotel joke.
35	deadbedbugs fact bed bug cover	Dead bed bugs are the bed bug blanket.
35	bedbug rapidly evolving fight pesticide tech news	Bed bugs evolve rapidly, fight pesticide technologies.
35	national summit address bedbug epidemic	The national summit will address the epidemic of bed bugs.
35	fed crack bedbug	Feeding crack bed bugs.
36	extremely good analysis difficult will murdoch money daily blog	Extremely good analysis difficult murdoch money daily blogger.
36	daily review murdoch ipad newspaper rupert murdoch ipad launch daily offer glitzy graphic	Daily journal murdoch daily murdoch ipad daily journal rupert murdoch ipad launch offer scintillating graphic.
36	faster forward news corp launch tablet daily app ipad designed scratch dail	The front daily launch tablet of the company of l' information ipad daily application designed scratch dail.
36	web daily stunning slow day launch daily ipad newspaper ipad	Surprisingly slow daily web day launch daily ipad journal ipad daily ipad journal.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	health acai berry effective colon cleanse ingredient acai berry rightly desc	L&apos, effective cleansing ingredient for the colon, d&apos berries; acaj, rightly descends.
37	skinny burn fat	Skinny burn grease.
37	maqui berry newest effective losing weight	More effective maqui berry again weight loss.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing	Misunderstanding of weight loss of bay d'apos.
37	will acai berry help lose weight acai berry renowned natural weight loss supplement hea	D'apos berries; açaï will help to lose weight D'apos berries are a natural weight loss supplement.
37	acai berry diet succeed hoodia gordonii site acai berry cultivated acai palm	The diet of the d&apos berries replaces that of the gordonii of the d&apos berries; d&apos cultivated acai palm.
37	acai berry supplement help weight loss bamadems reason acai ambria dealcenter	The extra d&apos berries assist in weight loss bamadems reason acai ambria dealer.
37	weight loss diet acai berry weight loss diet plan diet diet food weight loss beauty sally beauty bea	Dietary weight loss diet diet diet weight loss diet weight loss beauty beauty sally bea.
37	love finding stuff acai berry juice drinking weight loss lookin sally	J' loves to find things like berry juice while drinking weight loss.
37	acai berry powder ehow acai berry powder acai berry extraordinarily	Poudre d'apos; acai berry ehow acai berry powder d'apos; acai berry extraordinaire.
37	buy acai berry weight loss product read buy acai berry weight loss product	"Purchase dock berry weight loss product; read ""Buy dock berry weight loss product; acai."""
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	best weight loss pill acai berry advantage king bop loved appreciated solely lucky en	The best weight loss pill acai advantage bberries beloved bop beloved only lucky bberries.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry weight loss expectation acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.
37	best lose weight acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	Better lose weight acai baies weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction.
37	acai berry supplement weight loss associated content heard oprah win	Açaa berry supplements of weight loss associated with content heard oprah win.
37	acai berry scam free trial weight loss genius scam associated acai berry supposed	L&apos, bay d&apos scam, Açaï without trial, weight loss genius, l&apos, scam associated with bay d' Açaï supposed to be a scam from the bay d' Açaï.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Diets weight-loss plan juices; acai equals nutritional claim acai acai.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A healthy weight reduction is part of a diet that slows down to bayberries.
37	healthy weight loss acai berry bamadems acai berry ambria dealcenter	Weight loss-acai bamadems acai bryryry ambria dealcenter health.
37	acai berry health benefit weight loss improvement	Açaï healthyberries benefit weight loss improvement weight loss.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	weight loss diet plan south american acai berry currently american lose	South Bay acai weight loss diet plan South Bay-American currently lose.
37	acai berry capsule review acai berry benefit letspost jone dow acai berry capsule well	Apos capsule review; acai bay acai joneow dai bay acai pods are well-advertised by acai bay pods.
37	weight loss diet plan acai berry antioxidant popular supplement include antioxidant rich acai berry	Slimming antioxidant plan d&apos berries; acai popular supplement include antioxidant rich d&apos berries; acai rich in antioxidants.
37	weight loss diet plan acai berry antioxidant popular supplement include antioxidant rich acai berry	Slimming antioxidant plan d&apos berries; acai popular supplement include antioxidant rich d&apos berries; acai rich in antioxidants.
37	madwrite weight loss minimal technique numerous acai berry pulp diet benefit leave conse	Minimum techniques of madwrite weight loss many dietary advantages of d&apos berry pulp; acai leave the result.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Dietary plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' acai promote weight loss impulse weight loss.
37	acai berry fact lose weight acai berry lose super online deal net lfittips	Acaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	acai berry effective weight loss pill current health article tafdropdn blue acai berry effective	Effective weight loss pill acai berry current health article tafdropdn blue acai berry effective tafdropdn.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan demand acai berry eventually lead	Açaa bberries chocolate tasting weight loss diet requires possibly lead acai berries.
37	random concept explicit acai berry weight full excitement	Exact random concept acai berry full weight excitation.
37	acai berry diet linda acai berry diet acai berry weightcrushers ambria dealcenter	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Diets weight-loss plan juices; acai equals nutritional claim acai acai.
37	losing weight best acai berry benefit report elmerfizz people reduce fat	Losing weight Best profit acai berries ratio elmerfizz people reduce fats.
37	madwrite acai berry colon cleansing diet visit post acai fruit deto	The cleaning regime with the berries of madwrite acai colon visits the fruits of post-acai.
37	acai berry diet weight loss include increase body energy level increased immune system	Loss of weight in the diet of bay berries includes increased body energy levels, increased immune system.
37	acai berry diet side effect lose weight fast acai berry diet side effe	Lapos; acai berry diet side effect loses weight lapos; acai berry fast diet side effect.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan adi news scientifically prov	Chocolate acai with tasting berries weight loss diets dietary plan adi news scientifically prov.
37	losing excess weight amazon acai berry weight loss people overweight obe	Excessive weight loss Amazon acai berry weight loss people ob obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe weight.
37	acai berry weight loss formula program flush pound lose weight free bottle	D&apos berry weight loss program; açaï, flush, bottle without weight loss.
37	top weight loss pill include acai berry purchased	The pill for weight loss includes the berries d'apos; açaï purchased.
37	acai berry effective weight loss health benefit article will explain aca	The health benefits article will explain the benefits of apo; aca for health.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing helen arsenault january talk mogul op	The weight loss of the d'apos berries confused Helen Arsenault in January.
37	acai berry improve health lose weight acai acai berry fruit	Berries improve health, weight falls, and fruits from berries decrease.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry weight loss expectation acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Dietary plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' acai promote weight loss impulse weight loss.
37	acai berry acai diet info acai berry detox product curious acai berry	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	amazon rain forest safe acai berry diet power attributed	Rain forest Amazon safe acai bays dietary allocated power.
37	weight loss acai berry bitcomet blog acai berry diet acai diet acai bromelain weight loss acai pow	Bitcomet acai berry weight loss acai bberries acai diet acai bromelain weight loss acai pow acai pow.
37	reading acai berry weight loss diet plan cardiovascular health diet weight loss	Read acai baies diet weight loss Cardiovascular health plan diet weight loss diet.
37	acai berry product real wait loss brand question fezangee acai berry pro	Açai produce dapos berries; real expectation mark issue of loss fezangee acai pro bays; waiting fezangee.
37	acai berry medicine food acai berry benefit northcountry boypost ron duckett acai berry	Berries, berries, food, bayberries, aça, northern boypost, ron duckett acai, bay d' açaï.
37	essential weight loss diet pill guide best acai berry diet help promoting	The essential diet pill will guide you to the best diet in the bay.
37	acai berry best healty fruit pinoy pen article acai create originates acai berry	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	leanspa acai berry diet fact fiction acai berry weight loss fad buyer	Leanspa acai bays Fiction Facts acai bays weight loss fad buyer fad.
37	thin link burn fat	Fine links burn fat that burns.
37	acai berry acai berry juice weight loss	Açai berries Azai berries Berries berry juice weight loss.
37	weight loss diet plan south american acai berry currently american lose	South Bay acai weight loss diet plan South Bay-American currently lose.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional acai berry hit health	Dapo juice-based diet; equal nutritional acai based on potato berries; acai affects health.
37	acai berry diet side effect lose weight fast acai berry diet side effe	Lapos; acai berry diet side effect loses weight lapos; acai berry fast diet side effect.
37	lose weight world effective nutrition acai weight loss acai berry weight loss	Loss of weight worldwide effective nutrition acai weight loss acai weight loss bay berries.
37	loss weight acai berry capsule benefit	Loss of weight acai berry capsule profit.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan adi news scientifically prov	Chocolate acai with tasting berries weight loss diets dietary plan adi news scientifically prov.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	acai berry social bookmarking net acai berry latest weight loss buy acai berry best colon cleanse	Addition of a brand-social page to the bays; acai The latest weight loss of the bays; acai The best colon cleansing of the bays; acai.
37	real acai berry supplement deal rapid fast weight loss well ordered acai berry blast	The real supplements to the bays d'apos; açaï allow a fast and well ordered loss of weight.
37	acacia berry diet acacia berry acai weight loss hcg diet plan happened account parti	The diet acacia berry acacia berry acry weight loss hcg plan s' is produced taking into account part.
37	ready thin ready don burn fat	You know, getting ready doesn't burn fat.
37	secret natural weight loss food acai berry benefit	Loss of natural weight secret food acai profit berries.
37	told thin ready burn fat	Said thin ready burn fat.
37	told trim fat ready check burn fat	Set fat ready check the burnt fat.
37	acai berry eating regimen review lose lb rapid zwak org info acai berry benefit yo	L'apos; examination of the diet of the berries d'apos; quickly loses lb rapid or information acai profit yo berries.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Diets weight-loss plan juices; acai equals nutritional claim acai acai.
37	swanson vitamin review weight review acai berry buy calorie control weight swanson vitam	Swanson vitamin review acai berries critical weight buy Swanson weight calorie control Swanson vitamin weight.
37	acai berry juice drinking weight loss juice will help	Softberry juice; drinking weight loss juice will help.
37	reason acai berry weight loss diet case half popula	That's why the weight loss of the bay diet affects half of the population.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Slimming diet plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle.
37	acai berry detox scam acai berry detox scam rachel weight loss blog acai weight loss experien	Acai berry detox scam acai berry detox scam rachel weight loss blog acai weight loss experience acai weight loss experience.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan advertised sugge	Açai weight loss diet berries health weight reduction plan number diets advertised sugge.
37	acai berry diet sexy acai berry scam warning acai berry diet	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	burn pound today day check burn fat	Burn book today; oil, check burn fat.
37	lt gt acai berry lt gt weight loss side effect improvement	Gt acai berry gt weight loss side effects improved.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry people sticking	Dieting plan Healthy living acai berry people sticking to people.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	pure acai berry thorough article pure acai berry buy pure acai berry acai berry extracteveryone se	Dapos berries; pure pure article dapos berries; can buy dapos berries; pure acai dapos berries; acai dapos berries; can extract everyone.
37	exactly acai berry diet pill wrk yahoo answer acai berry diet pill	The diet pill exactly acai berry wrk yahoo meet acai berry diet pill.
37	acai berry work lose weight lose weight heard acai berry pe	The weight of the work on the d'apos bays is being reduced.
37	acai berry cena austin meyer acai berry weight loss acai berry thin acai berry thin ra acai berry thin frum	Acai berry cena austin meyer acai berry weight loss acai berry fine acai berry fine acai berry fine frum frum.
37	acai berry work reading help understand acai berry work acai berry	The d&apos berries are read to help understand the work of d&apos berries.
37	told skinny today day burn fat	J&apos, thin today, fat day to burn day after day.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry people sticking	Dieting plan Healthy living acai berry people sticking to people.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry weight loss expectation acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.
37	acai berry juice diet regime operate excess weight heading answer question soo	Berry juice diet d&apos uses excess weight to answer Soo Soo question.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Dietary plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' acai promote weight loss impulse weight loss.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing industry analyst acai berry directly re	Weight loss of potato berries; Causal, confusing for growers; potato analyst; potato berry industry; acai.
37	food burn belly fat don	The food burns Don's belly fat.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan cardiovascular health diet weight loss shedd	Acaa diet weight-loss plan cardiovascular health diet weight-loss diet.
37	heard acai berry diet acai berry heard diet purchasing	J&apos heard that d&apos berries açaï diet bays d' açaï heard dietary shopping.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Slimming diet plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A healthy weight reduction is part of a diet that slows down to bayberries.
37	acai year weight loss diet plan acai berry purplish fruit harvested palm tree	Weight-loss diet plan; year of birth; apple fruit harvested with purple berries; acai.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A healthy weight reduction is part of a diet that slows down to bayberries.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan demand acai berry eventually lead	Açaa bberries chocolate tasting weight loss diet requires possibly lead acai berries.
37	buy acai berry cicerone superiority lfittips	Buy acai berry cicerone superiority ifittips.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Slimming diet plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Dietary plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' acai promote weight loss impulse weight loss.
37	acai berry powder content health weight loss hard figure	D&apos berry powder content; acai pour la santé.
37	acai berry nutrient power weight loss diet plan acai berry popularity expanded rain	Dietary plan for nutrient weight loss of d'apos berries; açaï The popularity of d'apos berries has increased rain.
37	goodbye pound acai berry weight loss pill acai ultima making larg	Bye weight loss pill for d&apos berries; acai ultima make great.
37	weight loss acai berry diet improvement acai berry diet individual large amount accept	Weight loss acai bberries diet improvement acai bberries individual diet large amount accept.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A healthy weight reduction is part of a diet that slows down to bayberries.
38	venezuela chavez mark year power	Venezuela marked the year of power.
38	venezuela chavez reelection written caracas venezuelan president hugo chavez sunday	Venezuela chavez re-election written caracas venezuelan president hugo chavez Sunday.
38	chavez mark year office venezuelan president hugo chavez mark year power promising news	Chavez mark a Venezuelan office president hugo chavez mark a power promising news.
38	hugochavez venezuelan commemorate democracy day january rebelleft	Come hugochavez comeuelen commemorate the day of democracy January rebellft rebellft January.
38	venezuela chavez threatens seize bank efe president hugo chavez threatened expropriate venezuelan	Venezuela Chavez threatens to seize bank president Hugo Chavez threatens to expropriate Venezuela.
38	golf venezuelan president hugo chavez enemy golf venezuelan president hugo chavez	Venezuelan golf president hugo chavez enemy golf Venezuelan president hugo chavez.
38	chavez mark year office venezuelan president hugo chavez mark year power promising press	Chavez mark a Venezuelan office president hugo chavez mark a promising press power.
38	hugo chavez apologizes venezuelan people ahead election	And hugo chavez apologizes to the Venezuelan people for the upcoming elections.
38	venezuela chavez enemy golf	Venezuela Chavez enemy golf course.
38	right group claim chavez judiciary foe	The right group claims the apos; judicial enemy chavez.
38	interview venezuela sweetheart champion chavez venezuelan president hugo chavez speaks meeting	Interview come love champion chavez venezuelan president hugo chavez talk meeting.
39	winter storm hit harder chicago toronto	The winter storm hit Chicago Toronto hardest.
39	comed crew restoring power customer chicago	Apo restoration crew; Chicago customer electricity.
39	national guard called chicago snow storm woow snow chill people	National guard called Chicago snow chill people woow snowstorm.
39	city regional service brace storm bracing approaching blizzard ldquo historic proportion rdquo city	The city's regional service prepares storms at home; approaching blizzard ldquo historical proportion rdquo city.
39	save poptarts tmr chicago foot snow hour forecaster	Save the forecaster's poptarts from Chicago's snow time.
39	crazy lake shore drive downtown chicago shut	The road down the lake to downtown Chicago is closed.
39	foxchicago blizzard trap driver lsd hour	Foxchicago blizzard trap driver lsd hour.
39	chicago city sneer snow brought chicago reuters chicago city sn	Chicago city taunts snow brought Chicago Reuters Chicago city sn Chicago.
39	mayor closed chicago public school	The mayor closed down the public school in Chicago.
39	foot snow hour chicago latest blizzard warning don travel stay indoors chicago breaking news	Chicago's Snow Hour Forecast The latest blizzard warning doesn't travel to Chicago's interior.
39	lake shore drive closed blizzard	Driving on shore of closed blizzard Lake.
39	chicago foot snow hour bout blizzard heading hater	Chicago soccer snow hour match blizzard heading to hateful.
39	timesxemail chicago warned brace blizzard barrelling chicago emergency official offe	Chicago-based voice mail alerting Blizzard Blizzard Barricading the Apostles; Chicago-based E.R.O.
39	pm latest chicago free blizzard update flight cancelled storm	The last free blizzard flight from Chicago canceled the storm.
39	chicago blizzard closed lake shore drive entire length notice	Chicago Blizzard closed lake bank conduct the entire length notice.
39	blizzard break chicago snow record inch expected	The blizzard broke the snow record in Chicago.
39	chicago fire department snow mobile reach folk stranded lake shore drive blizzard	The snow from the Chicago Fire Department reaches as far as the blizzards on the shores of the lake.
39	chicago lake shore drive death trap closed stranded car blizzard	Closed-up car blizzard on the shores of Lake Chicago.
39	lake shore drive closed chicago blizzard	Lakefront drive closed Chicago blizzard closed.
40	aurobindo pharma receives usfda approval levofloxacin tablet news	Aurobindo Pharma obtains approval from Ufda for levofloxacin tablet news.
40	fda approves drug reduce risk preterm birth risk pregnant woman silver spring md feb	FDA approves a drug that reduces the risk of preterm birth in pregnant women.
40	fda approves rituxan maintenance follicular lymphoma chemo	FDA approves rituxan maintenance chemo for follicular lymphoma.
40	fda ok viibryd treat depression fda approved drug called viibryd treat adult major depressiv	Fda ok viibryd treat fda approved depression drug called viibryd treat adult major depressive.
40	so sleep update fda clear pgxhealth depressive disorder drug viibryd health treatment	So, sleep update fda clear depressive disorder pgxhealth drug viibryd health treatment.
40	fda approves pharma preterm birth drug embattled drugmaker pharmaceutical reported health reg	The FDA approves the drug manufacturer's reported health plan for preterm delivery in pharmacies.
40	viibryd approved treat depression adult psych central news	Viibryd approved the treatment of adult psychic depression central information.
40	fda approves drug treat depression	FDA approves drug treatment for depression.
40	fda approved injectable drug called makena reduce risk preterm delivery week	The FDA-approved injectable drug called makena reduces the risk of preterm birth.
40	fda approves premature birth drug philadelphia inquirer share friend top news health	FDA approves premature birth drug Philadelphia inquire share friend of first health news.
40	fda approves drug reduce risk premature birth time	A drug that reduces the risk of premature birth is FDA approved.
40	fda approves drug prevent premature birth yahoo share friend health smoking sto	The FDA approves drugs for the prevention of premature birth yahoo share health friends sto smokers.
40	fda approves drug treat nerve pain shingle	FDA approves drugs to treat nerve pain.
40	myl mylan awarded fda approval generic protonix delayed release tablet gerd	Myl mylan obtained the epos; generic protonix gilded delayed release tablet fda approval.
40	npr fda approves drug prevent preterm birth	The npr fda approves preterm birth prevention drugs.
40	pharma news fda clear pgxhealth depressive disorder drug viibryd	Pharmaceutical info fda clear pgxhealth drug viibryd depressive disorder.
40	bioportfolio news fda approves drug reduce preterm delivery risk pharmaceutical busi bioportfolio news	Biochemical Portfolio News FDA approves biopharmaceutical portfolio news to reduce early delivery risk.
41	beck rating plummeted	Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re
41	glenn beck rating year ago fb	Uh, Glenn Beck, a year ago.
41	sharing neocon robert kagan beck call panic monger	Well, sharing the neocon Robert Kagan Beck calls for panic monger.
41	glenn beck post biggest rating drop cable news january fb	Glenn Beckk posted the highest take-home rate; listen to January cable news fb.
42	huge outdoor slated feb wft newsfrom trophy elk deer hunt trout ba	D' huge news from the trophy deer hunt to trout ba.
42	fishing rule federal panel table kevin wadlow annual harvest popular recreational fish	Fishing Rules Federal Panel Table Kevin Wadlow harvests popular recreational fish annually.
42	better saltwater fishing general	Best saltwater fishing in the world.
42	caption contest win ticket gear fly fishing film tour tim romano fly fishing film tour kick	Subcontest @-@titles win the ticket d' fishing equipment to the fly fishing tour of the timano fly fishing film d&apos romano coup d' fly fishing movie tour.
42	prettyman annual fish porn provider coming fly fishing film festival bring subject called	Prettyman, annual porno fish supplier come fly-fishing festival bring subject called topic.
42	sedative free whale fishing	Whale fishing without sedatives.
42	cook gun shop offer amp firearm gunsmithing service hunting fishing accessory	D&apos stores; firearms for cooks offers a service d' armoury d' addendum for hunting fishing accessories.
42	brown trout fishing tip yahoo answer wfnewsi headed alberta july	The brown trout fishing board yahoo response has recently been directed Alberta July alberta news.
42	river monster breede saltwater fishing general fishing fish	River monster breede saltwater fishing general fishing fish.
42	saltwater fish marine aquarium fish saltwater aquarium	Marine fish aquarium; saltwater fish aquarium; saltwater aquarium.
42	info topic fish tank heater aquarium stuff technorati tag aquarium heater aquariu	Aquarium aquarium heating information aquarium stuff technorati tag aquarium heating aquariu.
42	minnesota week extreme ice fishing rescuer boat save stranded fisherman	Minnesota Week Extreme Ice Fishing Rescue boat saves stranded fisherman.
42	relevance fly fishing rod fly fishing outdoor activity fly fishing seriously exciting fan	Relevance Fly fishing with fishing rods Fly fishing outdoors Fly fishing seriously exciting fan.
42	trout steelhead fly fishing supply stretched canvas poster steelhead trout image	Rainbow trout-@-@ en-ciel The fly fishing for rainbow trout-en-ciel shows the rainbow trout-en-sky.
42	sedative free whale fishing care news network	Canadian Council on the Status of Endangered Wildlife in Canada.
42	general fishing newscoarse fish today meeting ifi aci angling ireland	General big fish fishing news today; today meeting si aci fishing in Ireland.
42	wisconsin fishing report posted	Wisconsin fishing report posted.
42	eu urged overhaul fishing policy	I urged him to review his fishing policy.
42	fish eat complete fishing guide	The fish eat the complete fishing guide.
42	cabo san lucas cabo san lucas fishing report january early don plan making dinner	Cabo san lucas cabo san lucas fishing report Morning Don is planning dinner.
42	check price fly fishing lure ebay store info	Check the price of the fly fishing bait.
42	bigger boat albert pujols biggest fish catch cardinal chum reel	Biggest ship Albert pujols biggest fish catches the chum salmon coil cardinal.
42	trout biting tackle read urban phoenix az metro lake fishing trip local park	Plate-form of fishing trout bite read the urban phoenix azro fishing trip of the metro lake local park.
42	interesting south indian river fishing report lt lt	An interesting report on fishing in southern India.
42	friday time pack week ice fishing check canadian	On Friday, ice fishing week, Canadian fisherman.
42	fishing technique fishing maine surf fishing striped bass	Fishing techniques Longline fishing The longline fishery.
42	interested fly fishing guide prague	Interested fly fishing guide Prague.
42	gill net fishing closed early ton rockfish poaching bust capital news service photo kerry davis	Gillnet fishing closed early rockfish poaching to the Capital News Source Kerry Davis Photo Service.
42	celebrity gossip fishing madison river montana	Celebrity gossip fishing the Madison Montana River.
42	mike iaconelli bass fishing ike hook big bass difficult situation video ratin	Mike Iaconelli Bass fishing Ike hook hook Big Bass difficult situation video ratin.
42	fishing tackle box zebco ready tackle telescopic multi combo fishing kit	Fishing box zebco ready multi-como telescoping fishing kit.
42	indicator point great fall steelhead fishing	Indicator point great fishing d' autumn rainbow trout-en-sky.
42	wilmington nc inshore winter fishing report	Wilmington nc A report on the inshore winter fishery.
42	cook trout fresh water fish grilling fish heart healthy recipe cook trout	Cook d&apos trout; freshwater fish grill fish heart healthy recipe trout cook.
42	catch catfish hand	Catch hand of fish-cat.
42	blog post tunkwa leighton lake ice fishing report	The blog tunkwa leighton reports ice fishing in the lake.
42	youghal bridge fished ther time year small cod angling fishing	Youghal Bridge fished for small cod on the line this year.
42	dress winter steelhead fishing	The winter fishing dressed with rainbow trout-in-sky.
42	bass fishing contest android game shuixing casual	Android shuixing casual android bass fishing contest.
42	complete book fly fishing	It's a complete book on fly fishing.
42	saltwater deep sea fishing net will full standard fishing virginia seve	Offshore saltwater fishing net will be fully standard fishing virginia seve.
42	angling free fishing access wft newsby cathy pelletier chronicle dunnville peopl	Angling: free access to news via Dunnville peopl Chronic Foam Cathy.
42	saltwater aquarium secretthriving marine aquarium secret pet shop dont	Aquarium d' salt water, secret marine aquarium, secret marine aquarium, pet shop which does not contain animals.
42	hatteras jack fishing report rodanthe monday january nailed striper	Hatteras Jack fishing report rodanthe Monday Janvier nailed strip-teaseuse.
42	fishing exclusive popular sporting wft newssimple sharp sp	Exclusive and popular fishing wft newssimple sp.
42	family ice fishing clinic derby idaho fishing idaho	Family ice fishing clinic derby idaho fishing idaho.
42	kayak fishing extreme sport wavewalk fishing kayak angler kayak fishing extreme sport	Sport Fishing Kayak Extreme wave walking kayak kayak kayak fishing kayak fishing line extreme sport fishing.
42	ice fishing iowa	Uh, ice fishing in Iowa.
42	fly fishing program host replaces columbia country wft newsbob asbury producer	L' host of the fly fishing program replaces Colombian newspaper producer Asbury.
42	checkout fishing fishinggear deal save	If you are a fisherman, don't hesitate to contact us to find out more.
42	competitive fishing tactic fly everyday fisherman thinking man	Competitive fishing tactic, everyday fishing fly, fisherman thinking man.
42	saltwater fish tank harmful human help	Reservoir for fish; salt water harmful to the environment; harmful human assistance.
42	aquarium fish breeding angel fish best technique started breeding angel fish buy	Aquarium fish reproduction angel fish best technique started to fish reproduction angel fish buy angel fish.
42	news annual ice fishing derby	News of the annual ice fishing derby season.
42	man tased mpd fight fishing tourney jan year cable wisconsin man	Man Taser MPD Fight Fishing Tourney Jan Cable year Wisconsin Man.
42	lazer trokar return sponsor boatus collegiate bass fishing championship	Lazer trokar return sponsor boatus collegial fishing to l' bass championship.
42	mastering big chill outdoors fishing news ice fishing kind	Master the cold fishing outdoors New fishing on ice fishing like fishing.
42	hooked ice fishing small sled fishing gear pulling contained fish targeting	Fishing fleets, fishing fleets, fishing hooks, small sled fishing gear towing, fish targeting.
42	florida sportsman fishing boating saltwater fly fishing stalking red kayak	Saltwater fishing for a red kayak in pursuit of a fly.
42	american fishing wire duo lock snap size lb sizescorrosion resistant black finish	L&apos size; U.S. fishing wire duo lock Lb. dimensions Corrosion resistant black finish.
42	fishing find freshwater fishing lure cheap ebay buy	Fishing in freshwater fishing lure cheap ebay buy ebay.
42	watch shearon harris lake jun top water bass fishing	Watch Shearon Harris Lake fishing bass d'apos; water from the top of Jun Lake.
42	carp fishing book effective angling step step king bop carp fishing book	Book on effective carp fishing King bop carp angling book on carp fishing.
42	find better deal offshore saltwater fishing boat ebay check	Find a better offshore fishing boat ebay check ebay.
42	fishing news banner website	Bannière d' fishing information website.
42	discus fish aquarium	A discus fish tank.
42	boatsshopping fishing headline oklahoma metro trout fishing pond instructional clinic pave exciting winter angling html	Trout fishing in Oklahoma highlights trout fishing in l'apos ponds; Oklahoma.
42	ice fishing bro brohsdahl jason mitchell byron eckhardt special ice fishing schtick	Brohsdahl jason mitchell byron eckhardt special ice fishing schtick.
42	best fishing spot lm clickrealstyle	This is the best fishing site in the world.
42	watch montauk kayak fishing blitz video fishing news video	Watch Montauk kayak fishing blitz video fishing video video news video.
42	twenty question walleye pro jimmy bell hunting big life fishing	Questions 20 walleye pro jimmy bell long-life fishing long-life hunt.
42	yap palau sport fishing promotional sport fishing video produced video rating	Yap palau promotes sport fishing video fishing video product video filing.
42	ice fishing trip frozen connecticut river vic attardo outdoors current strong flow	Connecticut River ice fishing trip Vic attardo at l'apos; current outdoors.
42	redfishing great cape fear backwater warmer day light wind	The great cape fishery fears the light wind from the sea; a warmer day in the bottom waters.
42	caught lb yellowfin tuna flick fishing flickfishing	Fishing for yellowfin tuna, yellowfin tuna and longline.
42	going fishing today friend hatteras hope find catch fishing cabo slow	I'm going fishing today; oil friends Hatteras hope to find slow fishing cabo catches.
42	yell cast jr hartley ad digital era author search fly fishing book dj hunt book read	Yell cast jr hartley and l' digital era author of hunting fly fishing book dj book read.
42	colorado river colorado fly fishing condition report kynd	Colorado River colorado fly fishing condition report kynd.
42	pensacola salt water fishing guide undoubtedly best tourist destination map unite	Pensacola saltwater fishing guide probably the best tourist destination map unite.
42	eric sharp hot spot ice fishing eric sharp detroit free press eric sharp wisp smelt vi	Eric hot spot in ice fishing Riveted Eric from Detroit free press Rive Eric from l'apos; smelt hardwood.
42	flyfishing big earth publishing flyfishing barry reynolds bass walleye buy john	Fly fishing The great earth industry Fly fishing Barry Reynolds Yellow walleye would buy John.
42	discus fish aquarium	A discus fish tank.
42	interesting community fishing derby feature angler ice lt lt	There is an interesting community fishing contest featuring anglers.
42	tropical fish tank help aquarium fish tank tropical fish tank fish clean	L' aquarium helps l' aquarium to clean fish from l' tropical aquarium.
42	trout fishing duo slated lmfa longview news journal local event trou	The trout fishing duo lmfa longview News, local news event hole.
42	treasure coast fishing report jan trout action good river angler sight cast	Treasure fishery report on the coast of Atlantic Canada.
42	three ton striped bass seized illegal fishing net	Three tons of striped bass were seized in illegal fishing nets.
42	sow bug round north american fly fishing forum time march mountain	Planting bugs around the-U.S. fly fishing forum is moving towards the mountain.
42	red fishing knot book book fishing harry	Book of red fishing knots harry fisherman.
42	cold weather put chill clear lake bass fishing cold weather slowed bass fishing crawl	The cold weather caused the clear cold of the fishing lake to freeze; bass in cold weather slowed fishing; bass.
42	eye rise fishing field stream	L'apos elevation; fishing stream eye of the river field.
42	fishing bait bait trout fishing trout fishing type equipment dictate	Fishing equipment; brook trout fishing gear; fish bait; trout bait fishing equipment; trout fishing equipment.
42	trout fishing tip learn wedding preparation trout fishing tip help catch bigger	Trout fishing tips for wedding planning Trout fishing tips to help catch bigger fish.
42	cold huge impact fishing bradenton herald	Cold huge impact fishing bradenton herald bradenton.
42	american fishing book guide value	U.S. fishing book guide value.
42	colorado fishing blog fish explorer bernie keefe	Colorado fishing blog fish explorer bernie keefe.
42	aquarium fish aquarium success good common sense will fir	Aquarium fish success aquarium common sense will be fir.
42	hearing heated sea bass fishing usual fishing year black sea bass specie june	Hear seabass warm fishing d' fishing habit year black sea bass june species June.
42	fishnewseu issf urge limit tuna fishing capacity international seafood sustainabili eu tweet daily	Fishnewseu press to limit international tuna fishing capacity for sustainable seafood had daily tweet.
42	barbel fishing float short edited clip barbel day way series top barbel angler mic wo	The fishing barbed wire floating short clip barbed wire diurnal series barbed wire high fishing wire mic wo wo.
42	popular fly fishing smallmouth bass auction	The popular smallmouth bass auction for fly fishing.
42	eastern sport outdoor harrisburg hunting fishing idea marcus schneck patrio	East sports Harrisburg hunting fishing idea marcus schneck patrioke idea.
42	guided fly fishing muskegon river trout	River muskegon trout guided fly fishery.
42	crappie fishing wild fish recipe fishing tip minnesota fishing news wi	Harvesting wild crayfish fishing advice Minnesota fishing fishing news wi new.
42	south indian river fishing report snook fishing pretty quiet jetty	The fishing in the south of l'apos; India was practiced on a rather quiet pier.
42	gear salmon fishing	Fishing gear salmon fishery.
42	fishing report feb surf pier richie knuth fishin shack heard thi	Fishing report February surf wharf Richie Knuth Fishin Shack heard it was there.
42	fly fishing kunaplaza kunaplaza	Fly fishing kunaplaza kunaplaza kunaplaza.
42	wind blowing east amazing fishing nearby island gonna plan trip catch barracuda	The wind blowing from l'apos; is amazing fishing near l'apos; island will plan a trip catching barracuda.
42	fishing hunting pike year sam biever rice lake caught inch northern pike fis	Sam biever rice lake was caught in northern pike in the year of the pike hunt.
42	canada fly fishing canada fly fishing free online article directory submit article top author top	Fly fishing in Canada Fly fishing in the open air Directory of tips; online articles submit the tips; article 1st author.
42	fact fly fishing rod overstock	Facts on the fly fishing rod surplus.
42	ice fishing social medium explosion	Ice fishing social medium explosion.
42	simple tip holding white koi fish pond	A simple tip containing a white koi fish pond.
42	flambeau outdoors bazuka pro rod case florida fishing tip wfnewshinged door ea	Flame at the apos; outside Bazuka floridian fishing case point again door ea hinge.
42	thought dolphin caught pearl hogy rigged oz jig head fish	J&apos believed dolphins caught pearls, hogy, oz, fish with jig heads.
42	brytec fly fishing box brytec fishing	Brytec brytec fly fishing box brytec peaches brytec peaches.
42	carp secret homemade fish bait recipe catch bigger carp pole bending time tested fish bait	The secret fish bait recipe of carp catches bigger fish.
42	discus fish secret review discus fish secret	Discus secret fish revisit discus fish secret discus fish secret fish.
42	fly fishing	Uh, fly fishing.
42	fishing warm weather fish cold front litening fish feed read fishingreports	Catch fish in cold weather, discard fish feed read fishing reports.
42	aquarium fish basic plant container garden pl	Pisces of fishes; basic aquarium garden garden.
42	cressi spear fishing america black snorkel	Throwing crescent-shaped fishes fishing the black snorkel of d' America.
42	sedative free whale fishing researcher tactic save endangered whale tangled	Free-ranging, sedative whaling research strategy to help rescue entangled, endangered whale whales.
42	southern oregon fly fishing club	Fly fishing club in southern Oregon.
42	connecting bass fishing	Connection of fishing fleets; bass.
42	interesting deep sea fishing knowing tide outdoors	Interesting deep sea fishing, knowing the tide at the outside.
42	patagonia fishing kayak beach hat size tag nr kayak wft newspatagonia fishing ka	Kayaking kayaking hat size tag nr kayak wft < unk > ka ka fishing atagonia.
42	fishing southwest ohio realtime article copious system air force job health care medic	Fisheries to the south-west of lapos; Ohio real-time article plentiful health care system; air doctor working.
42	news fishing derby today lake neshonoc west salem friend lake neshonoc ice day fishing der	New fishing derby today; lake oil neshonoc west salem friend lake neshonoc ice fishing day der neshonoc lake.
42	fly fishing catch day magnificent fishing lodge	Fly fishing day, magnificent fishing lodge.
42	check fish report fishmyrtlebeach	Check the beach fish reports.
42	virtual master real brings augmented reality fishing hand chris scott barrfishing nice	The real virtual master brings augmented reality hand fishing Chris Scott barrfishing Nice.
42	reel augmented reality fish human takara tomy fishing reel augmented reality	Reality augmented human fish takara tomy fishing reel augmented reality augmented.
42	calgary gal fish tank aquarium amp stand access price dropped	The price of fish; access to fish tank; fish tank; fish tank; Galician aquarium has fallen.
42	successful ice fishing perch depth finder successful ice	Successful discovery of ice fishing pole depth Successful discovery of ice.
42	vancouver men busted illegal ice fishing three ice fishing prohibited barbed hook ba	Vancouver men demolished illegal ice fishing boats three barbed-wire hooks prohibited by law.
42	sedative help free whale fishing whale oceanshash sedative help	A sedative to release whaling whales, a sedative for oceanic hash.
42	share bass fishing fayetteville	You can share the fishing with the perch in Fayetteville.
42	pro fisherman season shop learn tip great guy help teach fish skar	A professional fisherman learns stuff a good guy helps teach skar fish.
42	celebrity gossip start fly fishing	Well, celebrity gossip is starting to fly.
42	kaufmann streamborn northwest fly fishing blog st steelhead	Kaufmann s&apos's northern fly fishing blog-west titled steelhead.
42	fishing spot small fish soft bait	Fishing spot small soft bait fish.
42	fly fishing magazine guide	A fly fishing magazine guide.
42	fishing striped bass ll fight hard fish pull force lake norman st	Striped bass fishery ll fight hard fish draw force Lake Norman st.
42	gear salmon fishing	Fishing gear salmon fishery.
42	planning fly fishing trip	Plan fly fishing trip.
42	fishing tackle summary	A summary of fishing gear.
42	annual trout fishing derby set mckinney park department will host annual trout fishing derby	Each year, the service at McKinney Park will host an annual trout fishing tournament.
42	wild sport fishing sailfish mutton grouper shark wild sport fishing	Recreational wild fishing shark @-@mouton shark-blue mole Wild sports fishing.
42	cressi spear fishing america black snork america black cressi	Throwing of harpoon in crescent fishing boats; Black America tuba lapos; Black America black cressi black.
42	tip fishing salmon alaska	Salmon fishing tip from Alaska.
42	check week water fishing forecast	Check the fishing forecast for this week.
42	good fishing tip finding fish	Well, good fishing advice, finding some fish.
42	aquarium fish handbook tropical aquarium fish handbook tropical aquarium fish book discus bree	Handbook of fishes; aquarium fishes; tropical aquarium Book of fishes; tropical aquarium discus bree.
42	wanting fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter ad	Want fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter pub.
42	best worm bait fishing thom conroy helium	Best thom conroy helium fishing worm bait.
42	love fishing fly fishing reel hot seller ebay info	J' loves fishing with flies, fly fishing, ebay info salesman.
42	apalachicola florida fishing report	Fishing report of l'apos; Apalachicola florida.
42	minnesota walleye ice fishing good morning walleye fishing north eastern minnesota fishing	Minnesota Winter walleye ice fishing Hello North American walleye fishing-eastern Minnesota.
42	southwest fly fishing magazine	South fly fishing magazine-west.
42	crappie fishing hot percy priest wft newsanyone bass percy priest reall	Groundhog fishing for sexy percy priest announced that someone was the percy priest.
42	yell cast jr hartley ad digital era author search fly fishing book dj	Yell cast jr hartley and l' digital era author of the search for fishing fly DJ.
42	greatest walleye fishing trip canada	Best walleye fishing trip in Canada.
42	fishing piece pmd cycle top bottom fly assortment pale morning dun prolific hatche	Fishery item pmd cycle of the apos; assortment of upper light-dark flies morning prolific hat.
42	top spinning reel inshore salwater fishing	Begin inshore reel fishing in salt water.
42	bass pro shop rapala pro bass fishing rod peripheral rapala pro bass fishing rod peripheral list	Peripheral bass pro shop rapala pro bass fishing rods on the periphery of rapala pro bass.
42	poway hold youth fishing derby nathan scharn angler will chance test	Poway hold Young anglers at the fishing derby Nathan scharn fishing line will be tested.
42	big sport fishing lite android bjd production blog wft newsbig sport fishing	I'm a big sport fishing lite android bjd blog production wft newsbig sport fishing.
42	levelled fishing levelled fishing skill level runescape	Levelled fishing is a high level of fishing ability.
42	game fish seek ferret finding volunteer arizona game fish department offering rare opportuni	The fish-chat is looking for ferrets in the Arizona volunteer fish service, which offers rare fishing opportunities.
42	fishing delaware water gap national recreation area article delaware water gap national recreation	L' article on the national recreational zone of the recreational zone of the recreational zone of the delaware fishing zone.
42	neddesmond posted fishing pic tuesday quiz specie gofishn	Neddesmond posted this fishing photo on Tuesday's gofishn special.
42	tx fishing news coolfishing day guna fishing	Tx Fresh Day fishing news of cane fishing.
42	grant fishing smile set grant arizona game fish department ki	Grant fishing smile together deal Arizona Game Fish Department Ki.
42	carp carp fishing carp fishing usualy involves ultra light rig lb test small tr	Carp Fishing Carp fishing carp fishing is usually conducted on flat, ultra-light shapes.
42	fishing ski report detroit free press ice fishing continues heavy snow will travel	Detroit's fishing ski report, free of the press and on the fishing ice, continues to snow heavily.
42	fishing check special closeout item great fly fishing gear buy fishwest check	Fishing by fleets; help from fishers; a special fly fishing closure.
42	fishing find fly tying material tool cheap ebay info	Fly fishing find material link tool cheap ebay info on ebay.
42	fish casting bubble bet find	The fish throw bubbles d'apos; hope.
42	fly fishing photo essay canada greatest freshwater adventure explore canada greatest fly fishing adventu	Fly fishing photo essay Canada's greatest freshwater adventure Explore Canada's greatest fly fishing adventure.
42	type fishing rod	It's a fishing rod type.
42	extreme fishing kayak fishing monster fish bluewater jon bluewaterjon bluewater jon schwartz	Extreme fishing kayak fishing monster fish jon blue water jon blue jon blue water jon schwartz.
42	choosing fly fishing gear requires patience start	Choosing a fly fishing gear requires patience.
42	fishing report jetty beach good weather brought handful surf fishe	Jetty Beach The good weather brought a handful of fish to the surf.
42	good info fishing team winner	The winner of the news fishing team is a good IT guy.
42	england fishing community current management system broken edf	Anxiety, the management system of the fishing community; Anxiety, l' Antivirus, l' Aneurysm.
42	caught lb pike flick fishing flickfishing	J' caught pike in an angling movie.
42	missouri fly fishing website	Missouri fly fishing site.
42	wanting fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter good ad	Want fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter good advertising.
42	mainenance fishing rod preserving rod read	D'apos hand fishing rod; fishing rod preservation work.
42	proper fishing tackle catch fish dream	Fish fishing, fish fishing, fish fishing, dream fishing.
42	fishing tackle field stream store hook poking tip barb wine	It's a good idea to go fishing in the mountains.
42	fly lt gt fishing lt gt film tour showing providing comfy winter escape	Fly fishing and the filming of Apos, a film showcasing a comfortable winter escape route.
42	pm pm hosting baited sea fishing contest prize st	Pm mp hosting the baited sea fishing contest st prizes st.
42	pocketwatch posted ice fishing shack lake tomahawk	The pocket watch showed Tomahawk Lake's ice fishing cabin.
42	best fly fishing website	The best fly fishing site in the world.
42	fishing lure bait rig crankbait crankbaits floating lure diving lip bill	Fishing lure bait crankbaits floating grankbait bait lures the beak-of plunging hare.
42	fishing report jan illinois winter steelhead fishing good driftboaters cop	Fishing report Jan illinois winter rainbow trout-en-sky arc-en-sky fishing good canoe policeman drifting.
42	session mayo mark people myselfduration pm pmtide started angling fishing	Session mayonnaise mark people me-same duration pm pmtide started angling.
42	florida top freshwater fishing destination	The main freshwater fishing destination is Florida.
42	md striped bass fishing season early	Start of striped bass fishing season at the beginning of the season.
42	cold water aquarium fish water temperature factor consider choosing fish	Water temperature factor; water temperature; fish aquarium; cold water for fish.
42	toyota texas bass classic continue support texas park wildlife department athens toyota texas	Toyota Texas classic continue to support the park texas department of wildlife athens toyota texas.
42	toledo bend report chicken coop providing hot crappie action love bass fishing bu	To fold report chicken Coop provide hot action marmot of l' love of bass fishing drunken.
42	gear salmon fishing	Fishing gear salmon fishery.
42	fishing rapala original floater fishing lure original floating rapala fished fishingkahuna	The fishing for the original floating rapala, fishing for the original rapala floating the fishing for kahuna.
42	annual ice fishing extravaganza draw hundred annual jig ice fishing extravaganza held wee	The annual ice fishing extravaganza draws 100 pounds annually from extravaganza ice fishing kept small.
42	gallon fish tank rutherfordton gallon fish tank bought year didnt long month	Rutherfordton gallon aquarium gallon fish tank bought year n' not long.
42	caught lb blue marlin flick fishing flickfishing	J' caught blue marlin in an angling movie.
42	mainenance fishing rod preserving rod read	D'apos hand fishing rod; fishing rod preservation work.
42	patrick asks obama intervene fishing regulation dispute	Patrick asked Obama to intervene in the dispute over fishing regulations.
42	interesting fishing remains good rest week lt lt	A good week's rest is an interesting fishing experience.
42	best deal fishing bait lure ebay best price	Best market fishing lure ebay best price.
42	fish stock exploited thirty percent fish stock monitored fao depleted	The fish stock exploited a 30% fish stock and monitored its depletion.
42	reading girl guide hunting fishing	Girl reading guide to fishing hunting.
42	channel cat north american fly fishing forum dual purpose thread figure post	North Chemin chat-U.S. fly fishing double purpose forum dual purpose mail thread figure.
42	fishin break fishing fish	Broken fish fish fishing fish fish.
42	spartan newsletter spartan fishing team ihsa bass fishing high	Bulletin d' information spartan fishing team ihsa high-end fishing.
42	platypus dead illegal fishing net animal environment fishing	Ornithorynut dead, illegal fishing nets, animal environment.
42	catchcatfish posted fishing video bait hook shad gofishn	Fish-cat posted fishing video bait gofishn gofishn bait.
42	steven wright year fishing salvador dali dotted caught fish	Steven l&apos, the year of El Salvador's fishing season.
42	tip fly fishing brook trout stream manual angler ten tip fly	Fly fishing at l'apos; brook trout Manual angling at the 10-point line.
42	post pet care aquarium fish care basic thing beginner review complete guide tropical aquar	After pet care aquarium fish basic care basic thing begin to review tropical guide complete aquar.
42	reel report bass bite best thing going absence fishing graphic today good	The report of the low bite best of l'apos; no graphical fishing today; good fishing oil.
42	fishing live bait	We're fishing live bait.
42	charge fee saltwater fishing license	Fee charged Saltwater fishing licenses.
42	fishing relaxing rejuvenating sport fishing relaxing sport solo	Recreation fishing rejuvenation sport fishing relaxation sport only.
42	good set fish stock cleaned ich tank fish today community tank	A good fish stock cleaned fish from the community's fish tank today.
42	st augustine travel guide florida fishing licence online travel florida usa tour tourism news vacation tip	St Augustine travel guide Florida online fishing license travel Florida use tour tour tourist vacation tip vacation.
42	update fly fishing tip beginner ultimate guide learn fly fish pro	Update Beginning fly fishing advice ultimate guide learn fish fly pro fish.
42	spinner fishing trout proven system tackle technique strategy catching trout learn	Proven technique for fishing trout in line d'apos; wait The trout fishing technique learns.
42	fishing news freshest fishing content delivered directly browser matter web	Fisheries news latest fishing content delivered directly to the web browser material.
42	pound test bass fishing rod yahoo answer	Fishing bass fishing rod response; impound trial.
42	news photo gallery fly fishing marlboro	Photo gallery of new marlboro fishing flies.
42	fishing report fishnotes caught bass gofishn	Some fishing notes have caught gofishn bass.
42	best book aquarium owner book best gain knowledge subject fish	Better book owner of the aquarium delivers better d' acquire knowledge subject fish.
42	fly fishing largemouth bass tip manual fly fishing largemouth bass tip lisa gove break st	Fly fishing Tip of the tongue; largemouth bass Manual fly fishing L' largemouth bass L' largemouth bass.
42	tackle buy fishing fishing	Buy a fishing boat-yourself.
42	water sport fishing holden beach vacation rental travel holdenbeach	Boat fishing Holden vacation rental at beach holden beach beach beach beach holden beach.
42	fly box folly north american fly fishing forum ongoing effort achieve system perfection	The forum on fly fishing in North America, a flybox madness, continues its efforts to achieve system perfection.
42	fishing north coast weather steelhead caught	Rainbow trout fishing-in-sky arc-in-sky of the north coast captured.
42	catch fish banjo minnow	Fishing banjo minnow fish.
42	south indian river february fishing forecast	February fishing forecast in the south of India.
42	fish umbra fishhotel aquarium umbra fishhotel award winning modern finned friend mo	Fish umbra fishhotel aquarium umbra fishhotel award-winning modern finning friend.
42	fish recipe cleaning preparation fillet round fish	Fish recipe, cleaning preparation round fish net.
42	variety freshwater aquarium fish	Vary the fish in the freshwater aquarium.
42	tbf flw outdooors introduce national high school fishing program national high school fishing program	Tbf flw outdooors introduce national fishing program of l' high school national fishing program of l' high school.
43	cnn al wrap hu visit cnn jaime florcruz served time magazine long time bureau	CNN al wrap hu visit CNN Jaime Florcruz served time magazine long desktop office.
43	powell hu visit success yep powell suck turncoat	Powell hu visit success yep powell suck renegade.
43	hu jintao meet obama china relation today time	Hu jintao meet Obama China relationship today; time.
43	china praise hu trip fruitful yahoo news	China praise hu trip yahoo news successful yahoo.
43	chinese president lost translation powerful leader meet expect tran	The Chinese president has lost the translation powerful leader meet wait-you tran.
43	china half import tax consumer electronics president hu news china will halve	China half tax; mass-market e-import president hu news China half China half.
43	summit obama praised china reducing tension korea china deal nk shelling	Summit Obama praised china as a means of reducing tension in South Korea.
43	hu jintao visit fails thaw chinese relation north korea	Hu jintao visit fails Chinese North relationship defrost-Korean.
44	love good upcycle starbucks terrifying trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Love good upcycle Starbucks terrifying trenta glass containing entire bottle of wine.
44	gross starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Starbucks trenta cup contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	filler starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Starbucks trenta fill cup contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	starbucks terrifying trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Starbucks terrifying trenta cup contains entire wine bottle.
44	starbucks trenta hold entire bottle wine people cougartown	Starbucks trenta contains a whole bottle of people cougartown wine.
44	wine problem solved starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Wine problem solved Starbucks trenta cup full bottle of wine.
44	definitely nuit blanche starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Definitely white night Starbucks trenta cup containing an entire bottle of wine.
44	starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine ounce room spare	The Starbucks trenta cup contains a bottle of wine.
44	te boozing news starbucks huge trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	L' Starbucks enormous cup of trenta liquor contains entire bottle of wine.
44	starbucks cup hold entire bottle wine	Starbucks cup contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	guy starbuck cup size trenta hold entire bottle wine	The guy Starbuck cup size trenta contains entire bottle of wine.
44	thought sbux couldn fantastic starbucks huge trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	I thought sbux could fantastic Starbucks huge trenta cup bottle of whole wine.
44	venti trenta starbuck ounce supersize offer crazy fb	Venti trenta starbuck onces supersize offer fb crazy fb.
44	news day starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Today's Starbucks trenta cup news contains entire bottle of wine.
44	seriously wonder american overweight starbucks trenta cup unhealthy detail	I seriously wonder if American Starbucks overweight trenta cup unhealthy details.
44	american wine glass hairpin starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	The American wine glass hairpin Starbucks trenta cup contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	bigger beverage bigger american gottlieb memorial hospital loyola university health system	Biggest drink American Gottlieb memorial hospital Loyola University health system.
44	case needed reason love trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Case need reason l' love cup Trenta contain an entire bottle of wine.
44	dangerous starbucks cup hold bottle wine watch	The dangerous Starbucks cup holds the wine watch bottle.
44	trenta cup hold entire bottle wine wrong	The trenta cup contains the entire bottle of wine.
44	vooov starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Vooov Starbucks trenta cup contains entire bottle of wine.
44	starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine random starbucks trenta college	Starbucks trenta cup contains an entire bottle of random Starbucks trenta college wine.
44	hahaha good news wino starbucks trenta hold bottle	Hahaaha good news Wino Starbucks trenta hold bottle.
44	starbucks trenta size hold entire bottle wine drink	The starbucks trenta size contains whole wine bottles.
44	fit entire bottle wine starbucks trenta scary	The entire bottle of Starbucks wine is scary.
44	starbucks trenta size hold entire bottle wine god bless america	Starbucks trenta size contains entire bottle of God bless America wine.
44	don care starbucks trenta cup bigger stomach	Don't worry Starbucks trenta cup bigger stomach.
44	tanning iced coffee tazo iced tea hello trenta	Taco tanned iced coffee tazo iced tea hello trenta.
44	starbucks size trente hold entire bottle wine enjoy	Starbucks size 30 hold entire bottle of wine enjoy.
44	starbucks trenta hold entire bottle wine	Starbucks trenta wine contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	excess best omg starbucks huge trenta sized drink hold entire bottle wine	An excess of Starbucks all the best huge-sized drink Trenta contains entire bottle of wine.
45	justin bieber jon stewart body snatching victim video	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart removed the video of the victim and died.
45	fantastic wonderful	Yes, wonderful and fantastic.
45	biebs switch body jon stewart	Biebs switching body Jon Stewart.
45	justin bieber jon stewart exchange role mtv news quote day	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart exchange the role mtv new day of quotation.
46	read goldman sachs manipulated red light photo industry geico ticket higher insurance rate	L'read Goldman sachs manipulated red light photo industry geico ticket d' higher insurance.
46	legal news study red light camera save life nwindiana	The legal news study red light camera save nwindiana life.
46	traffic depot update oceanside green light red light camera ticket traffic	Updating of traffic depot on edge of island; ocean, green light, red light, camera ticket.
46	oceanside will install additional red light camera mid march camera helpful hurtful	Oceanside will install an additional red light camera in the middle of the walk.
46	traffic depot update study city red light camera fewer fatal accident traffic camera	Traffic depot update study red city less deadly traffic camera red camera accident.
46	study red light camera save life	Study red light camera save life.
46	biggest drop fatal crash involving red light running chandler ariz death dropped	Biggest fatality involving a red light running towards Chandler Ariz's death fell.
46	deadly red light camera return va	A deadly red light camera will return.
46	red light camera save life budget star ledger editorial board star ledger file photored ligh	Red camera saves life, budget ledger, editorial board ledger, grand book of stars, photogenic light.
47	lady army health initiative model fitness nutrition usa today	L' women's health initiative of the Army model fitness nutrition used today; hui.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta bob keefe washington lady michelle obama planning travel	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta Bob Keefe Washington Lady Michelle Obama is planning a trip.
47	obama praise military healthy initiative lady michelle obama visited army largest training	Obama praises it; healthy military initiative Lady Michelle Obama visited the army's largest formation.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta lady discus childhood obesity atl	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta female disco; atl childhood obesity.
47	lady press ahead fitness campaign fort jackson sc obama battling childh	Women hurry the fitness campaign Fort Jackson Sc Obama fighting childhh.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta	Michelle Obama's coming to Atlanta.
47	michelle obama visit army find whip couch potato shape	Michelle Obama visits the apos; army find whipped potato shape.
47	lady press ahead fitness campaign daily caller obama tell abc good morning america	Women press the daily fitness campaign urging Obama to say hello to America.
47	michelle obama atlanta move campaign	Michelle Obama d' Atlanta, campaign to move.
47	lady obama call move fitness nutrition campaign national	Lady Obama calls it a national fitness promotion campaign.
47	uk news lady take campaign childhood obesity army base	UK journalist @-@United takes military base in campaign against childhood obesity.
47	healthy skepticism wal mart healthy push michelle obama partnered wal mart	A healthy skepticism goes hand in hand with a healthy Michelle Obama push.
47	lady focus military family childhood nutrition overstatement chi	Woman of military family concentration on food; childhood chi over-nutrition chi.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta washington lady michelle obama planning travel atlanta	Michelle Obama is coming to Atlanta, Washington Lady Michelle Obama is planning a trip to Atlanta.
47	walmart embrace lady nutrition campaign	Walmart s' engages in women's nutrition campaign.
47	lady army health initiative model fitness nutrition mimi hall usa today time	L' women's health initiative; model fitness armour mimi hall used today; time; time.
48	three journalist tf detained cairo jan mubarak egypt egipto fb	Three Cairo detained journalists Jan Mubarak egypt egipto fb egypt fb.
48	update al jazeera english reporting egypt security police arrested al jazeera arabic bureau clief aj journalist cairo	Al-Jazira in English reports that Egyptian security police arrested ajairo journalist from the Arabic bureau d' al-Jazira.
48	foreign secretary described intimidation harassment journalist unacceptable egypt	The Minister of Foreign Affairs described the attitude of the Egyptian journalist toward harassment and intimidation as unacceptable.
48	egypt journalist targeted hilton hotel cairo pro mubarak supporter led army rio	Egyptian journalist targeted Hilton Hotel Cairo pro Mubarak supporter led by Rio Army.
48	list journalist attacked egypt	The list journalist attacked Apos, Egypt.
48	attack journalist escalate egypt	A journalist from D' an attack on Egypt.
48	yikes list journalist attacked egypt hour abc news	Yikes list journalist attacked Egyptian hour abc news abc.
48	nut war medium continues al jazeera journalist arrested cairo camera equipment seized egypt jan aljazeera	Egyptian journalist d' Al-Jazira has stopped Cairo camera equipment seized in Egypt Jan al-Jazira.
48	guardian journalist arrested beaten egypt	Guard journalist arrested l' beaten Egypt.
48	day bloody clash egypt foreign journalist arrested	D'apos day; Egyptian foreign journalist arrested bloody clash.
48	alarabiya crew attacked pro mubarak protester cairo egypt	L' Apos crew; Alarabiya attacked pro protester Mubarak cairo egypt.
48	thing rapidly degenerating egypt attack journalist cairo egypt	What is rapidly degenerating is the attack on the Egyptian journalist on Cairo.
48	journalist harassed attacked detained cairo nigh cnn ben wedema	Journalist harassed attacked detained in Cairo near cnnnn ben wedema.
48	al jazeera english journalist released detained equipment held	English journalist d' Al Jazeera released detained material.
48	reporter including cnn cooper beaten egypt manila bulletin newspaper online	Journalist whose CNN Cooper has beaten the online Egyptian newspaper Manila.
48	ap journalist attacked mob detained cairo damn liberal medium front line history	Ap journalist attacked detained cairo mafia fucking liberal media from l' frontline story.
48	list journalist hurt harassed egypt	The list journalist has been harassing Egypt.
48	egypt crack foreign journalist guardian jan	The guardian of the foreign journalist Jan.
48	horrible journalist attacked detained egypt yahoo news	L' horrible journalist attacked the detained Egyptian yahoo news.
48	journalist beaten threatened egypt	A journalist who was beaten threatened Apos; Egypt with death.
48	ahmed mansour prominent journalist beaten arrested egypt aljazeera jan	Egypt Aljazeera Jan was arrested by prominent journalist Ahmed Mansour, who was beaten.
48	ki medium journalist egypt targeted beaten detained mubarak support	Middle ki Egyptian journalist targeted beaten detained Mubarak support.
48	attack journalist send message lt gt cnbc twitter lt gt	Attack sends a message to gt cnbc twitter gt gt.
48	reporter attacked attack journalist send message	A journalist d' attack journalist d' attack d' attack journalist j' sent a message to the apos; help d' message.
48	security news medium fire egypt	Egyptian fire media security news.
48	reporting arrest journalist cairo	Newspaper in a state of repair; arrest in Cairo.
48	journalist attacked cairo journalist covering scene ground target	A journalist attacked a Cairo journalist who was occupying ground targets.
48	condemns attack journalist egypt ap ap white house spokesman robert gibbs systematic	Condemns the journalist d' Egyptian attack Robert Gibbs, portal-White House word.
48	reporter egypt broad assault	Egyptian reporter launched a full-scale assault.
48	mt committee protect journalist rpts st journo die covering egypt jan	The committee to protect journalists s' occupies Egyptian journalists.
48	journalist targeted pro mubarak force egypt video	The journalist targeted Mubarak's force video in Egypt.
48	egypt turn internet long broadcast violence strongarms journalist leave	Egypte Internet tour long duration of violence dissemination, journalists d' handguns leave.
48	mte time cpj journalist targeted egypt	Mte time cpj journalist targeted Egypt.
48	network anchor leave egypta amid crackdown increased violence intimidation directed journalist	L' anchor of the channel leaves the apos; egypta in a context of increased repression of violence directed against intimidating journalists.
48	journalist beaten website blocked amid protest egypt cpj	Blocked blogger blocked amid Egyptian protest cpjj.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist jpost	The Egyptian army began rounding up journalist Jpost.
48	canadian journalist detained harassed foreign journalist targeted cairo	Canadian journalist detained harassed foreign journalist targeted Cairo.
48	cpj egypt instigates medium blackout police target journalist	Cpj egypt causes average blackout of target police journalist.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist egyptian military rounded journalist thursday	The Egyptian army begins rounding up Egyptian military journalists for a meeting on Thursday.
48	ynet egypt police target reporter israel	Ynet egypt target police reporter israel israel.
48	egyptian demonstrator attack journalist cnn will madness	Egyptian journalist de l'apos; attack d'apos; a protester will go mad.
48	risk taker mike cairo january afp egypt police arrest al jazeera english journalist channel	Risk taking mike Cairo Afp Egyptian police arrest al Jazeera English TV channel al Jazeera.
48	list journalist threatened attacked detained reporting egypt	The list journalist threatened to assassinate prisoners in Egypt.
48	gang hunt journalist right worker egypt nytimes jatkhs	Gang-hunting journalist, right-wing worker and egypto-jatkhs sometimes jatkhs.
48	french journalist arrested cairo	French journalist arrested Cairo.
48	skipped romanian crew journalist threatened attacked detained reporting egypt	A Romanian crew journalist dropped threatening to assault a prisoner who is bringing home the apo; Egypt.
48	egypt protest gauntlet officer beating stick	Egyptian protest gantelet officer beating stick.
48	journalist attacked detained egypt big hollywood	The journalist attacked the fat Hollywood man held in Egypt.
48	happy changed headline egyptian protester attack foreign journalist prejudicial	Happy title change Egyptian protester attacks damaging foreign journalist.
48	engel today egyptian unrest continues journalist targeted egypt jan	L' agitation egyptian d' today; hui continua The journalist targeted the Egyptian Jan.
48	journalist van trouw mishandeld ro nieuws	Journalist van trouw mishandeld ro nieuws.
48	egyptian journalist dy gunshot wound egyptian reporter shot clash week ago died	Egyptian journalist DY Gunshot wound Egyptian journalist was shot and died a week ago.
48	journalist egypt brutally silenced equipment confiscated freedom press	Egyptian journalists brutally silenced equipment confiscated from the free press.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist egypt jan medium journalist	The Egyptian army begins arresting Egyptian journalist Jan Middleman.
48	guardian journalist arrested beaten alongside protester egypt secretly record ordeal	A journalist arrested beaten alongside of apos; an Egyptian protester secretly records the proof.
48	al jazeera journalist detained cairo police hotel room equipment confiscated jan	Al Jazeera detained in Cairo, Apos room equipment; police hotel was confiscated Jan.
48	cbc news foreign journalist attacked egypt	CBC foreign journalists attacked l'apos; Egypt.
48	american journalist bloodied detained egyptian force dozen foreign journalist egypt attac	American journalist bloodied detained Egyptian force dozens of foreign Egyptian journalists attacked.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist	L' Egyptian army starts gathering journalists.
48	foreign policy day hunting journalist ashraf khalil	On foreign policy day, journalist Ashraf Khalil hunts.
48	yikes egyptian army start rounding journalist	L' Egyptian army starts arresting journalists.
48	journalist attacked detained egypt rtdna condemns assault	The journalist attacked detained Egyptian rtdna condemns the aggression.
48	breaking al jazeera journalist arrested cairo egypt crowd grows tahrir	Arresting journalist d' Al Jazeera in Cairo Egyptian crowd cultivates tahrir.
48	al jazeera english journalist freed cairo state dep asked release egypt jan	Al Jazeera, a British journalist released from Cairo, called for the release of Jan Egyptien.
48	desperate gasp dying regime list journalist detained beaten egypt	The desperate list of dying regime journalist detained beaten in Egypt.
48	amazing guardian journalist record audio arrest transport egypt police van jan	Incredible journalist guard tapes apos; audio arrest transport of the Egyptian police van Jan.
48	list journalist beaten jailed missing	List of beaten journalists missing in prison.
48	extraordinary stuff arrested beaten egypt police	Something extraordinary has been arrested has beaten the Egyptian police.
48	abc news compiled list journalist threatened attacked detained egypt	The abc news compiled a list of journalists threatened with apo attacks; Egypt detained.
48	bloodied beaten bbc journalist camera report going hospital egypt democracynow	BBC's battered and bloody journalist camera reports that the Egyptian hospital is now a democracy.
48	wash post tweet cairo bureau chief photographer reportedly arrested egypt	The Cairo office's chief photographer reportedly arrested l'apos; Egypt.
48	mubarak silencing voice egypt journalist targeted read jan tahrir	Mubarak silent voice Egyptian journalist targeted read Jan tahrir Jan tahrir.
48	egyptian military rounding journalist egypt pm issue apology star egypt live blog jan	L' Egyptian army rounded Egyptian journalist pm d' apology star Egyptian live blog Jan.
48	reporter attacked attack journalist send message	A journalist d' attack journalist d' attack d' attack journalist j' sent a message to the apos; help d' message.
48	hillary clinton egypt state hillary clinton treatment journalist coveri	Hillary Clinton in Egypt Hillary clinton treatment journalist coveri cover.
48	clinton bugun misir hk nededi secretary clinton condemns attack demonstrator journalist egypt vide jan	The clinton bugun betir hk nededi clinton secretary condemns the apos; attack Egyptian demonstration journalist Jan video.
48	fox news correspondent beaten hospitalized fleeing molotov cocktail egypt video treated spy military	Correspondent for Fox News hospitalized fleeing the cocktail Molotov Egyptian video treated military espionage.
48	journalist return central cairo threat remain	The threat from the returning journalist remains central.
48	catalan tv team foreign journalist detained military police cairo	Catalan television team detained by the military police in Cairo.
48	pro mubarak rioter chase reporter cairo hotel beaten threatened beheading	Pro Mubarak Rioter Chase reporter cairo hotel is threatened with beheading.
49	espn nba celtic kendrick perkins knee surgery will season debut tuesday cavalier celtic	Kendrick Perkins celtic espn nba celtic knee surgery will be the first season on the Celtic horse Tuesday.
49	sending prayer marquis daniel boston celtic pray going okxo	To send marquis prayers Daniel Boston Celtic pray okxo.
49	ainge team month nba trade deadline celtic president basketball	A month ago; NBA team deadline; Celtic basketball president exchange-ball.
49	videotwitter net boston celtic kendrick perkins play cleveland cavalier kendrick perkins coming	Video net Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins play Cleveland cavalier Kendrick Perkins come.
49	uploaded youtube video nba final lakers celtic game memory highlig	J&apos have uploaded youtube video nba final lakers celtic game memory highlig.
49	tceltics davis leaf game sun sore hamstring boston celtic nbanewsfeed	Tceltics davis soothing sun game hamstring boston celtic nbanewsfeed foliage.
49	celtic marquis daniel leaf game stretcher	Celtic marquis Daniel Buttercup stretcher game.
49	boston celtic kendrick perkins play cleveland cavalier ad	Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins will play Cleveland Cavalier Adventure.
49	boston celtic jermaine neal arthroscopic knee surgery recovery period week espn nba	Boston celtic jermaine neal arthroscopic knee surgery period spn nba week.
49	doc river ll wait chris forsberg boston celtic captain paul pierce departed thursday	Doc River II is expecting Chris Berg Boston Celtic, and Captain Paul Pierce departed Thursday.
50	half men charlie sheen lost teeth	Half of Charlie Sheen's men have lost teeth in the process.
50	exclusive charlie sheen doesn rehab charlie sheen refusing enter reh	Charlie Sheen does not re-educate Charlie Sheen refusing to enter re-education.
50	television network cbs write episode half men include charlie sheen	The TV cbs write episode mi-men include charlie sheen.
50	drug rehab work charlie sheen reportedly receiving help clearest benefit pat	They say that Charlie Sheen's rehab work got some help.
50	porn star kacey jordan wild charlie sheen party scene ve destructive	The porn star kacey jordan jordan wild charlie sheen scene-destruction party.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	Charlie Sheen leaf medical emergency at the hospital.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	Charlie Sheen leaf medical emergency at the hospital.
50	charlie sheen rehabs filed charlie sheen nurse	Charlie sheen dropped off charlie sheen nursing.
50	teamfollowback charlie sheen rehab tv hold los angeles reuters half aday	L' team follows Charlie Sheen Rehab on TV and holds up Los Angeles Reuters at mi @-@time.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	Charlie Sheen leaf medical emergency at the hospital.
50	charlie sheen abuse	Well, Charlie Sheen's pushing it.
50	charlie sheen abuse	Well, Charlie Sheen's pushing it.
50	dtn hollywood charlie sheen troubled timeline charlie sheen trouble pretty alw	Dtn Hollywood Charlie Sheen... troubled in time Charlie troubled in time.
50	whatproblem charlie sheen enter rehab cbs halt production hit series	What a problem Charlie Sheen getting into rehab cbs stopping production hit series.
50	hollywood charlie sheen men team help biggest star	L' team d' Hollywood Charlie Sheen helps the biggest star in the world.
50	sky news charlie sheen enters rehab hospital well	Heavenly news Charlie Sheen enters rehab hospital.
50	charlie rating soar big bonus short rehab	Charlie's evaluation makes the rehab bonus skyrocket.
51	death rock roll sunday farmer market sunday farmer market crisis bu	Death rock roll on Sunday farmer market on Sunday farmer market on farmer drunk market crisis Sunday.
51	molto vega farmer market shut county	The Molto Vega farmers' market shut the county down.
51	love farmer market long beach	J' loves long beach of farmers market.
52	djokovic murray australian open title ap	Djokovic Australian Murray open title ap ap.
52	murray congratulation djokovic winning men australianopen championship nice work going bed	Murray congratulations djokovic winning men australianopen championship beautiful work go to bed.
52	yr russian won australian open	Your Russian won the apos; Open d' Australia.
52	djokovic murray australian open final interesting match novak	Djokovic Australian Murray Open interesting novak final match.
52	long awaited era djokovic australianopen replay	L' era long awaited djokovic australian open replay australian open replay.
52	murray miss open title	Murray misses the open headline.
52	novak djokovic win australian open well deserved played amazing couldn help feel andy murray	Novak djokovic win Australian open play well deserved surprisingly might help to feel Andy Murray.
52	djokovic murray australian open title ap	Djokovic Australian Murray open title ap ap.
52	tennis star hoping third time lucky scottish tennis star andy murray set break duck grand	Tennis star hopes Scottish tennis star Andy Murray staged the big break duck for the third time.
52	don djokovic pleb tennis equivalent bum fucking murray moment australianopen	Don djokovic pleb tennis equivalent bum fucking moment australianopen murray.
52	win djokovic won australian open	To win djokovic won Australian Open.
52	holy ball bloody omg novak djokovic australian open	Name d' saint, name d' an Australian novak djokovic open.
52	yeahboy nadal australianopen djokovic murray	Yeahboy nadal australianopen djokovic murray.
52	djokovic murray australian open ap	Australia's Djokovic Murray open ap ap open.
52	murray djokovic happened	Murray Djokovic s&apos is the name of the company.
52	novak australian open champion	Australian champion d' novak opening.
52	murray play final pressure	Murray play final pressure.
52	game set match novak djokovic grand slam defend	Game set match novak djokovic grand slam defend.
52	watch australian open men tennis final live online will history andy murray	Watching the Australian men's tennis finals live online will be Andy Murray's story.
52	congratulation novak djokovic winning australian open tennis final melbourne played fantastic game	Congratulations novak djokovic winner Open tennis final Melbourne played a fantastic game.
52	open golf djokovic murray australian open title cbc	Open golf djokovic murray Australian title open cbc.
52	mouratoglou murray djokovic classic yahoo	Deathoglou murray djokovic classic yahoo yahoo.
52	australian open final novak djokovic andy murray live blog bleacher report contributor scott	Australian open novak final djokovic Andy Murray live blog blacher report contributor scott.
52	andy murray australian open final will face djokovic atptennis yeg	Andy Murray Australian Open Final will face djokovic atptennis yeg.
52	andy murray loses australian open final tennis ausopen	Andy Murray loses the Australian open tennis finals.
52	tennis murray set djokovic final andy murray battle reach australian open men single	Tennis Murray set djokovic final Andy Murray battle to reach open Australian men singles.
52	murray mania sweep uk good luck message flood andy murray scottish tennis star play	Murray Mania sweeps uk good luck flood message Andy Murray Scot Scottish tennis star game.
52	djokovic british hope fading usual sorus murray	Djokovic l' British hope s' habitual murray sorus.
52	djokovic thrash murray win australian open	Djokovic Thrash Murray win open Australian.
52	australian open grand slam final live djokovic win rmang	Australian grand open slam final live djokovic win rmang rmang.
52	tennis murray crushed djokovic awesomeness murray clinch st break point hope alive	Tennis Murray crushed djokovic awesome Murray clinch St break point hope alive.
52	congrats novak djokovic played brilliant tennis definitely deserve title	Congratulations novak djokovic played brilliant tennis deserves the title.
52	dreamed men ship game ausopen murray djokovic great showdown	Ausopen Murray Djokovic, the game of l&apos, went through a great ordeal.
52	djokovic win second set leading stage murray mum shell shocked	Djokovic win second murray mum shell plateau shocked.
52	novak djokovic champion australian open	Novak djokovic Australian champion open for business.
52	novak won australian open champion gotta beat champion	Novak won Australian open champion must beat champion.
52	murray djokovic battle fill vacuum	Murray Djokovic's battle fills the void.
52	djokovic longer slam wonder novak djokovic enjoyed crushing australian open final triumph andy murray	Djokovic longer slam merveille novak djokovic enjoyed Andy Murray's overwhelming open final triumph.
52	australian open men final andy murray novak djokovic	Final Australian open men Andy Murray Novak djokovic.
52	tomorrow australian open tennis final men andy murray navok djojovic ganna win murray fan murray	Tomorrow Australian open tennis final men and Murray Navok djojovic ganna win Murray fan murray.
53	love khloe kardashian	J' adore the Khloe Kardashian.
53	hate kim kardashian snookie funny	I hate kim kardashian snookie fun.
53	keeping wit kardashians mystery hollywood dead	Kardashians' spirit, Kardashians mystery Hollywood dead.
53	ohhh kardashians will fav stupid	Ohhh kardashians will favor stupid.
53	eye will definetely glued tv screen love kardashians	L' eye permanently glued TV screen loves kardashians kardashians.
53	going watch keeping kardashians love	Go watch the kardashian like kardashian.
53	kardashian family	Hey, Kardashian family.
53	wished looked lucy hale kourtney kardashian pretty	J' wished Lucy Hale Kurtney Kardashian looked pretty.
53	kardashian love yu sooooo	Kardashian t&apos, love so much.
53	shoutout lmao kim kardashian real live slut	Shout lmao kim kardashian real live bitch.
53	love kardashians	J' loves the game of kardashian.
53	sunday episode kktny crazy	Sunday episode kktny crazy.
53	kardashians suicide bomb fuck outta shit hate entire internet	Kardashians kamikaze suicide bombers kamikaze suicide bombers.
53	doesn kim kardashian	Is-what Kim Kardashian kim kardashian is.
53	keeping kardashians family love	Keep it together; love the family Kardashians.
53	fave kardashian phillyblack fuckin hate khloe kardashian	Foi kardashian phillyblack whore hates khloe kardashian kardashian khloe.
53	love kim kardashian ur hot wooohoooo lol	J' love kim kardashian ur hot woooooo-o-ol.
53	kardashians pier morgan stupid answer question perfect	Kardashians pier morgan stupid answer perfect question.
53	bruce will fave kardashian lol	Bruce will avoid Kardashian Lol.
53	dont imma kourtney kim khloe fave interested	The kourtney kim khloe khloe is interesting.
53	kinda wished lived life kim kardashian	I wish Kim Kardashian had lived her life.
53	watching material keeping kardashians lol love	Watch material keep kardashians lol love.
53	hey kris big fan watch kardashian lot love day	Hi Kris big fan watch kardashian lot love day of l' love.
53	lovee thee kardashians lt hehe seasonn nee episode righhht noww watch watch watch lt	I am loving you, Kardashian, c' it is time to watch this episode.
53	kardashian love mami	Kardashian is in love with mami.
53	love kardashian doll fave doll khloe gt	J' loves kardashian and khloe gt dolls.
53	loved larry good pier thought kardashians bimbo type fun loving great kudos	J' liked Larry Pier thought kardashians bimbo fun type liking big kudos.
53	love kardashian	J' love Kardashian, love it.
53	love kourtney kardashian	J' adores the Kurtney Kardashian.
53	watching kourtney kim khloe loving waiting forever	I mean, watching kourtney kim khloe like to wait forever.
53	kim kardashian fine piece bubble butted sweetness love stuck	Kim Kardashian beautiful piece bubble butted sweetness stuck.
53	joined totally loving khloe kardashian	J' joined the khloe kardashian totally in love.
53	ahh kardashians craziest family television	Ahh Kardashians family television craziest.
53	doesn watch kardashians	He doesn't watch the Kardashians.
53	watching keeping kardashins lol	You know, watching Kardashins Lol.
53	khloe kardashian loved reality star social medium top three month	Khloe Kardashian loved the reality star social medium top three months.
53	love khloe alexandra kardashian biggest fan kuwait will meet	The khloe alexandra kardashian biggest fan kuwait will meet khloe alexandra kardashian.
53	waiting kktn tonight love kardashians	Waiting tonight kardashians love kardashians so much.
53	crystal clear kim kardashian single fucking idiot	Kim Kardashian, a fucking idiot unique, crystal clear and clear.
53	love reali kardashian saludos mexico	J' loves real kardashian saludos in Mexico.
53	prob love	Well, there's one already, and there's another.
53	favorite kardashian love khloe	The favorite khloe love khloe khloe.
53	kardashians episode good	The Kardashians episode is a good one.
54	head mossad week ago stuxnet set iranian nuke plan decade fox news iran nuke yr	A week ago, Stuxnet put in place an Iranian nuclear plan for the decade fox news Iran nuke yr.
54	citing option iran reject uranium deal diplomat nytimes	Citing the Iranian option, Iranian diplomat rejects the uranium deal.
54	iran year nuclear weapon iranelection	L' iranelection at the Apos; nuclear weapon of the year Iranian.
54	mi head iran sanction nuke program technical expertise create mat	Iran's nuclear program technical expertise made it possible to create a piece of equipment.
54	future iran nuclear talk ahmadinejad afp afp iran president mahmoud ahmadinejad	The future president of Iran ahmadinejad afp afp afp Iran speaks Iranian mahmoud ahmadinejad nuclear.
54	idf intelligence chief iran nuclear bomb year haaretz	Iranian intelligence chief, haaretz of the year of the nuclear bomb.
55	option credit card debt consolidation loan	Loan from credit card debt consolidation option.
55	credit card debt bankruptcy alternative legally settle bad credit card debt great economic crisis	L' credit card debt bankruptcy alternative legally settle bad credit card debt major economic crisis.
55	credit card debt consolidation debt settlement option credit card debt consolidation debt sett	Credit Card Debt Consolidation Debt resolution option Credit card debt consolidation Composition of consolidation debt.
55	help consolidation consumer debt ehow	Contribute to the consolidation of Canada's consumer debt system.
55	post debt consolidation debt consolidation	Debt consolidation after debt consolidation is completed.
55	lower credit card debt	Decrease credit card debt.
55	suffering bad credit history bad credit debt consolidation loan pay debt	Bad credit history Bad credit history Bad credit history Debt consolidation credit.
55	debt settlement lawyer debt settlement easier lawyer day debt settlement beco	Debt settlement lawyer debt settlement easier lawyer debt settlement day because.
55	debt consolidation help avoid bankruptcy debt consolidation involves single loan	Debt consolidation helps avoid bankruptcy Debt consolidation involves a single loan.
55	offbeat idea eliminate credit card debt month offbeat idea eliminate credit card	L' false idea eliminates credit card debt l' idea of credit months eliminates credit card.
55	credit card debt consolidation gt credit card studentloans info conso	Credit card debt consolidation gt student credit card Loans info conso conso.
55	credit card debt relief program avoid bankruptcy settle debt day reliable	Credit card debt relief program avoid bankruptcy payment of reliable debt day.
55	debt settlement program ftc law debt settlement better article learn	Debt Settlement Program FTC Debt Settlement Act better article apprendre.
55	personal loan debt consolidation	Personal loan debt consolidation.
55	swift debt relief valuable tip debt consolidation consider	Rapid debt relief to make debt consolidation a factor.
55	secured unsecured debt consolidation loan settle credit card debt cost debt consolidation	Unsecured guaranteed debt consolidation loan to settle credit card debt consolidation.
55	debt consolidation augment debt problem finance money	Debt consolidation increases the debt problem financing the currency.
56	great win packer christina land blunder	The big winner, christina land, screwed up.
56	christina aguilera bungle national anthem three thing singing nationa	Christina aguilera bungle national anthem three singing nationa songs.
56	christina aguilera forgets national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera forgets the national anthem Super Bowl.
56	christina aguilera fluff american national anthem super bowl xlv	Christina Aguilera fluff U.S. national anthem super bowl xlv.
56	christina aguilera wrong lyric usa national anthem superbowl	Christina aguilera false lyrics used a national hymn superbowl superbowl.
56	ifwt video christina aguilera mess national anthem superbowl	If the video Christina aguilera spoil the' national anthem superbowl.
56	endsmeat christina aguilera mess lyric national anthem super bowl	The end of the meat Christina aguilera messes lyric national anthem super bowl.
56	christina aguilera fumble national anthem lyric super bowl tonight super bowl xlv kickoff christina	Christina Aguilera fumble national hymn lyric super bowl tonight super bowl xlv launch Christina Christina christina.
56	twitter explodes christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera mess national anthem super bowl explodes on Twitter.
56	christina aguilera botched national anthem superbowl notice	Christina Aguilera botched the national anthem superbowl.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem espn	Super bowl xlv Christina aguilera rehearse lyrics; national anthem espn espn.
56	aguilera flub national anthem christina aguileraflubbed belt	Aguilera flub national anthem christina aguileraflubbed belt.
56	today talker aguilera botch star spangled banner clip survey colt	Today, the chatterbox will aguilera starbang spangled banner clip survey colt poll.
56	christina aguilera fluff national anthem	Christina Aguilera imitates the national anthem.
56	full video super bowl national anthem singer christina aguilera fail imalive	L&apos singer Christina Aguilera, the national anthem of the Super Bowl, failed.
56	local christina aguilera fumble national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted	Christina aguilera local fumble national anthem Christina aguilera flubted belt.
56	artsbeat christina aguilera flub national anthem nytimes share friend art classical musi	Artbeat Christina Aguilera flub, national anthem nytimes share her friend classical art, classical musi musi.
56	conan blast christina super bowl anthem blunder time	Christina blowing Super Bowl cones hymn blunder time blunder.
56	watch christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl	Watching christina aguilera fuck the apos; national super bowl anthem.
56	christina aguilera national anthem super bowl flub happen york daily news fox	Christina Aguilera national anthem Super Bowl flub is York fox daily newspaper.
56	usa national anthem hard song sing	Usa national anthem song must sing national song song.
56	feel super bowl national anthem fail christina aguilera lion den university	Feeling super bowl national anthem fail Christina will aguil lion college.
56	check video christina aguilera super bowl national anthem mistake mess err	Watch the video of Christina Aguilera Super Bowl, national anthem error.
56	christina aguilera flub star spangled banner lyric super bowl sport	Christina aguilera spangled flub star spangled lyrical Super Bowl sports banner.
56	watch christina agulilera botch national anthem super bowl michael mccarthy usa today heard	Watching Christina Agulilera botch national anthem super bowl Michael McCarthy used to hear today.
56	perez hilton christina aguilera mess lyric national anthem super bowl ooop hitechcj	Perez Hilton Christina Aguilera lyrical mess national anthem super bowl ooop hitechcj.
56	christina aguilera mangle national anthem super bowl xlv superbowlxlv fb	Christina aguilera mangle national hymne super bowl xlv superbowlxlv fb.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem singing er rampart watched gallant	Christina Aguilera flub national anthem singing girly watched rampart.
56	haha christina aguilera spelled bad sing fucked national anthem super bowl lol	Ha ha christina aguilera spelled bad song kissed national anthem super bowl lol super bowl.
56	christina aguilera destroys national anthem superbowl	Christina aguilera destroys the national anthem superbowl.
56	packer win super bowl christina aguilera national anthem wrong news sky xy	Packer win Super Bowl Christina Aguilera national anthem bad news xy xy.
56	aguilera fluff super bowl anthem	L' lyrics; aguilera fluff super bowl.
56	social medium blast christina aguilera national anthem super bowl flub day social medium	Social media blows Christina aguilera national anthem Super Bowl flub day social media.
56	christina aguilera mess national anthem start super bowl xlv	Christina Aguilera mess national anthem start Super bowl xlvvv.
56	christina aguilera mangle star spangled banner super bowl abc news sb	Christina aguilera mangle star spangled mangle banner super bowl abc news sb sb.
56	airhead christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl xlv tcot tlot	Christina Aguilera, egg head, fuck l' national anthem, super bowl xlv tcot tlot tlot.
56	heard christina aguilera flubbed superbowl national anthem night	Christina aguilera flirted with the night of the national anthem of superbowl.
56	christina aguilera national anthem politicsthe votechristina aguilera national anthem flubbed itth	Christina Aguilera national anthem political l' national anthem votechristina aguilera flub it flub.
56	super bowl national anthem singer christina aguilera fail video	L&apos singer; national anthem of Super Bowl, Christina Aguilera, fails video.
56	christina aguilera explains super bowl national anthem flub	Christina Aguilera explains flub de l' national anthem of Super Bowl.
56	bronco christina aguilera flub national anthem kmgh denver	Bronco christina aguilera flub national kmgh denver hymn.
56	aguilera flub national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted natio nfl steelers	Aguilera flub national anthem Christina aguilera flubted natio nfl steelers belt.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem	The national anthem of Super Bowl Xlv Christina Aguilera repeats the apos.
56	funny happened aguilera repeat national anthem yahoo news	Fun Studied will repeat the apos; national anthem yahoo news yahoo.
56	rocking christina aguilera explains national anthem flub christina aguilera well aware	The rocking christina aguilera explains the apos; national anthem flub christina aguilera well know.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem singing er rampart watched gallantly	Christina aguilera flub national anthem singing rampart watched gallantly.
56	case missed christina aguilera butchered national anthem	Missed case Christina Aguilera massacred the national anthem.
56	christina aguilera explains national anthem flub movie tv caught	Christina Aguilera explains l' national anthem flub film tv caught.
56	christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera ruined the national anthem super bowl.
56	christina aguilera screw national anthem	Christina Aguilera fucks the national anthem.
56	video christina aguilera sings national anthem loud super bowl xlv post sbnation	Video Christina Aguilera sings l' national anthem strong Super Bowl xlv post sbnation.
56	dtn hollywood christina aguilera apologises national anthem flub feedburner share friend	Hollywood's Christina Aguilera apologizes to Apos' friend Flub Feedburner from Apos; national anthem.
56	defglam christina aguilera apologizes screwing national anthem	Christina Aguilera s' apologies for screwing up; national anthem.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera defends the national anthem super bowl of l&apos.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera defends the national anthem super bowl of l&apos.
56	klassy breeze music blog black eyed aguilera love	Klassy breeze music blog black eyes aguilera love.
56	gossip christina fumble lyric national anthem fail christina agu	Christina Fumble gossip lyric national anthem fail Christina agu christina.
56	post christina aguileras national anthem apology slammed taylor hick christina aguileras nation	After Christina Aguileras, the apology of the national anthem struck Taylor Hick Christina Aguileras nation.
56	opinion christina sounded amazing super bowl america making big deal	Christina d' opinion sounded great in making a big deal about the Super Bowl.
56	christina aguilera apologize flubbing national anthem	Christina Aguilera s' apology for flaming the national anthem.
56	sport super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem christina aguilera smokinsession	Super bowl sport xlv christina aguilera repeat l' national anthem christina aguilera Smokinsession.
56	honor epic fail national anthem top ten list time worst	Honoring the apos; epic national anthem failure Top ten list of worst moments.
56	celebrity butchering national anthem digg christina aguilera flawlessly sung national anthem	A celebrity massacring the national anthem digg christina aguilera sang perfect lypos; national anthem.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem christina aguilera flubbed nfl	Super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat l' national anthem christina aguilera flubbed nf.
56	christina aguilera great job national anthem	Christina Aguilera excellent national anthem work.
56	christina aguilera screwed forgot national anthem american event deporther fail fb	Christina Aguilera forgot the apos; American national anthem event deporther failure fb.
56	christina aguilera messed national anthem super bowl xlv dep	Christina Aguilera screwed up Super Bowl of the national anthem xlv dep.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed hawaii alohatone	Aguilera repeats l'apos; national anthem ap christina aguilera flubled hawaii alohatone.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem	The national anthem repeats the apostles.
56	christina aguilera flubbed national anthem lost moment bw	Christina will ignite the national anthem at a lost moment.
56	watch christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl post	Watching Christina Aguilera fuck l' national anthem Super Bowl Post.
56	christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl xlv judge	Christina Aguilera screws national anthem super bowl xlv judge.
56	christina fail ulera ear bleed time hear sing fucking national anthem forshame	Christina E escaped bleeding ear time hear fucking d' national anthem of shame.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap	Aguilera repeat the apos; national anthem ap.
56	knew national anthem messed lol sang christina aguilera sang	He knew that l' national anthem sali lol sang Christina aguilera sang christina sang.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem supposed sing er rampart	Aguilera repeats the national anthem supposed to sing er rampart.
56	kold aguilera repeat national anthem	Kold aguilera will repeat the apos; national anthem.
56	christina aguilera fumble national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted nat	Christina aguilera fumble national anthem Christina aguilera flubbed belted nat.
56	christina aguilera ruin national anthem super bowl xlv beyonce band escort nf	Christina Aguilera ruined the national anthem Super Bowl xlv beyonce band escort nf.
56	christina aguilera apologizes messing national anthem christina aguilera suffered publ	Christina Aguilera s' apology for slander; national anthem Christina Aguilera suffered.
56	latest christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl kickoff	Christina Aguilera's latest Super Bowl national anthem was sent out.
56	christina aguilera muffed lyric national anthem	Christina Aguilera smothered the apos; lyric national anthem.
56	topix super bowl football gree jpg christina aguilera flubbed belted	Topix Super Bowl football jpg christina aguilera belt flubted flub.
56	poll christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl	Find out more about Christina Aguilera botch national super bowl hymn.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed belted	Aguilera repeats the apos; national anthem ap christina aguilera belted.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem espn	Super bowl xlv Christina aguilera rehearse lyrics; national anthem espn espn.
56	christina aguilera mess star spangled banner super bowl dumb bitch	Christina Aguilera mess star spangled banner super bowl stupid bitch.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed belted	Aguilera repeats the apos; national anthem ap christina aguilera belted.
56	christina aguilera fu nat anthem super bowl	Christina aguilera fu nat hymn super bowl.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera defends the national anthem super bowl of l&apos.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem	The national anthem repeats the apostles.
56	twitter explodes christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl twitter abuzz commen	Twitter explodes Christina aguilera mess national hymn super bowl twitter abuzz Begin.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem ap celebrity news	Christina Aguilera flub national anthem ap celebrity news.
56	hear christina aguilera mangled star spangled banner superbowl twilight reaming	I hear christina aguilera tore up the starry banner of the super bowl twilight.
56	christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl washington post	Christina Aguilera botch national anthem Super Bowl Washington Post.
56	poll christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl singer repeat accidentally tarnishing othe	The survey Christina Aguilera botch national hymn super bowl singer repeater accidentally tarnish l' other.
57	watching blue blood cbs	I'm watching blue blood cbs.
57	gothic abby cbs	Abby gothic cbs.
57	late night time watch crime solving tv ncis csi sky looooove	Late in the night, watch crime resolution TV.
57	love ncis arc outcome funeral	J' loves the funeral of NCIS.
57	caught criminal mind finally work castle watch time watch ncis true love	The criminal mind is finally put to work, the clock shows time.
57	love shirt store ncis	J' likes the Ncis shirt shop.
57	obsession gt ncis	Uh, obsession from NCIS.
57	ncis stupidest fucking television	NCIS is the stupidest fucking TV.
57	loooooooooooove ncis	I don't know.
57	gibbs father love ep ncis	Gibbs' father likes the episode.
57	ncis bomb love	Canada's Food Guide to Healthy Eating.
57	yeah don csis nciss enjoy mentalist	Yep, CSI Nciss love mentalists.
58	nominate shorty award food love food ve eating mcds year yea	Name Shorty Award food love food you eat mcds year yea ya ya y.
59	wlcentral yemen day rage february egypt jan yemen feb	February Egypt Jan yemen feb Celebration Celebrate Celebration Celebrate.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president hundred anti government protest	Yemen protest started despite the 100 concession president against the government protest against the government.
59	yemen call emergency meeting ahead protest yemen president ali abdullah saleh called emergen	Yemen calls an emergency meeting to protest against Yemen president ali Abdullah Saleh, known as Emeren.
59	thousand protest yemen	A thousand yemen protests.
59	lat ten thousand turn rival rally yemen	Last ten thousand turn the rival rally yemen.
59	yemen join uprising trend protest start yemen despite concession president yemen jan	Yemen joins the rising trend protest start yemen despite the yemen Jan president's concession.
59	yemen republican guard dispatched roaming street sana reliable source	Yemen's Republican Guard sent a reliable source, Sana, roaming the streets.
59	anti government protest start yemen	Yemen is beginning to protest the government's decision.
59	correcting link yemen latest arab state join unrest activist demonstrating	Correct the link yemen last Arab state join activist from the protests.
59	breaknews yemen street day rage yemeni filled street sanaa	The new yemen on the street rage yemeni fill the streets sanaa sanaa.
59	yemen president extend term aljazeera	The President will extend the term of office of the President.
59	ticker thousand yemeni call president quit	A thousand Yemenis call on the president to resign.
59	yemeni president ali abdullah saleh will seek extend presidency appoint son role current	Yemen's president ali abdullah saleh will seek to name his current role.
59	egypt yemen demand change government well gt news tcot	L' Yemeni Egypt calls for a change of government.
59	protest reform start yemen hundred anti government protester gathered sanaa	Yemen protest reform begins 100 protesters against the government gathered sana'a.
59	yemen pres salih will seek term step egypt pres mubarak	Yemen near salih will seek a step forward to Egypt pres mubarak.
59	anti government protest spilling yemen business	Anti-government protest-government, spillover from the business of Yemen.
59	st tunisia egypt yemen	Tunisia and the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia.
59	yemen protest intensify arrest journalist tawakkol karman	Yemen's protests intensify the arrest of journalist Tawakkol Karman.
59	worldchanging yemen president facing protest will seek extend term expires	Yemen's president changing in the face of protests will seek to extend the term.
59	march yemen president day rage	Walk into the rage of the day of the President of Yemen.
59	yemen unsettled president vow relinquish power yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh will stand current mand	Unstable Yemeni President vows to relinquish power The yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh will remain the current watchdog.
59	wonder will fill political vacuum tunesia egypt yemen tunesia egypt yemen	L' wonder will fill the political vacuum tunesia egypt yemen egypt yemen.
59	indy yemen president saleh step yemen president told parliament will seek term	President d'apos; Indy yemen announced in Parliament that he would seek office.
59	thousand march yemen president middle east independent	A thousand yemen independent president of the Middle-Orient.
59	reuters top news yemen president won extend term pas son	Reuters top news president yemen won an extended term from his son.
59	yemen protest february day rage video news egypt jan mubarak syria libya jordan ugc	Yemen protests January Mubarak Syria Libya Jordan ugc on the day of new video rage in Egypt.
59	protest erupt yemen	And protests have broken out in Yemen.
59	great bbc piece summarising unrest north africa middle east	Big BBC article summarizing the unrest to the north of L' Middle Africa-Orient.
59	yemeni president won seek term	Yemen's president got a term in office.
59	yemen ali abdullah saleh won seek reelection year power amazing happenning mid east	Yemen ali Abdullah Saleh won the reelection year's incredible power run at Middle-Orient.
59	dueling protest yemen unfold peacefully thousand pro antigovernment demonstrator held peaceful	Thousands of pro @-@government protesters have been protesting peacefully in a duel.
59	yemen president won election	Yemeni president won the elections.
59	revolt contagious anti government protest spread yemen tcot tlot jan sidibouzid	The contagious anti @-@government revolt spread the Jan sidibouzid yemen tcotlot.
59	yemen president signal won stay freedomwar egypt jan syria feb	Yemen's president's signal won Egypt Jan Syria's freedom war.
59	thousand yemeni call president quit thousand yemeni demonstrated capital thursday	A thousand Yemenis call president leave a thousand Yemenis marched capital Thursday.
59	thousand rally government yemen	A thousand yemen government rallies.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president hundred anti government protest	Yemen protest started despite the 100 concession president against the government protest against the government.
59	obama minute citizen rally president resign egypt	A rally of citizens from Apos; Obama, the president of Apos; Egypt has resigned.
59	yemeni president won extend presidential term yemen	The Yemeni president got an extended presidential term in Yemen.
59	yemen president ali abdullah saleh quit	Yemeni president ali Abdullah Saleh resigned.
59	deutsche welle yemen unsettled president vow relinquish power	Deutsche Bundesche können werden.
59	al jazeera report region yemen pres extend term protest call syria	Al Jazeera reports that the Yemeni region is expanding the term protest called Syria.
59	yemen girds day rage saleh vow step bloomberg	Yuy girds day rage saleh swear not ablomberg.
59	join yemen day rage	Join the day rage of Yemen-you.
59	news growing anti regime protest spread yemen	The news d' an anti-growing regime protest spread Yemen.
59	protest yemen	To protest Yemen.
59	middle east news ten thousand fill yemen street day rage haaretz follow	Middle @--@ Orient News 10,000 fill yemen street rage day haaretz follow.
59	thousand rally government yemen breaking	Thousand yemen rally government breaking yemen.
59	mass rally yemen day rage anti government protester gather yemen capital sanaa day rage	Rally mass day rage against government protesting gathering yemen capital sanaa day of rage.
59	ten thousand march yemen president ap news	Ten thousand yemen president ap news.
59	egypt ripple ally yemeni prez ali abdullah saleh power year won seek term	Egypt undulating ally yemeni prez ali abdullah saleh year of earned power seek mandate.
59	street yemen day rage	Yemen's day rage from the streets.
59	yemen president ali abdallah saleh power year periodically announces won election	President ali Abdallah Saleh periodically announces that the election has been won.
59	yemen president extend term egypt jordan tunisia	Yemen's president extends the term of office of Egyptian president Jordan tunisia.
59	yemeni rally president	Yemeni rally president.
59	yemen arrest anti government activist yemen	The Yemeni government has arrested the anti-government activist-yemen.
59	yemen president facing protest will seek extend term expires	Yemen's president in the face of protest will seek to extend the term.
59	yemen protest call president saleh	Yemen's protest calls president Saleh.
59	student activist stage rival demonstration yemeni university	Student activist, student rival demonstration of Yemeni University.
59	dtn singapore yemen president won stand term sanaa yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh facing	Dtn singapore yemen president got the term sanaa yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh face-to-face.
59	anti government rally yemen stay calm	Anti rally-government yemen stay calm.
59	newsshare yemen president won extend term pas son reuters	The president newsshare yemen won an extended term by his reuters.
59	street yemen day rage sanaa reuters yemeni	The Yemeni day rage sanaa reuters yemeni yemeni.
59	pak thousand yemeni demand govt change thousand yemeni street capital sanaa inspir	Pak thousand yemeni asks the government to change a thousand yemeni capital street.
59	thousand yemeni demand change government thousand yemeni demand change gov hiring send cv	A thousand Yemenis request a change of government Yemenis request a change of government.
59	yemeni doubt president won step	Yemeni doubts the president won step by step.
59	ten thousand yemeni protest sanaa ten thousand yemeni staged day rage calling	Ten thousand Yemeni Protestant sanaa ten thousand Yemenis dramatized the day's rage by appealing for anger.
59	turmoil hit yemen yemen president won seek election hand power son cnn	L'apos; agitation struck yemen president won seek to elect hand power son CNNN.
59	president yemen ali abdullah saleh will seek extend presidential term pas power son jan yemen feb	President yemen ali abdullah saleh will seek to extend the presidential term of his son Jan yemen feb.
59	cnn anti government protest yemen hundred anti government protester gathered news	Hundreds of anti @-@government protesters gathered information on the situation.
59	yemeni protester urged president ali abdullah saleh step muhammadjusuf	Yemeni protester urged president ali abdullah saleh step muhammadjusuf.
59	pre empting mass anti government protest ali saleh vow seek extension pas rein	Mass Preemption anti @-@government protest ali saleh wish to seek extension not kidney.
59	yemen thousand protest government worldnomads travelsafety	Thousands of government protests travel safely.
59	domino working well yemen call emergency meeting ahead protest cnn	The dominoes that are doing well in Yemen are calling an emergency meeting to protest against the Apos; agreement.
59	protest sanaa yemen feb	Protest sanaa yemen feb feb.
59	police open fire yemen protester sanaa yemen ap witness police opened fire break	Police open fire The protester sanaa yemen ap witness Police opened fire.
59	bbc yemeni rally president thousand yemeni demonstrating capital sanaa calling president ali abdullah	Bbc yemeni rally president thousand yemeni protest capital sanaa call president ali abdullah.
59	yemen president quit february updated	Yemen's president resigned in February.
59	anti government rally hit yemen	Anti-government rally hit Yemen-government.
59	start era middle east	L'art de l'apos; era Moyen-Orient.
59	factbox group challenging yemen government reuters	Discussion group challenging Reuters government of Yemen.
59	yemen day rage draw ten thousand	The rage of the day in Yemen attracts 10,000 people.
59	tunisia egypt yemen	Egyptian yemen tunisian.
59	today president alisaleh yemen vowed election support peaceful transition power feb	Today, President alisaleh yemen promised that the election would support a febrile, peaceful transitional government.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president cnn	Start of the protest yemen despite the president of CNN dealership.
59	blemish org ten thousand turn rival rally yemen los angeles time reuterstens thousand turn	Disadvantage or ten thousand turn rival rally yemen los angeles times reuters a thousand turns.
59	ten thousand march yemen president sanaa yemen ten thousand lukewilliamss	Ten thousand march yemen president sanaa yemen ten thousand lukewilliamss.
59	protester hit street yemen	A protester hit Yemen from the street.
59	yemen protest february day rage lt lt lt video yemen protest jan ali abdullah saleh news	Yemen February protest rages, yemen protest video Jan ali abdullah saleh news.
59	yemeni president ruled decade ll seek extend term pas power son reuters	Yemen's president reigned ten years after seeking to extend the term of his son Reuters.
59	watching yemen	I mean, look at Yemen.
59	teepeecreek ten thousand march yemen president ap teepeecreek	Teepeecreek 10,000 march yemen president ap teepeecreek.
60	chipotle face ice inspection state reuters reuters chipotle mexican grill	Chipotle ice inspection state Reuters chipotle Mexican grill reuters.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs los angeles dallas reuters chipotle mexican grill lot going	The fast-food spotted the apos; immigration to grill Los Angeles Dallas Reuters Chipotle Mexican Grill.
60	chipotle caught immigration crosshairs yahoo news knew genuine mexican working	Chipotle took it; online immigration Yahoo news knew that authentic Mexicans worked.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs los angeles dallas reuters chipotle mexican grill lot	The food-fast caught fire; immigration on the Los Angeles Reuters chipotle Mexican grill lot.
60	ih industry news chipotle scrutiny ice	Ih news from l'apos; industry chipotle ice monitoring chipotle.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs reuters	The fast @-@food has just caught the attention of the bloggers; immigration on Reuters.
60	chipotle face ice inspection state reuters	The chipotle face inspection ice state reuters.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs	The fast-food has just caught the attention of l'apos.
60	chipotle scrutiny illegal worker	Controlling the chipotle illegal worker.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs	The fast-food has just caught the attention of l'apos.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs reuters	The fast @-@food has just caught the attention of the bloggers; immigration on Reuters.
60	ice scrutiny chipotle broadens	The chipotle of the ice expanded.
60	chipotle ice problem investigation state news immigration	Chipotle ice problem investigation Immigration news report.
60	surprise day immigration crackdown bad american access burrito	Day-surprise of the repression of immigration bad American access burrito burrito.
60	chipotle fire hundred immigration raid immigration probe forced mexican chain chipotle fire	Fire chipotle one hundred immigration raid probe d' immigration forced Mexican chain fire chipotle fire chipotle chain.
60	chipotle mexican grill received immigration custom enforcement notice inspection restaurant	The Mexican chipotle grill received notification from Immigration Customs Inspection.
61	iphone share smartphones phone	Iphone share mobile phones.
61	pcworld android tablet smartphone boost samsung	Pcworld android tablet smartphone booster samsung.
61	iphone profit swamp competitor iphone cheap smartphone load codswallop	Iphone profit competitor iphone cheap smartphone loading codswallop.
61	mobile market grew smartphones android driver will drive marke	The mobile market s' smartphones android driver will drive Marke.
61	motorola post earnings android	Motorola after the winnings.
61	iphone share smartphones phone asymco chart	Iphone share smartphones phone asymco graphics asymco.
61	apple account percent smartphone market profit	Percentage apple account of smartphone market.
61	android tablet smartphone boost samsung samsung electronics reported fresh time sale high	Smartphone android tablet booster samsung samsung electronics reported high retail time.
61	idc apple lead rim worldwide smartphone maker	Idc lead rim apple worldwide smartphone manufacturer.
61	blackberry beating iphone smartphone battle	Blackberry beats iphone smartphone battle to iphone.
62	avani news gop senator seek change born citizen usa today	Today, Senator avani Gop seeks change born citizen used today.
62	florida immigration law focused employer hasn enforced politics ap miamiherald	Lapos; employer focused on the immigration law in Florida imposed apamiherald miamiherald policy.
62	arizona bid block citizenship illegal immigrant anchor baby	Arizona's application blocks citizenship, l' illegal immigrant baby anchor.
62	report immigration law enforced consistently ap	Report that immigration law has been systematically enforced.
62	isg alert visa program gao report congress reform needed minimize risk cost immigration	Visa program; isgao report of congressional reform necessary to minimize risk of immigration.
62	georgia hb immigration reform bill creates staggering cost taxpayer tweak existing law	The immigration reform bill imposes exorbitant costs on taxpayers who amend the existing law.
62	immigration law enforced consistently	The law on immigration is applied consistently.
62	vote delayed immigration verify bill house labor subcommittee adjourned debate directed dep	The debate was adjourned by the sub-Labour Committee of the House of Commons.
62	sodahead state inspired arizona illegal immigration law face tough fiscal reality state iowa	Arizona's illegal immigration law is inspired by the state of the hard fiscal reality of the apo; Iowa.
62	commerce bos immigration reform	Migration from commerce bos commerce.
62	lawmaker question practicality ky immigration bill	Lawmakers question the feasibility of the immigration bill.
62	state follow arizona lead push immigration bill power	The state follows Arizona and pushes the immigration bill.
62	arizona bid block citizenship illegal immigrant anchor baby tcot tlot	The candidacy of l' Arizona blocks citizenship, l' illegal immigrant baby tcot tlot anchor.
62	stein report gt south dakota bill target illegal immigration	The Stein report states that the South Dakota Bill will target illegal immigration.
62	house kill arizona style immigration bill rep rick rand house pas ari	The house kills Arizona, the immigration bill, the representative Rick Rand, the house not Ari.
62	washington legislature wade immigration debate oregonlive summary requires employe verify	Washington legislature wade debate on l' immigration oregonlive summary requires verification by the employer.
62	arizona immigration law blocked judge	The immigration law of the apo; Arizona blocked the judge.
62	riz khan arizona immigration law	Rice khan Arizona immigration law.
62	missouri court rule immigrant adoption right terminated illegally missouri supreme court tuesday ove	The Missouri court ruled that the Missouri supreme court illegally applied the right to adopt immigrants on Tuesday evening.
62	missouri court rule immigrant adoption right terminated illegally missouri supreme court tuesday overtu	The Missouri court ruled that the right to adopt immigrants ended in the Missouri supreme court illegally on Tuesday.
62	splc report examines motivation effect anti immigrant law local state level immigration	The splc report examines the anti-anti-immigrant law motivating effect at the local level of the state.
62	michael johnston colorado legislator state tuition illegal immigrant proposed necn	Michael Johnston, the legislator of the state responsible for illegal immigrant fees, proposed Necn.
63	stuxnet lead chernobyl russian	Stuxnet lead russian chernobyl.
63	science fiction author futurist william gibson stuxnet	L' author of science @-@future fiction William Gibson Stuxnet.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	Stuxnet boomerang security expert warns L&apos.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	Stuxnet boomerang security expert warns L&apos.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	Stuxnet boomerang security expert warns L&apos.
63	russia stuxnet caused chernobyl david brunnstrom reuters david brunnstrom reuters rus	The Russian stuxnet caused David Brunnstrom reuters David Brunnstrom reuters Rus Rus.
63	stuxnet concern iranian health ministry york time published report week describing stuxnet	Stuxnet refers to Iran's Ministry of Health, the report release time describing Stuxnet.
63	william gibson stuxnet panzergeist sez piece cyberpunk author william gibson share finding	William Gibson Stuxnet panzergeist sez piece cyberpunk author William Gibson share finding it.
64	check article fox news sideline test detect concussion minute	Read Fox News article about the secondary concussion test.
64	aggressive tackling learn lasting damage concussion teen	Aggressive plating teaches lasting damage teenage concussion.
64	buck belief nba concussion protocol three year ago ucla luc richard mbah moute sust	The belief nba concussion protocol three years ago UCLA luc Richard mbah moute sust.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk health news	A multiple concussion increases the health risks of adolescent athletes.
64	aaron rodgers concussion nfl playoff packer quarterback hiding brain injury	Aaron Rodgers NFL concussion playoff quarterback hiding brain damage.
64	impact sensor slated nfl helmet season playbook	Dapos detector; programmed impact for NFL helmet season.
64	sideline test accurately detects athlete concussion minute	Key-line control accurately detects minute concussion in the athlete.
64	footballer destroying kid brain game	A football player destroying the brain of a child.
64	nfl official mike quick pa sport concussion bill tough mentality permeates youth sport	The NFL's rapid concussions in sport bill had a profound impact on youth sports.
64	live discussion concussion sport start est join hash tag cdcheadsup	Start of live discussion on sport commussion is now attached hash tag cdcheadsup.
64	national hockey league concussion rise sidney crosby marc ap sport staff associated pressp	The National Hockey League causes a concussion at Sidney Crosby Marc ap, the press staff associated with the sport.
64	sidney crosby concussion raise safety debate hockey spark discussion	Sidney Crosby's commotion ignites safety debate Hockey sparks hockey spark.
64	pa committee approves youth sport concussion bill harrisburg pa whtm state senate education committ	The committee approves the Harrisburg bill on youth sports commotion and education in the Senate.
64	usa today sport buck forward belief nba concussion protocol	We use today; sport oil before belief nba concussion protocol.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk yahoo	Multiple concussions increase health risk for adolescent athletes.
64	nytimessports oversight group vow pursue update football helmet standard	The nytimessports monitoring group s&apos commits to update football helmets standard.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion	L' school s' attack to concussion in teenagers.
64	hosting live chat concussion cdcheadsup rehearsed emergency plan chat	Animation d' a live chat chat chat plan cdcheadsup plan d&apos.
64	usa hockey considering proposal increase safety	Usa hockey considering proposal to increase safety.
64	nfl concussion people survey wix jsquared concussion	The concussion people are examining Wix Jsquared's concussion patterns.
64	mbah moute nba concussion protocol usa today share friend sport basketball nba	Mbah moute nba concussion protocol today; today we share the best of NBA basketball.
64	vital sign helmet guard aaron rodgers	Vital signs helmet guard Aaron Rodgers.
64	doctor lounge multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk	The multiple concussions in the doctors' lounge increase teenage athlete health risks.
64	news pa lawmaker concussion response standard student athlete	A student athlete is a student athlete who has been diagnosed with a neurological disability.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk medline	A multiple concussion increases the risk to the health of adolescent athletes.
64	sidney crosby concussion raise safety debate hockey spark discussion	Sidney Crosby's commotion ignites safety debate Hockey sparks hockey spark.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion bull ring drill football	The school is attacked by a concussion of a young victim.
64	sherrington player steerlers james harrison concussion seriously super bowl xlv news sportsdaydfw	Sherrington Steerlers player James Harrison concussion seriously super bowl xlv news sportsdaydfw.
64	testing track student recovery sport concussion milford daily news	Test the Milford sports commotion student recovery track daily newspaper fresh concussion.
64	aaron rodgers helmet saved concussion bear green bay packer qb aaron rodgers believ	Aaron Rodgers helmet saved concussion green bear packager qb Aaron Rodgers believev.
64	press release nocsae urge parent athlete fact concussion football	Press release nocsae squeeze the concussion football athlete parent.
64	nfl concussion news goodell order super bowl played hand touch	Nflussion news Super Bowl Super Goodell order played hand-to-hand.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion bull ring drill football	The school is attacked by a concussion of a young victim.
64	sidney crosby concussion rule change braine hope pray doesn sight	Sidney Crosby, concussion, rule change, hope that the n&apos prayer is invisible.
64	sideline test detect concussion minute foxnews	Lateral test for concussion minute foxnews.
64	don agree hines ward nfl concussion hypocrisy	I don't agree with the hypocrisy of concussion.
65	best buy future proof tech purchase buy program cost complete range con	It's better to buy future technology from D' D&apos testing; full program cost with full range.
65	best buy sell verizon iphone best buy announced wednesday will offer verizon iphone	The best buy sale verizon iphone best buy announced Wednesday will offer verizon iphone.
65	best buy future proof tech purchase buy program cost istockanalyst press release	Best buy future technology d' proof purchase program cost istockanalyst press release.
65	find best buy upgraded upgrade buy program	Best Buy updated the program d' upgrade purchase.
65	maclife best buy selling verizon iphone starting february verizon customer pic	Maclife best buy sale verizon iphone from February image client verizon verizon.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program ap ap timing shopping gadget	Best Buy Electronics buy program ap ap timing gadget shopping gadget.
65	post best buy buy official free february	Best post February purchase free of charge.
65	quora will best buy electronics buy consumer answer	Quora better buy electronics buy consumer response.
65	best buy buy program don upgrade major electronic equipment	The Best Buy program does not upgrade major electronic equipment.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program	Best purchase electronic launch program d' purchase.
65	report hint best buy stock verizon iphone launch best buy outlet will varying amoun	The report suggests that Best Buy inventory verizon iphone launch Best Buy outlet will vary.
65	alert best buy announces buy program electronics news alert	The best buy of the product; alert announces the purchase of the product; an electronic purchase program.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program ap	Best e-buying to buy the program ap launch.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program timing shopping gadget socialmedia	Best e-buying buy the program cadencement gadget socialmedia launch.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program timing shopping gadget	Best e-procurement buy to buy the gadget cadencement program d&apos.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program	Best purchase electronic launch program d' purchase.
65	best buy target launch buy electronics offer currently rachel blog travel industry news	Best Buy Target Buy Electronics currently offers the travel industry news rachel blog.
65	catch best buy buyback extended cut full info	The most advantageous buyout has been extended and all information is available.
65	best buy buy official free february best buy gadget repurchase breakingnews fb	Best Free Official Purchase February best buy fb breaknews fb redeem gadget.
66	joanna yeates suspect court img	Joanna Yeates is a suspect in the court img.
66	vincent tabak appears court charged murder	Vincent Tabak appears to have been charged with murder.
66	sun man charged killing jo yeates police tonight charged year vincent tabac murder	The sun man accused the police of killing Jo Yeates tonight accused of murdering Vincent Tobacco.
66	msn today joanna yeates suspect court	Today; hui Joanna Yeates suspect court.
66	vincent tabak man accused jo yeates murder deeply saddened death	Vincent Tabak Man accused Yeates of murder deeply saddened by death.
66	breaking news jo murder accused remanded	Latest news Jo has been remanded on murder charges.
66	neighbour remanded jo yeates murder	Jo Yeates was fired for murder by the neighbor.
66	vincent tabak charged murder joanna yeates	Vincent tabak accused Joanna Yeates of murder.
66	joanna yeates murder accused vincent tabak remanded custody vincent tabak man accused murdering	Joanna Yeates murderous accused Vincent Tabak remanded Vincent Tabak as a man accused of murder.
66	uk news neighbour remanded jo yeates murder	Uk neighbor's news remanded jo yeates murder.
66	real life murder freaked dutch man killer gt	A real murder scared a Dutch killer to death.
66	joanna yeates vincent tabak charged murder	Joanna Yeates Vincent Tabak has been charged with murder in the past.
66	man charged joanna yeates murder	A man accused Joanna Yeates of murder.
66	vincent tabak man accused jo yeates murder deeply saddened death telegraph	Vincent Tabak Man accused Yeates of murder deeply sad telegraph of death.
66	avon somerset police charged vincent tabak murder jo yeates hope life ruined	Apos police Avon Somerset accused Vincent Tabak of murder Jo Yeates hopes life ruined.
67	chicken dumpling	Uh, chicken balls.
67	pesto presto chicken pesto presto chicken feel good favorite cozy meal famil	The pesto presto chicken pesto presto chicken feel good favorite cozy family meal.
67	check delicious chicken recipe	Check delicious chicken recipes.
67	diablo chicken chili recipe	Devil's chicken chili recipe.
67	super smoker sweet spicy wing perfect sunday sb smokedrecipes footballfood recipe	Super smoker spicy wing perfect Sunday sb smoky recipe for food recipes.
67	seriousy gt super bowl food level recipe rock tequila spiked wing luv	Super bowl serious flat level rock tequila level recipe doped wing d' love wing.
67	favorite thing chicken breast	Uh, favorite thing, chicken breast.
67	delicious chicken curry recipe hope will	A delicious chicken curry recipe that gives hope.
67	luv gt mock chicken fettuccine alfredo grocery store dinner	I love chicken fettuccine alfredo dinner d'apos; groceries dinner.
67	learning recipe doesn cream potato soup cream chicken soup	The recipe for learning does not cream potato soup soup soup soup soup soup soup soup chicken to cream.
67	cook seared chicken apricot sauce chili rubbed steak pan salsa	Cuisine sauté sauce chicken apricot chili rub steak pan salsa salsa.
67	karaage japanese fried chicken recipe blog	Blog karaage japanese fried chicken recipe fried chicken.
67	ultimate chicken soup	L' chicken soup final.
67	chicken parm classic comfort food katie lee share recipe add garlic bread good measure anyon	Classic chicken parmesan comforting katie'e share the recipe add bread to l' good measure bear.
67	mama favorite easy chicken pasta mother knew food knew hand	Mama preferred easy chicken pasta to mama knew food knew the way.
67	grilled chicken tomato salad	I'll have a grilled chicken tomato salad.
67	healthy super bowl snack superbowl recipe	Super-superbowl recipe for healthy Super Bowl snack.
67	recipe chicken cutlet	Uh, chicken cutlet recipe.
67	sinfully spicy easy easy eat reshmi chicken kebab roll indianfood recipe indianfastfood	Spicy registration easy to eat reshmi chicken kebab roll roll Indian food recipe fastfood Indian.
67	wing healthy oven fried wing drip pan fat drain	Healthy wing oven fried drop drop fat drain drop drop.
67	bbc food recipe thai green chicken curry	Thai green chicken curry bbc food recipe.
67	cozy scene recipe gluten free fried chicken hsoul	Cosy gluten-free chicken hsoul recipe scene.
67	gourmet mom anise chicken recipe	You know, Mom's gourmet chicken recipe.
67	orange chicken twist chinese delicious	The chicken at l' Chinese twist orange delicious Chinese.
67	spicy food popular child quick thai style chicken soup will hit	Popular spicy food Thai child fast chicken soup will hit the spot.
67	best recipe caesar salad caesarsalad	This is the best recipe for Caesar Caesar salad.
67	quick avgolemono orzo chicken soup recipe	Quick recipe avgolemono orzo chicken soup orzo orzo.
67	marinated roast half chicken	Chicken roast marinated half-chicken.
67	simple easy prepare vintage fried chicken recipe	Simply and easily prepare vintage fried chicken recipe.
67	yummy recipe tuesday chicken fricasse	Delicious recipe Tuesday, chicken fricassee.
67	creamy recipe fettuccine alfredo chicken recipe	Creamy recipe fettuccine fettuccine alfredo chicken recipe.
67	menu tonight chicken curry recipe	Menu tonight, chicken curry recipe.
67	baked slow cooker chicken crockpotrecipes	Chicken crockpotrecipes baked in slow-simmering oven.
67	recipe super bowl slider super bowl party food big comfy flavor ease day	Super Bowl slider Super Bowl party food recipe great great flavor comfortable day of easy taste.
67	perfect super bowl chili	The perfect super bowl chili.
67	basic chicken saute recipe	Basic recipe for chicken stir-fry.
67	super bowl recipe buffalo chicken pizza	Super bowl pizza recipe buffalo chicken chicken.
67	chicken cutlet caper sauce recipe simply recipe	The chicken cutlet caper sauce recipe is simply a recipe recipe.
67	chicken piccata dinner yum	Chicken piccata dinner yummy.
67	blog post farm fresh recipe idea easy chicken wing week farm fresh recipe idea geared towar	Firm post blog idea of fresh chicken wing week recipe easy idea of fresh war-oriented recipe.
67	super bowl recipe gumbo fried chicken grilled salmon ciabatta patch top notch recipe	Recipes super bowl Gumbo chicken fried salmon ciabatta patch top-of-the-range recipe.
67	rp cooking update italian recipe food cooking recipe	Italian recipe cooking update Food cooking recipe.
67	creamy chicken mushroom pot pot pie topper abc news rachael ray share meal reheat	Creamy chicken mushroom pot pie to top abc news rachael Ray share meal warming.
67	shredded chicken hope guide shredded chicken helpful al	Chicken, shredded chicken, guide to food; hope, chicken shreds, serviceable, paras.
67	recipe roast chicken warm lemon herb potato salad recipe day	Chicken roast recipe hot lemon herb potato salad recipe day potato salad recipe.
67	moroccan roasted chicken orange juice recipe recipe moroccan roasted chicken orange	Recipes of the Moroccan recipe for d&apos juice; roasted chicken orange roast chicken roast chicken of Moroccan roast chicken.
67	easy weight loss recipe healthy recipe learn transform favorite food weight	Weight loss recipe easy healthy recipe learn to transform preferred food weight.
67	super bowl recipe gumbo fried chicken grilled salmon ciabatta serve big party	Super bowl recipe of grilled chicken gumbo salmon ciabatta serve big party.
67	twitter tweet perennial plant january bloomnflower recipe recipe	Twitter tweet perennial plant January flower recipe flower January flower recipe flower.
67	time superbowl start time start planning wing recipe great wing recipe	The time superbowl time starts to plan great recipe wing big wing.
67	crispy chicken drumstick ranch dressing recipe	This is a ranch dressing recipe for crispy chicken fingers.
67	recipe chicken cutlet	Uh, chicken cutlet recipe.
67	easy recipe ranch house casserole recipe	Recipes easy to prepare, recipe from home ranch stew.
67	kung pao chicken recipe	This is a kung pao chicken recipe.
67	rp cooking update chicken vegetable stir fry recipe readyseteat food recipe cook	Update on cooking chicken, vegetables, fries, ready meals-to serve and ready meals.
67	special chicken stew recipe chicken recipe stew recipe jamie oliver recipe love oliver bright star	Special recipe chicken stew recipe chicken stew recipe jamie oliver recipe d' love oliver bright star oliver.
67	ayam goring fried chicken rinse chicken inside cold running water pat dry paper tow	Ayam goring fried chicken rinse chicken with lapos; cold running water while tapping towed paper.
67	chicken vegetable herb brown rice	Uh, chicken, grass, brown rice.
67	reading chicken taco rice chicken taco rice yum yum yum eat plate coul	Reading chicken taco rice chicken taco rice yum yum yum yum eat plate slurry.
67	parmesan chicken broccoli pasta cocktail mom recipe husband love	Parmesan chicken broccoli cocktail pasta mom recipe husband love recipe.
67	chicken brick mark bittman simple delicious recipe mark bittman ny time column	Bittman brand chicken brick simple recipe delicious brand bittman ny time column bittman ny.
67	east chicken fettuccine recipe chicken recipe cooking	Chicken fettuccine from the east, chicken recipe cooked.
67	perfect super bowl party food bbq chicken pouch post	The perfect super bowl party bbq chicken pockets post-chicken.
67	winter coleslaw chicken salad sandwich kitchen season ross dobson wo	Chicken salad, chicken salad, coleslaw, cooking season Ross Dobson wo.
67	chicken cavatelli soup	Uh, chicken cavatelli soup.
67	low fat recipe lunchbox idea diet plan dinner tonight	You know, low-fat lunch box idea, diet, dinner tonight.
67	fabulous recipe mexican caldo pollo chicken soup jalepeno cheese cornbread	Recipe fabulous Mexican caldo pollo chicken soup corn-cheese cornbread Jalepeno.
67	delirious today feeling well time jewish penicillin chicken soup	Delusional today; feeling like a Jewish penicillin chicken soup time.
67	healthy recipe dinner sue healthy lifestyle	Healthy Food Luncheon Sue is a healthy lifestyle event.
67	orange glazed chicken wing recipe	A recipe for frozen orange chicken wings.
67	chicken rice melange recipe chicken recipe cooking	Chicken, rice, mix, chicken recipes, chicken recipes, baking.
67	red cabbage add color noodle salad soba salad chicken cabbage	Red Chou add the color noodle salad soba salad chicken cabbage noodles.
67	salty bacon creamy avocado succulent chicken classic delicious salad	Savour bacon cream avocado succulent chicken classic delicious salad.
67	totally making delicious meal tonight	I'm making a delicious meal here tonight.
67	supermarket diet easy recipe quick healthy meal good lose weight delicious easy coo	Supermarket diet, easy recipe, quick healthy meals, good weight loss, delicious easy to cook.
67	continuing cooking winning streak awesome lemon fennel pot roast chicken chicken boring	Continue the winning cooking set of lemon fennel pot roast chicken boring chicken.
67	chicken vegetable herb brown rice	Uh, chicken, grass, brown rice.
67	casserole recipe bruschetta chicken bake submitted heather simple creative chicken meal mimic	Recipes bruschetta cooking saucepan chicken submitted heather simple and creative mimic chicken flour.
67	shredded bbq chicken slider creamy cole slaw recipe	Chopped bbq chicken slider creamy cole recipe cole slaw.
67	check delicious chicken recipe	Check delicious chicken recipes.
67	ancho chicken tortilla soup ancho chicken tortilla soup feel good favorite cozy meal	Chicken tortilla soup and chicken tortilla soup make Ancho feel right at home.
67	read cook enjoy recipe israel couscous	Read to cook enjoy the recipe israel couscous israel.
67	chicken chili pillsbury	Chiliburybury chicken pills.
67	dinner idea dinner recipe easy weekly meal plan check going	Idea dinner recipe dinner plan weekly meal plan easy to check.
67	super bowl recipe todd dirt dirt man shared recipe patch ve ta	Super bowl recipe Todd dirt man shared the recipe patch ve ta ta.
67	article updated chicken stroganoff recipe	Article updated chicken stroganoff recipe chicken stroganoff.
67	easy honey mustard mozzarella chicken recipe chicken recipe cooking	Easy mustard mozzarella chicken chicken recipe chicken recipe cooking recipe chicken recipe.
67	chicken wing momofuku octo vinaigrette	Momofuku chicken wing octo vinaigrette octo vinaigrette.
67	recipe fried chicken liver mexico chilies	Recipes fried chicken liver Mexican chili peppers.
67	chicken taquitos recipe epicurious	The chicken taquitos recipe is epic.
68	expected king speech top oscar nomination	The King's speech was expected to be the first Oscar to be named.
68	sag prediction award tracker hmmmm	Prediction tracker of sag hmmmm's prediction price.
68	oscar reaction guess king speech	Well, guess what the king's speech is.
68	fighter king speech lead nominee tonight sag award beverly hill courier	Prime nominee King speech fight tonight Sag award Beverly Hill messenger.
68	king speech rule oscar nomination	The King's speech governs the Oscar nomination process.
68	case missed full list year oscar nominee	Missing case l' year of full list nominated at the Oscars.
68	king speech notch top director award movie running darren aronofsky	The King's speech was the first ever award-winning film director Darren Aronofsky.
68	king speech top list academy award nominee nomination true grit inception social network	The King's speech at the top of the Oscar nomination list for the Grit Creative Social Network.
68	oscar nomination king speech rule nod	Appointment Oscar king speech rule shakes head.
68	king speech top film producer award azcentral	King speech Top Film Productor Award Azcentral.
68	social network king speech aim oscar	The social network king's speech is about Oscar.
68	king speech notch top director award bbc news	King's speech tainting the award for Best Director BBC News.
68	dtn uk director guild screen actor guild award picture weekend blur	Dtn uk director of the guild screen actor guild weekend price photo blur image week-end.
68	sag award colin firth best actor natalie portman best actress honor	Colin Firth Award Best Actress: Natalie Portman Best Actress Honoured.
68	oscar nomination academy award nominee watch	Oscar nomination for l' Oscar nominee show academy.
68	geegood post king speech rule oscar nomination ap	Geegood post king speech rule oscar appointment ap.
68	king speech best ensemble sagawards	King speech best ensemble sagawards.
68	king speech won director guild award best director	The King's speech won the Directors Guild the award for Best Director.
68	breaking news king speech take top honor hollywood actor honor best sunday night annual screen ac	Latest news from the king take the podium; honor d' Hollywood actor d' honor best Sunday night annual screen ac ac Sunday night.
68	colinfirth nominated oscar best actor role kingsspeech	Colinfirth was nominated for the best actor, Kingsspeech.
68	fast track sag award king speech roll los angeles time	Fast track Sag Award King speech roll los angeles time.
68	weekend wrap king speech rule sag dgas portman pick trophy weekend	Weekday-end wrap king speeches rule sag dgas portman pick trophy week-end.
68	natalie portman modern family king speech crowned sag winner	Natalie Portman, speech by modern family king crowned sag winner.
68	hooper earns top dga prize king speech hooper won david fincher social network	Hooper wins the first prize Dga King speech hooper won David Fincher social network.
68	king speech crowned head oscar nominee colin firthphoto afpbritish historical drama king speech	King's speech crowned head of Oscar nominee Colin Firthphoto's afpbritish historical drama King's speech.
68	king speech true grit top oscar nomination	King's speech true oscar top nomination courage.
68	king speech awarded best ensemble cast screen actor guild award	The King's speech awarded the Apos Best Actors Guild; ensemble cast screen.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination including best picture full list nominee	Appointment as leader of the speech of the king at the academy, including the name of the best candidate of the complete list.
68	safon oscar nomination list academy award nominee	Oscar safon award nomination list Oscar nominee.
68	king sspeech finally win best picture award pga overtake socialnetwork oscar	King sspeech finally won the prize for the best pga film to surpass social oscar network.
68	king speech lead oscar race nomination reuters reuters king speech british drama	Speech leader oscar king nomination to the reuters reuters race British drama speech king.
68	king speech win major guild award discus sag award win	The King's speech won the discus sag Award Grand Prize.
68	king speech odds oscar glory guardian	Lucky King Oscar's speech guardian of fame.
68	latest headline king speech lead oscar field british star colin firth helena bonham carter nominate	The last major title of the King's speech was nominated by British star Oscar Field, Colin Firth, Helena Bonham Carter.
68	blog post academy award odds king speech lead oscar nomination oscar	Blog post academy of probabilities speeches king Oscar first Oscar nomination oscar.
68	king speech win top director british movie king speech awarded top honour year direct	The King's speech wins the award for best British film director The King's speech is awarded for the best year of his life.
68	king speech reign producer guild award news india stock	The producers' guild of the King's speech rewards India's actions.
68	sag award recap king speech conquers king town king speech recogn dating	SAC Review King's Speech Conquer City King's Speech King's speech recognizes meetings.
68	king speech lead oscar race film stuttering british monarch movie founder	The King of Speech Oscar race film stuttering British monarch monarch founding film.
68	film king speech win producer guild top prize los angeles king speech claimed crown	Film King speeches win producers' guild first prize The King of Los Angeles speech claims the crown.
68	movie nod king speech stir oscar race factbox gt news race	The speech of the king of the head shakes of the film oscar race made of apos; actuality gt race d'apos; actuality.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait	King's speech obviously settles the Oscar bait lot.
68	oscar nominee academy award	He is a member of the Academy of Fine Arts.
68	oscar king speech haven black swan	The Oscar King speech focuses on black swans.
68	king speech usurps throne oscar leader ap queen elizabeth ii dad albert ge movie	King's speech usurps Oscar's throne leader ap Queen Elizabeth ii albert papa ge film.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination	The King's speech will lead to the nomination of d' an Oscar.
68	king speech social network locked oscar battle rttnews academy award nomination	King social speech network locked oscar battle rttnews nomination to Academy Award nomination.
68	hollywood director honor king speech reuters	The director of Apos; Hollywood honors the speech of King Reuters.
68	oscar anounced morning	Octavius s' is up in the morning.
68	king speech top film producer award ap ap king speech claimed crown be	King's speech, best film producer award ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap, king's speech claimed to be crown.
68	dtn hollywood king speech win top honour director guild award london jan ani historical	King Hollywood's speech has won the award for Best Directors Guild in London History.
68	oscar nomination king speech nomination actor colin firth helena bonham carter geoffrey rush	Oscar nomination of l' actor Colin Firth Helena Bonham Carter Geoffrey Rush.
68	boardwalk empire king speech top sag award	Promenade de l' Empire, speech by the King, Sag Award for Best Speech.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination memphis commercial appeal	Appointment as the King's Speech Leader at l'apos; memphis commercial appeal academy.
68	oscar nominee best picture announced morning social network king speech	Oscar nominee best photo announced the King's speech on social media in the morning.
68	weekend wrap king speech rule sag dgas portman pick trophy weekend	Weekday-end wrap king speeches rule sag dgas portman pick trophy week-end.
68	great expectation award natalie portman colin firth screen actor guild	Great Expectations Prix Natalie Portman Colin Firth screen actor guild.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination	The King's speech will lead to the nomination of d' an Oscar.
68	watch king speech win award	Watch King speech win award.
68	ap maker academy award favorite social network king speech competi	King speech contest on the favorite social network of the apo creators; academy.
68	screen actor guild sag award winner full list	The winner of the Sag Prize of the actors' guild has received the complete list.
68	tom hooper king speech winner dga award besting social network david fincher	Tom Hooper King speech dga award besting social network david finer.
68	king speech win top honor director guild award	The King's speech won the award for Best Directors Guild.
68	king speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend king speech director	King speech boardwalk empire score sag award Grand week-end King speech director.
68	oscar nomination list king speech lead nomination	Oscar Nomination List King's speech principal appointment.
68	academy award nominee	You know, Oscar-nominated.
68	king speech win big dgas award season tight race social network	The king's speech wins the big prize season tight race on the social network.
68	social network king speech aim oscar	The social network king's speech is about Oscar.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait ap	The King's speech obviously sets Oscar bait ap ap.
68	blog post oscar nomination nominee announced king speech nomination	The candidate for l' Oscar of the best blog announced the nomination for the speech of the king.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination nomination	Appointment to l'apos; oscar for the king's speech.
68	oscar nomination king speech well worth euro afternoon	A speech by the Oscar nomination king worth one after-midi in euros.
68	king speech honored santa barbara fest ap	The King's speech honored the feast of Santa Barbara ap.
68	king speech dominates sag award win best picture osacrs sagawards thekingsspeech	King's speech dominates the prize to earn better osacrs sagawards thekingsspeech image.
68	list academy award nomination chicago sun time	A list of nominations for the Chicago Suntime Academy Awards.
68	natalie portman colin firth king speech winner sag melissa teo christian bale	Natalie Portman Colin Colin, Canada Day King's Speech Laureate, sagissa melissa teo christian whale.
68	full sag award movie winner	Winner of the Best Sag movie award.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination fact wrong king speech impresse	King's speech first Oscar nomination wrongly impresses speech king speech.
68	thrilled colin firth won best actor sag award well king speech best ensemble woo hoo	Colin Firth won the award for best actor sag award well best speech set woo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo.
68	bbc news king speech lead oscar field	BBC News King speech leader Oscar Field.
68	king speech wint twee screen actor guild award	The speech of the king included the prize of the guild of actors of l' screen twee.
68	king speech dominates oscar nomination	The King's speech dominates the Oscars.
68	screen actor guild award nomination full list peer review academy award ch	Actors Guild Awards; screen Nomination of full list Academic Awards peer review.
68	sag award winner list king speech fighter boardwalk empire rack trophy mawu	The list of S.A.S. award winners includes the King speech imperial warrior walk trophy.
68	full list oscar nominee	Complete list of Oscar nominees.
68	king speech true grit lead oscar nomination	King's speech true courage Oscar nomination Oscar nomination.
68	harry potter ftw complete list annual academy award nomination oscar	Harry Potter ftw complete list of annual Academy Award nominations.
68	king speech lead oscar list film stuttering british monarch movie founder	Oscar speech king lists movies stuttering British monarch founder of the film monarch.
68	king speech oscar nomination ridiculous state union isn till tonight	Speech of King Oscar nomination ridiculous union d' state is till this evening.
68	celebnews king speech tom hooper reign supreme director guild award celebritynews	Celebnews King speech Tom Hooper reign supreme guilds directors reward newss celebrities.
68	gbmiii ap king speech top film producer award los angeles ap king speech claimed	Gbmiii ap king speech Best Los Angeles film producer award ap king speech claimed.
68	oscar nominee	You know, Oscar-nominated.
68	nominee announced annual academy award	The name of the nominee has been announced for the annual prize of the Academy.
68	colin firth natalie portman best actor actress thinking king speech social network	Colin Firth Natalie Portman best actress thinking king social network talk.
68	congrats firth portman bale leo sag award best picture highest award best ensemble king speech	Congratulations to the Firth Portman Ball Leo sag Award Best Picture Best Overall King's Speech.
68	beverly hill calif ap british monarchy saga king speech lead academy award	Beverly Hill Calif saga of British monarchy King speech lead Academy Award.
68	twelve oscar nod king speech approved don understand academy hate leonardo dicaprio	Twelve Oscar nod king approved speech do not include academy hate leonardo dicaprio speech.
68	oscar nomination nolan snubbed king speech roll washington post	Nomination d' Oscar Nolan snubbed the speech of the Washington Post King.
68	king speech rule producer guild award king speech claimed crown best film	Growers Guild Award King's Speech Rule King's Speech declared best film of the crown.
68	oscar nomination king speech earns nod true grit	King of the nomination speech d' Oscar deserves a real nod.
68	imdb firth portman king speech triumph sag award	Imdb Firth Portman King speech award Sag award of triumph.
68	big surprise colin firth natalie portman win sag award	A big surprise, Colin Firth Natalie Portman has won the Sag Award.
68	haha funny news king speech top film producer award ap	Haha funny new speech king best film producer ap price ap ap ap.
68	oscar nod best picture torn king speech inception	Oscar shakes the head best picture torn out of the speech.
68	whitneyport king speech tom hooper reign supreme director guild award	Whitneyport King speech Tom Hooper reigns Supreme Director Guild Award.
68	social network king speech aim oscar ap ap academy award voter poised set	Social network king speech aims oscar academy of voting prizes ready together.
68	firth portman bale leo win screen actor prize ap king speech won best actor trophy sunday	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the prize of l' actor at l' screen ap King speech won trophy for best actor Sunday.
68	mark kermode oscar tip mark kermode verdict year academy award nomination news	Marquez kermode oscar tip mark kermode verdict year academy appointment of new academic awards.
68	king speech land nomination award season favorite social network trail true grit	The nomination season for the speech-writing king on favorite social media charts the true path of courage.
68	king speech oscar nomination beverly hill calif british monarchy saga king speech	King Oscar's speech nomination Beverly Calif British monarchy saga King speech speech.
68	gt annual academy award nomination announced man ve best picture noms	Annual Academy Award nomination announced for best film.
68	social network king speech aim oscar ap ap academy award voter poised set showd	The social network King speech aims oscar ap academy Award voter prepares together shown.
68	king speech usurps throne oscar leader ap	The king's speech usurped the throne of the oscar leader ap ap.
68	king rsquo speech oscar nod daily beast	King Rsquo's speech oscar shakes his head daily.
68	king speech true grit lead oscar race king speech british drama stammering monarch	Speech of the king true courage oscar race king speech English drama stuttering monarch.
68	imdb road oscar academy award	The award of the IMB Road Oscar Award.
68	king speech win producer guild award three year pga winner win acade	The King's speech wins the three-year producer guild winning pga winning acade winning acade.
68	oscar king speech true grit lead nomination examiner	Oscar King Real speech courage first reviewer appointment.
68	king speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend king spe	King speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend King spe.
68	king speech garnered oscar nomination assuring hollywood handful general public watched movie	The King's speech secured the nomination at the Oscars, assuring Hollywood that a handful of spectators watch movies.
68	entent complete list nomination annual academy award	Hear the complete list of annual academic award nominations.
68	carpetbagger will oscar friend nomination academy award will academy award oscar	Carpetbagger will be Oscar friend nomination Academy Award will be Oscar Academy oscar.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait news cnews canada	The King's speech obviously rules oscar bait news cnews canada lot oscar.
68	thefighter best ensemble film king speech will win best picture oscar	The best of the King speech set will win the best of the Oscar.
68	firth portman bale leo win screen actor prize king speech won best actor trophy sunday col	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the prize of l' actor at l' screen King speech won trophy of best actor Sunday Col.
68	oscar nomination full list academy award nominee	Oscars nomination Complete list Oscars nomination Oscars nomination.
68	full list nominee official oscar website	A full list of the nominees is available on the official website of l' Oscar.
68	king speech top directing prize	First prize for directing the king's speech.
68	mynews oscar nomination king speech real contender king speech brit mynews	My new appointment at l'apos, my new speech by the King, my new speech by the King.
68	king speech win best film gong king speech win best film accolade producer guild ameri	The speech king wins the best gong movie speech king wins the best acolade guild of bitter producers.
68	hooper boost oscar chance dga win king speech tom hooper won director movie	Hooper booster oscar chance dga win King speech Tom Hooper win film director.
68	king speech star santa barbara international film festival santa barbar artimpactnetpr	King's speech star Santa Barbara International Santa Barbar film festival artimpactnetpr.
68	king speech top screen actor guild award winner mtv movie music	King speech top screen actor guild wins film music award mtv.
68	bbc news king speech lead oscar field	BBC News King speech leader Oscar Field.
68	dtn hollywood king speech dominates oscar nomination feedburner share friend ente	The dtn hollywood king speech dominates the Oscar nomination process.
68	portman firth speech win sag award los angeles jan upi star king speech ho	Portman Firth speech win awards the angeles Jan upi star king speech ho ho.
68	reuters celebs hollywood actor honor king speech los angeles reuters oscar front runner king	Reuters famous Hollywood actor honor speech by King Los Angeles reuters Oscar-winning head runner Oscar.
68	fantastic news gt king speech lead oscar field nomination	The fantastic new speech of the king leads Oscar nomination in the field.
68	king speech won top prize weekend hollywood actor director securing standing	The King's speech won the weekend's first prize-Hollywood end d&apos acting director securing standing position.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination including best picture	Appointment for the King's Speech Leader at the Academy, including best photo.
68	king speech top directing prize	First prize for directing the king's speech.
68	screen actor guild award list winner sag king speech reign supreme edie falco	The film actors guild winners list sag king speech supreme reign Edie falco supreme speech.
68	lfc king speech nominated oscar bad considering game	In the speech of the king of l' lc, Oscar was named bad considering the game.
68	oscar race speed sag award news	Hey, Oscar's running speed sag news.
68	oscar nomination box office help king speech soar tuesday dilemma box	The box office of nominations helps the King's speech at s' elevate to-above the box of dilemma Tuesday.
68	king speech lead oscar race nomination nominee annual academy award	Nominated for Apos; Apos Runner Award; Academy, annual nomination for World Champion title.
68	king speech boardwalk empire nab sag award king speech continued reign hbo prohibiti	King speech boardwalk empire nab sag award King speech continued reign hbo prohibiti.
68	hellothere king speech win sag award king speech win best actor trophy sunday bythere	Where the king's speech wins sag prize, the king's speech wins the best actor trophy on Sunday.
68	yesterday brilliant deserves oscar gold hooper top dga prize king speech abc	Yesterday, brilliant deserves Oscar or hooper top dga prize abc king speech.
68	annual academy award nomination announced film	Appointment to l' annual academy of the advertised film.
68	el talent king speech cast honored santa barbara international film	Talent King's speech paid homage to the international film Santa Barbara.
69	court third party sue retaliation case	There's a third party suing a retaliation case.
69	court third party bias protection broad washington jan upi supreme court ruled unanimously	The Washington Supreme Court ruled unanimously in favor of bias protection for third parties.
69	fox news	Hey, news on the fox.
69	supreme court refuse hear appeal anti gay	The Supreme Court will refuse to hear the appeal against the gays.
69	supreme court pass poultry case	Supreme Court dismisses the poultry case.
69	supreme court nasa intrusive background check	Nasa Supreme Court intrusive background check.
69	high court third party sue retaliation case	A High Court third party is prosecuting a retaliation case.
69	supreme court rule man sue firm retaliation	The supreme court's lawman pursues the company in retaliation.
69	supreme court issue landmark decision constitution void	The Supreme Court handed down a landmark decision, and the constitution was declared null and void by the Supreme Court.
69	supreme court doubtful personal privacy false person	Dubious supreme court of personal privacy fake person.
69	supreme court fiancee complaining worker protected retaliation	The fiancee of the Supreme Court, the plaintiff, protected the worker from reprisals.
69	supreme court refuse reinstate circuit global warming case	The supreme court refuses to reinstate the global warming trial.
69	supreme court temporarily halt georgia execution	Supreme Court temporarily suspends execution of Georgia.
69	decision amount dressing circuit	Band-Aid decision amount circuit.
69	supreme court stay okla water fight	Remain supreme court after battle d' water okla.
69	justice extend protection workplace retaliation supreme court ruled employer sued	The courts extend protection in the workplace The Supreme Court ruled that the employer was being sued.
69	recognized supreme court harmful organic sector organic	Recognized by supreme court as harmful to the organic sector.
69	supreme court considers foia protects corporate personal privacy public record law	The Supreme Court considers that the faitha protects corporate privacy.
69	justice extend protection workplace retaliation supreme court ruled employer sued	The courts extend protection in the workplace The Supreme Court ruled that the employer was being sued.
70	invite read cap blog connection join dialogue bullying	Read Cap blog connection join dialogue bullying.
70	golden rule treated jolla high take stand bullying	The Dapos rule treated High as a bully.
70	child safety fredericksburg three key preventing bully encounter	Children's safety Fredericksburg three keys to keep bullies from meeting.
70	ashley nj teen launch anti bullying program	Ashley N.J. Adolescent launches a program to combat bullying.
70	charity slam asbo replacement plan tackle anti social behaviour will repla	The charity slam asbo replacement anti-social behavior plan will be repeated.
70	resource teacher parent film consequence schoolviolence bullying	The head teacher filmed the consequences of violence in the school intimidating students.
70	teen creates anti bullying school program	An adolescent creates a school program to fight bullying.
70	national attention technological harassment cyber bullying	National Attention Cyber cyber cyber harassment-bullying.
70	parent student educator tip preventing bullying ten district school organized event	Peer educators; students to prevent suicide; bullying Ten district schools organized an event.
70	book guide child therapist calling week parenting stopbullying	Therapist-children's guide who calls week d' parenting to stop intimidation.
70	bully sense anxiety relaxation technique	Bullies sense relaxation technique of anxiety.
70	standing bully employee leading example excellent article	A tyrannical employee giving the apos; excellent article example.
70	bull parent educator guide cyber bullying facebook twitter like changing lif	Guide to l' parent educator cyber bullying Facebook like changing life.
70	final post series bullying work place business handle bullying	L' company post @- final series on the work place s' occupies of the intimidation.
70	recording artist michael marisa help bullying victim amazing song video	Recording artist Michael Marisa helps victims of bullying make an amazing song video.
70	st andrew st michael school hold second annual bullying awareness conference	St. Andrew St. Michael School organizes its second annual bullying awareness conference.
70	parent feel helpless bully picking kid tip bully proofing child	Parents feel powerless to choose a child for themselves.
70	calling participate calling week january	January week call to attendees.
70	ll sporting mine will mac wednesday february anti bullying day	It will be mine Wednesday, February, the day of intimidation.
70	news workshop preventing bullying positive behavior support school	Prevention information; bullying in positive behaviour support schools.
70	hurriyet turkish center help workplace bullying victim return job market	The Turkish Hurriyet helps victims of bullying to return to the job market.
70	autism awareness month education key bully	Awareness Month; autism Education of key bullying.
70	loved sense humor article help bully proofing child gt	J' loves it; article on l' sensual humor that helps bullies protect children from bullying.
70	penalty law biased favor bullying school workplace issue	Sanctions law promotes bullying in the workplace.
71	boosting america fashion	U.S. fashion upgrades.
72	smart money future mixed ahead data earnings market update stock future mi investing money	L' the future; smart money future data Updates of future stock market earnings; money.
72	check finance news stock market gain money stock exchange time famous	Check stock market finance news earning money; time famous stock market money.
72	wall street set edge labour market data eyed gmt future dow jones	Wall Street labour market data has highlighted the future dow jones of the future.
72	stock future higher investor refocus economy york reuters stock	Future stock more than; investors re-focus; economy york reuters stock.
72	winning large stock market winning large stock market individual trading stock	Winning large stock exchanges win large stock markets for individual shares on the stock exchange.
72	today stock market dow jones industrial average dji nasdaq	Today, the average stock market dow Jones industrial dji nasdaq.
72	stock climb merger deal stock boost onslaught corporate merger market open monday	Share Increases Fusion d' Shares Fusion d' D&apos merger market raid; Open companies Monday.
72	invest stock market money rich investment advice	Inform-you about the stock markets, the stock markets, the rich investments, the rich investments and the investment advice.
72	market today today stock market dow jones industrial average dji nasdaq info	Bursary today; stock market dow jones medium industrial dji nasdaq stock market information.
72	stock share online stock trading buy stock online today stock market news sabmiller tale inves	Online stock exchange; online stock purchase; online stock purchase today; new stock exchange story spreads invest.
72	stock market daily stock market analysis january nse asi retreat	Daily stock market analysis Janvier nse asian retreat.
72	stock climb merger deal stock boost onslaught corporate merger market open monday	Share Increases Fusion d' Shares Fusion d' D&apos merger market raid; Open companies Monday.
73	nyc feb entrepreneur fashion lover networkers join brightnight join	Nyc feb entrepreneur in love with fashion networkers join the sleepless night join.
73	nyfall fashion week feb ny fashion week fall will feb	Neve fashion week feb ny fashion week fall will feb feb feb feb.
73	fashion week fall fashion week hot list hot list fall fashion week check	The fashion week d' autumn, fashion week, blacklist, fashion week d' autumn.
73	eve fashion week nyc entrepreneur fashion lover networkers join brightnight	Fashion entrepreneurs join us on the eve of fashion week for an all-nighter.
73	brightnight networking entrepreneur smallbiz owner top influencer nyc	Good night networking entrepreneur Smallbiz owner top influenceur nyc.
74	horse wagering legal sport lounge bet zieralski mike merrigan wife lisa oc tave	Horse betting in legal sports salons was made by Zieralski mike merrigan Lisa oc tave's wife.
74	horse racing handicapping	Horse racing disability.
74	laying horse betfair route	L' route of the horse fair.
74	race santa anita friday horse betting money race santa anita park friday janu	The race santa anita Friday horse bet money race santa anita park Friday janu janu.
74	horse wagering legal sport lounge bet mile existing racetrack tra	Betting on horses in an existing racetrack in a legal sports room at kilometre d&apos.
74	comment horse racing tip free daily thoroughbred tag betting tip delta down fairground	Comment horses runners for free tip tag pure-blood daily tip delta Down Fairground.
74	horse racing factor bet reliable	The horse racing factor bet on reliability.
74	horse racing oc tavern bar state offer track horse betting	A tavern bar with horse racing and horse racing.
74	saturday horse racing betting advice	Horse racing betting notice on Saturday.
75	facebook privacy setting jour	C' is the first time that j' comes into contact with them.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user facebook privacy setting extremely detailed	Configuring user facebook facebook user privacy Extremely detailed privacy configuration.
75	watch video learn protect privacy identity personal safety facebook profile	Watch video learn to protect privacy personal identity profile facebook personal security profile.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	social medium marketing medical field facebook privacy hcsm	Social media marketing medical field Facebook privacy hcsm hcsm.
75	facebook profile harvested setting dating site facebook user unwitting	Profile facebook collected Facebook dating site unwitting Facebook user.
75	changing facebook place privacy setting opportunity business location based mobile marketin	Change facebook place privacy opportunity d' business based business; mobile market location based market.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	naughty facebook started sharing personal detail site day turn fb	Bad facebook started sharing personal details site day fb tour fb.
75	facebook privacy breakthrough	Facebook has made a breakthrough in privacy issues.
75	change facebook privacy setting	Change the facebook privacy setting.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	Stealth mode making invisible facebook personal financial news yahoo fina.
75	facebook privacy setting nicholas jackson facebook privacy option	Confidentiality of facebook nicholas Jackson facebook privacy option.
75	protect personal facebook	Please, protect your personal facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook finally offer http change setting	Facebook finally offer http change configuration.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	news update step checking facebook privacy	Updating the facebook privacy check step.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	Stealth mode making invisible facebook personal financial news yahoo fina.
75	facebook bug allows personal data access phishing repaired washington feb facebook security	The facebook bug allows the personal data phishing repaired Washington facebook security.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	cnn hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pa	Cnn hack facebook unlocks facebook security by adding the security feature pa pa.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	great tip protecting privacy facebook receive lot question	Great tip for privacy facebook receive many questions.
75	minute update setting facebook secure enabling http	Configuration of facebook minutes update securing the http activation.
75	will facebook privacy seriously site import facebook profile permission cnn	Facebook privacy seriously site d' Facebook profile import permission cnnn.
75	official facebook video talking privacy setting watch	On Facebook, the video talks about privacy.
75	facebook instant personalization endangers online privacy consider disabling	Facebook instant personalization puts online privacy at risk.
75	full http support facebook making site secure user fb	Full http support facebook make the site secure user fb.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	Stealth mode making invisible facebook personal financial news yahoo fina.
75	blog protect facebook account hacker fbs security feature	Blog protect account facebook hacker fbs security feature.
75	facebook roll encryption wake ceo fan hacked security central facebook	Facebook rolls encryption wake fan Ceo hacked central security facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	cnn tech hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature afte	Cnn tech hack facebook unlocks facebook security with an after-the-fact security feature.
75	change security setting facebook protect account international business time	Configuring facebook change security protect time d' international account business.
75	famous facebook flip flop social networking goliath number hasty move year	The famous Facebook flip flop social networking number Goliath Fast Moving Year Fast Move.
75	hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pair	Hack facebook unlocks security by adding a pair of security features.
75	facebook adding full http support website secure user fb	Facebook add the complete secure user fb http support website.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	changing facebook place privacy setting roll facebook place location glo	Change facebook place privacy roll facebook place glo place glo.
75	tech hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pair	Facebook techno hack unlocks facebook security by adding a security feature pair.
75	facebook great personal careful reveal online privacy security	Facebook great personal care reveal online privacy.
75	privacy setting facebook user	Configuration of the privacy of l' user facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook instant personalization privacy setting sharing innermost secret	Instant facebook customization privacy sharing the most intimate secrets.
75	tech cnn hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature	The PCN hack facebook unlocks facebook security by adding a security feature.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
76	sundance time catch celebrity sighting glimpse going sundance festival	Sunset time allows celebrities to catch a glimpse of the sun dance festival.
76	huffingtonpost sundance film festival james franco three company installation	Huffington post Sundance james festival free three company facilities.
76	james franco sundance drag	James franco sundance drag.
76	paul rudd jesse peretz bushy beard sundance comedy idiot brother paulrudd jesseperetz sundance	Paul Rudd Jesse Peretz, bearded actor, bearded actor, idiot actor, brother Pauludd Jesseperetz, bearded actor.
76	james franco wig sundance jared blogging inside decked bing bar	James french wig sundance jared blogging in decked bar.
76	actress farmiga sundance directing debut reuters reuters vera farmiga big breakout	L' actress farmiga sundance realizing first reuters reuters vera farmiga great escape.
76	anton yelchin choked felicity jones mtv sundance celebrity photo booth	Anton Yelchin choked out Felicity Jones mtv Sundance, celebrity photo stand.
76	star head sundance	Head sundance d' star.
76	kristin kreuk sundance stroll rachael leigh cook kristin kreuk rachael leigh cook greet crowd	Kristin Kreuk walk of the sun rachael leigh kristin kreuk cook rachael leigh cook cooking leigh greetings crowd.
76	sundance film festival celebrity sighting	It's a film festival of the sun, famous people in sight.
76	star head sundance	Head sundance d' star.
76	james franco wear blonde wig sundance	James Franco wears a blonde wig sundance.
76	moviefone intrview makingof interview sundance filed celebrity interview video sundance film fe	Moviefone intrview making of interview sundance uploaded a video of celebrity interviews sundance film ff.
76	elizabeth olsen sundance film festival debut sister footstep theatrical	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Film festival first sister no theatrical theater.
76	check interviewing danny glover houseofswagg sundance thedreamisreal	Check with Danny Glover House ofswagg sundance Thedreamisrealreal.
76	hott cold sundance film festival lola blog	Hott cold Sundance film festival lola blog.
76	photo sundance film festival star park city utah	Sundance film festival star park Utah city.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Sun-dancing film festival for a celebrity.
76	sundance day strange celebrity encounter steve carell elijah wood full day sundanc	On Sundays, strange celebrities meet Steve Carell Elijah Wood all day long.
76	james franco suzanne summer will nom tmrw	James Franco-Suzanne Summer will be appointed tmrw.
76	james franco best actor nom mobbed sundance film festival	James Franco best actor name mobbed Sundance film festival name.
76	demi moore ashton kutcher sexy sundance showbiz spy	Moore Ashton Kutcher Sexy Sundance, spy for showbiz.
76	chelsea handler cozy andre balazs sundance	Chelsea handler cozy andre balazs sundance.
76	james franco sundance drag	James franco sundance drag.
76	james franco sundance drag tmz	James franco sundance drag tmz.
76	booker tweet sundance film festival brings brick city park city	Booker tweets sun film festival brings Brick City Park City.
76	mnh photo sundance film festival	The film festival of the sun dance.
76	photo blair underwood sundance film festival park city utah promoting film homework	Blair Underwood film festival Sundance city park d&apos photography; Utah film duty promotion.
76	cent sundance work progess	C' is a work before-garde.
76	james franco sundance drag	James franco sundance drag.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Sun-dancing film festival for a celebrity.
76	catch janelle monae prince msg unreal sundance sexytime park city	Chopper Janelle Monae Prince Msg irresistible sundance sextime park city.
76	sundance interview demi moore airing tonight	L' Sunance Demi Moore interview aired tonight.
76	post celebrity news chelsea handler recount sundance weekend kendra wilkinson hugh hefner	After the celebrity news broke, chelsea handler reported on Sundance's-end of the week, Kendra Wilkinson Hugh Hefner.
76	sundance day strange celebrity encounter steve carell elijah wood full day sundanc	On Sundays, strange celebrities meet Steve Carell Elijah Wood all day long.
76	john salley sundance	John salley sundance.
76	bryan safi brett erlich sundance bryan safi brett erlich braved cold swiped swag	Bryan safi brett erlich sundance bryan safi brett erlich braved cold swag swiped.
76	mary kate ashley olsen younger sister hit sundance	Mary Kate Ashley, the younger sister of Olsen, hit Sundance.
76	sundance today tobey maguire demi moore kate bosworth tobey maguire waitin	Sunday in Maguire; today in Moore Half Maguire Kate Bosworth wait in Maguire.
76	sundance film festival bing style check scene sundance film festival bing	Sun Film Festival Bing style verification scene sun festival bing bing sun film festival.
76	anton yelchin choked felicity jones mtv sundance celebrity photo booth	Anton Yelchin choked out Felicity Jones mtv Sundance, celebrity photo stand.
76	sundance sexytime park city sundance	Sextime park city sundance sundance.
76	makeshift portrait studio sundance	The fortune portrait studio sundance.
76	elizabeth olsen sundance breakout star elizabeth olsen hit premiere movie martha marcy marl	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Star Elizabeth Olsen made the premiere of the film, Martha Marcy Marl.
76	phife dawg atcq speaking sundance film festival video	Phife dawg atcq speaking video of Sundance Film Festival.
76	kate bosworth happy sundance day	Kate Bosworth happy day in the sun.
76	post james franco sings sundance	It is important to note that this is not the case.
76	best photo day sundance swag edition eminem chuck dueces best pic	Best Sunday photo edition swag eminem chuck dueces best photo ever.
76	penn badgley snowboarding sundance penn badgley snowboard burton snowboard park city mountai	Penn badgley snowboard sundance penn badgley snowboard burton snowboard park city Mountai.
76	robert redford open anniversary sundance film festival protest planned	Robert Redford organizes a celebration to celebrate the anniversary of the film festival in Sundance.
76	sundance familiar territory elizabeth bank omg	On Sunday, familiar territory d' Elizabeth Bank Omg.
76	tmz sez james franco sundance drag filed james franco hitechcj	Tmz sez james franco sundance drag deposited james franco hitechcj.
76	gallery celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Sun-dancing film festival with gallery celebrities.
76	le site picked bmw lab james franco blond sundance advice wannabe nude art model	The site chose bmw lab james blonde blond blonde council d' a future model d' naked art.
76	star head sundance	Head sundance d' star.
76	mario lopez rick foxx dr jackson avery grey sundance	And Mario Lopez Rick Foxx Dr Jackson very gray Sundance.
76	best picture lil jon sundance	And best picture is Lil Jon Sundance.
76	sundance zooey deschanel rocking miniskirt blazer degree weather	Sunance zooey Deschanel throw down miniskirt blazer degree weather.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Sun-dancing film festival for a celebrity.
76	urban gossip iphone app event fab ybf celebs hit sundance film festival yb africanamerican	Urban gossip iphone event fab ybf celebrities hit the yb Afro-American film festival.
76	photo star sundance hollywood contingent set shop mid	The Hollywood contingent is set up in the middle of the studio.
76	lizzie olsen storm sundance film festival kevin dolak buzz worthy film premiering week	Lizzie Olsen Storm Sundance Film festival kevin dolak humming worthy film first week of film.
76	eliza dushku drop sundance adorable ll admit thing eliza dushku	It's a great way to get a feel for the world.
76	james franco platinum blonde hilarious jac	James Franco platinum blonde hilarious Jac.
76	chris hemsworth lead celebrity storm tao sundance ministry appreciates sundance film festival founder	Chris Hemsworth, Prime Minister of the Ministry of Sunstroke appreciates the founder of the film festival.
77	whycollegenow present college scholarship fantastic post college scholar	Why collegenow present the university scholarship fantastic post-university.
77	financial aid low income student sdut	Low income student financial assistance sdut.
77	cost financial aid chicago school professional psychology	Financial assistance Professional psychology at school in Chicago.
77	workshop offer help student aid form regional workshop open help faf	L' workshop offer; student assistance; student assistance; a regional workshop open to the public; a workshop open to the public.
77	student juvenile arthritis apply college scholarship staff report arthritis foundation	Students studying juvenile arthritis apply for scholarships; college staff report foundation for arthritis.
77	master phd scholarship university manitoba canada beasiswa scholarship	Canadian Institute for Health Information; Canadian Institute for Health Information; Canadian Institute for Health Information.
77	calum miller mba scholarship university edinburgh uk beasiswa scholarship	Apos Scholarship; Miller Mba de l'apos calum studies; Edinburgh University uk beasiswa.
77	pell grant set academic year	The Pell Scholarship was set for the academic year.
77	time thinking financial aid join fafsa day sunday dean	Time to think about l' financial assistance join fafsa day sunday Dean.
77	fuji xerox setsutaro kobayashi memorial fund foreign student grant japan beasi	Fuji xerox setsutaro kobayashi memorial fund for beasi beasi foreign students.
77	tracyjones college student file fafsa fafsa government eligibility	Tracyjones university student file fafsa fafsa government eligibility.
77	assistance offered student aid form	Assistance has been provided in the form of a student assistance form.
77	cal grant financial aid application california student launched student maximize aid option app	Application for grants; financial assistance California student launched student maximize opportunity; option d' assistance app option.
77	great info college financial aid time apply	Great info Time d' college financial assistance; applies.
77	announcement lyon township high school host free college financial planning seminar feb patch	Announces that lyon township high school d' organize school financial planning seminar February.
77	toyota renews scholarship program donation american indian college fund denver jan prnewswi	Toyota renews the scholarship program from the Denver Jan prnewswi Indian College Fund.
77	unique college scholarship student	One-time scholarship student at the university.
77	mba scholarship nottingham university business school uk beasiswa scholarship	MBA scholarship for l' business school of l' University of Nottingham scholarship Uk beasiswa.
77	uic scholarship aid uic honor college business student university illinois chicago scholarship	A scholarship to study helps a business student from the University of Apos; to obtain a university scholarship in Chicago.
77	college best financial aid arizona state university	The University of Apos, Arizona's best financial aid.
77	black men america scholarship deadline february female student apply	The deadline for American scholarships for black men is February.
77	kid set college time fill fafsa	Children's time at the university fills the gap.
77	asia pacific entrepreneur award golden key international honour society beasiswa scholarship	An entrepreneur from Asia Pacific decorated with apos; a beasiswa grant from the International Society of Apos.
77	find free college grant money find free college grant money find free college gran grant	Find the money from the scholarship, free studies, find the money from the scholarship, free studies, find the money from the scholarship.
77	applying financial aid groundless myth	Apply the principles; financial aid myths unfounded.
77	live state massachusetts financial aid college	Ecole d'apos; state of Massachusetts financial aid.
77	international scholarship bangor university uk beasiswa scholarship	Bangor International Scholarship University uk beasiswa scholarships.
77	thing private scholarship college solution usnews	This thing, it's scholarship money, a school, a school, a school.
77	beth yarrow memorial award medical science university south wale australia beasi	Beth Yarrow Memorial Award in medical science University of South Wale australia beasi.
77	scholarship advice inside financial aid office college planning help	Bursaries; studies at home; interior de l'apos; financial assistance office of college planning help to plan.
77	applying federal student aid fear fafsa	Applying the federal student aid program is a threat.
77	phd position biophysical chemistry lund university sweden beasiswa scholarship	Phd position biophysics chemistry University Lund sweden beasiswa scholarship d' studies.
77	news release high school student apply scholarship novec electric cooperative	News release A high school student is applying for a co-op education grant.
77	cash college workshop tomorrow find location	We'll have a workshop on apo; university money tomorrow.
77	master scholarship international relation austria beasiswa scholarship	Scholarship Masters in International Relations austria beasiswa scholarship d' studies.
77	strader organ scholarship competition college conservatory music university cincinnati usa university	Apos scholarship competition; strader conservatory music school Conservatory university cincinnati usa university.
77	sixth annual avnet tech game offer scholarship networking opportunity winning student will	Sixth annual technology game d' offering networking grants opportunity winning student will be.
77	asia center graduate summer grant harvard university usa beasiswa scholarship	Asia center graduate of apos; was awarded Harvard University usa beasiswa scholarships; studies.
77	financial aid help woman school hispanic scholarship	L' financial assistance to help Hispanic students apply for scholarships.
77	financial aid proper method financial aid education applying financial aid financial aid essay	Financial Assistance Correct method Financial assistance Education applying the program; financial assistance Test-and-test financial assistance; financial assistance.
77	beaumont quartet scholarship beaumont high girl signed letter intent college	Beaumont Beaumont High Girl's quartet scholarship Signed letter d' intent college.
77	undergraduate scholarship international college hotel management australia beasiswa schola	Scholarship in international undergraduate hotel management australia beasiswa schola schola.
77	college scholarship white picket college tag college financial aid college scholarship money college sch	Scholarships, scholarships, picketing, scholarships, scholarships, financial assistance, bursaries, bursaries, bursaries, bursaries, bursaries, bursaries.
77	post financial aid college lt gt financial advice lt gt popular lt gt lt gt	After financial assistance, the college offers financial advice and advice.
77	winning scholarship college third edition in college scholarship auction ebay	Winner of a bursary; university 3rd edition auction of bursaries; college; ebay university.
77	undergraduate scholarship university ontario institute technology uoit canada beasiswa	Apos scholarship; undergraduate university studies Ontario institute of technology u o canada beasiswa.
77	academic merit scholarship melbourne institute business technology indonesia beasiswa	Melbourne Institute of Commercial Technology, indonesia beasiswa University Award.
77	financial aid pry money cold stingy finger financial aid office appeal fafsa finan	Financial assistance draw from money; cold money pinger desk d'apos; financial assistance call fafsa financing.
77	find college scholarship money scholarship institute	To find an institute for the award of bursaries and fellowships.
77	time start applying college scholarship literally thousand scholarship	It's time to start applying the scholarship literally thousand scholarships.
77	lh ainsworth cancer scholarship university south wale australia beasiswa	Lh ainsworth fellowship; cancer studies South Wale australia beasiswa University.
77	john orr award university edinburgh uk beasiswa scholarship	John Orr receives a scholarship from the University of Edinburgh uk beasiswa.
77	college funding financing help free scholarship money technorati tag college funding college	University funding helps with scholarships; free studies technorati tag college funding; university.
77	postdoctoral fellowship cancer duke university usa beasiswa scholarship	Postdoctoral fellowships in cancer research duke University usa beasiswa dapos scholarship; studies.
77	crowley expands scholarship program nicaragua exemplary student awarded scholarship	Crowley expands scholarship program in Nicaragua.
78	tax proposed fund flood relief	Proposed tax; relief of capital; flood.
78	cost australia flooding enormous news atlanta nyc	Cost australia flood enormous news from Atlanta nyc.
78	cbc ticker southeast australia brace flood australia deadly flood crisis forced people	The cbc ticker from the south-is from l'apos; Australia paddock Australian flood crisis d'apos; deadly flood forced people to force.
78	australia flooding cost enormous	The cost of flooding in Australia is very high.
78	australia flooding cost enormous flooding australia people making	Australian flooding cost a huge Australian flood.
78	australia deadly flood crisis forced people flee home monday vast swath muddy water spr	Australia's deadly flood crisis forced people to flee their homes on Monday, a massive spr mudslide.
78	australia brace flood	Australian neck brace flooding.
78	australia brace flood giant inland sea floodwater will spread australian state vi	The Australian Inland Sea's giant flood waters will spread the Apos; Australian state vi.
78	scary cyclone yasi compare latest news queensland flood news au	Terrible cyclone yasi compares the latest flood news in Queensland.
78	queensland flood blog arrived brisbane january surprised green	The blog Queensland flood blog arrived brisbane January surprised green.
78	southeast australia set week flood	Australia has created a week of flooding.
79	check darth vader superbowl ad hysterical vw academy commercial starring bill hater hadder	Check out darth vader superbowl and hysterical vw commercial starring Bill Hater Hadder.
79	watch bud light superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Check out bud light's superbowl, youtube ad blitz commercial channel.
79	motorola attack apple superbowl commercial motorola apple	Motorola will attack apple superbowl commercial motorola apple.
79	superbowl commercial kale fooducate	Superbowl kale fooducate commercial.
79	video favorite superbowl commercial cute	Favorite SuperBowl cute commercial video.
79	ford commercial win superbowl	The Ford brand will win the Super Bowl.
79	kia epic ride commercial	Kia epic ride commercial kia epic.
79	motorola xoom super bowl commercial tip hat apple spot video	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak hat apple spot video.
79	superbowl commercial doritos pepsi stoked commercial sucked	The superbowl commercial doritos pepsi stoked commercial succe aspiré pub.
79	bud light good start superbowl	Superbowl bud light bulb good start superbowl.
79	chrysler air super bowl commercial	Commercial chrysler air super bowl.
79	enjoyed vw beetle commercial superbowl favorite	J' liked the commercial superbowl preferred beetles.
79	commercial superbowl beer doritos car	Superbowl beer doritos commercial car doritos.
79	cb super bowl commercial favorite	Cb Commercial super bowl favorite.
79	best super bowl commercial year bridgestone beaver	The best super bowl of Bridgestone commercial year beaver.
79	eminem brisk bizarre hip hop commercial	Eminem suddenly weird weird hip hop commercial weird.
79	check video super bowl heineken commercial verry funny	Super Bowl video heineken commercial verry funny.
79	cutest vader volkswagen star war commercial air super bowl	Cuteest commercial air super bowl Vader Volkswagen Star War.
79	waiting tasteless violent pepsi tribute ronald reagan commercial superbowl	Waiting for a tasteful, violent pepsi tribute to Ronald Reagan commercial superbowl.
79	best commercial superbowl imported detroit chrysler spot	The best commercial superbowl imported from Detroit Chrysler spot.
79	volkswagen sneak peek cute superbowl commercial fav	Volkswagen throw a dapos; cute eye Superbowl commercial favorites.
79	commercial liking superbowl pepsi	A commercial who loves superbowl pepsi.
79	issue super bowl commercial	You know, advertise the Super Bowl.
79	volkswagen super bowl commercial force	Volkswagen Super Bowl commercial force.
79	gonna lie bud light commercial musketeer pretty funny superbowl	I'm gonna m&apos m' elongate bud light commercial musketeer pretty fun superbowl.
79	superbowl kia optimum epic ride big game commercial bimarketing blog comunidade market	Superbowl kia optimal epic tour, big game commercial bimarketing blog comunidade market.
79	problem doritos commercial punchline start superbowl	Problem doritos commercial joke startup superbowl Superbowl.
79	complete list super bowl commercial advertiser youtube	Complete list Super Bowl advertiser youtube youtube.
79	dorritos pepsi commercial tyrant superbowl commercial	Dorritos Pepsi commercial superbowl commercial tyrant superbowl commercial superbowl.
79	chevy volt commercial prolly best simple tell great story nicely brandbowl superbowl	Chevy Volt commercial prolly better simply tell a beautiful story brandbowl superbowl.
79	cutest superbowl commercial darth vader	Darth Vader's cutest commercial super bowl.
79	watch chrysler superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look at the chrysler superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel.
79	happy friday volkswagen super bowl ad ur fav superbowl ad time	Merry Friday Volkswagen Super Bowl and l' time for Super Bowl.
79	best superbowl commercial year stella adrian brody	It's the best superbowl in the world; the commercial year of Stella Adrian Brody.
79	bad best commercial movie trailer random urge buy doritos bud light superbowl	The trailer announces the best commercial movie bad random craving buy doritos superbowl bud light.
79	don rooting superbowl volkswagen budweiser best commercial	Don l' in rooting superbowl volkswagen budweiser best commercials.
79	ad watch blogging commercial nyt	To watch the advert nyt commercial nyt nyt.
79	super bowl commercial	Super bowl commercial.
79	volkswagon commercial superbowl	Commercial volkswagon super bowl.
79	watch sony ericsson superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Watch sony Ericsson superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel.
79	happy friday volkswagen super bowl ad ur fav superbowl ad time	Merry Friday Volkswagen Super Bowl and l' time for Super Bowl.
79	favorite superbowl commercial doritos snicker darth vader volkswagen commercial pretty funny	Commercial Superbowl favorite doritos snicker darth vader volkswagen commercial pretty funny.
79	best commercial hold closer tiny dancer budlight superbowl	Best publicity hold closer the superbowl of dancers light.
79	lmao didn feistyoldpeople chevy commercial superbowl	Imao n&apos, didn't drive the commercial Chevy Superbowl people out.
79	imported detroit best commercial superbowl chrysler	Imported from Detroit the best commercial chrysler superbowl.
79	beetle commercial creative superbowl great teaser	Superbowl commercial creative big teaser beetle.
79	favorite superbowl commercial vw	Superbowl favorite commercial VW.
79	motorola xoom superbowl ad reference	Motorola xoom superbowl reference advertising.
79	doritos pepsi zone commercial woman bear superbowl	Doritos pepsi commercial zone woman arbore superbowl.
79	dumb as skechers commercial wack as kimkardashian superbowl worst	Stupid as skechers ad wack as kimkardashian superbowl worst.
79	watch volkswagen superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel escarabaajoos	Look at Volkswagen superbowl ad youtube ad blitz escarabaajoos.
79	vote best superbowl commercial time awesome	Vote the best superbowl advertising time.
79	superbowl budweiser product placement favorite commercial	Superbowl budweiser favorite commercial placement product.
79	brasky doritos commercial win superbowl	Brasky doritos wins the super bowl.
79	chevy run deep chevrolet commercial superbowl ad check imabuzzagent	Chevrolet in depth Chevrolet ad superbowl check out imabuzzagent.
79	andreawoo talked chrysler superbowl commercial	Etreawoo mentioned the commercial Chrysler Superbowl.
79	doritos superbowl commercial	Commercial doritos superbowl.
79	pepsi max bringing nite wait mcdonalds note commercial rule nfl superbowl brandbowl	Pepsi max bringing nite expected mcdonalds note the commercial rule nfl superbowl markbowl rule.
79	popular superbowl commercial superbowl view feb fb share tweet	Popular superbowl commercial superbowl fb fb shares the tweet.
79	volkswagen commercial force superbowl toocute	Volkswagen commercial force superbowl toocute superbowl.
79	diddy star superbowl ad mercedes diddy featured superbowl ad mercedes	Diddy star superbowl ad mercedes diddy &quot presented superbowl ad mercedes.
79	doritos creep best commercial superbowl	And doritos attract the best commercial superbowls.
79	budwiser continued commercial air superbowl sunday swag	Budwiser continued superbowl d' commercial air on Sunday swag swag.
79	superbowl commercial kale fitblog	Superbowl commercial kale fitblog kale.
79	best super bowl commercial commercial super bowl cream advertisi	The best commercial Super Bowl Super Bowl Super Bowl advertisi cream advertising.
79	hilarious doritos commercial pitched superbowl	The hilarious commercial Doritos launched the superbowl.
79	ditto pepsi max commercial win lmao superbowl	Das Pepsi max publicity win lmao superbowl.
79	watching superbowl check chrysler commercial omg	Watch Superbowl check Chrysler commercial omg omg.
79	super bowl commercial	Super bowl commercial.
79	motorward kia optimum epic ride super bowl commercial	Commercial epic Super Bowl ride engine optimum Kia engine.
79	ford paid shit load commercial air time superbowl	Ford paid the shit, time to stop; superbowl commercial antenna.
79	youtube video sauna doritos superbowl commercial ad	Youtube video sauna doritos superbowl commercial ad superbowl.
79	fast black beetle	That's a fast black beetle.
79	audi commercial best superbowl	This is the best superbowl in the business.
79	superbowl ad ehhhh doritos funny lame brandbowl	Superbowl ad ehh doritos funny brandbowl lame.
79	teamfollowback super bowl commercial doritos don hurt dog dog	Super Bowl commercial doritos don't hurt dogs, do they?
79	great commercial vw america video volkswagen passat super bowl xlv commercial	Super Bowl xlv commercial video ads from Volkswagen America.
79	hit em kenny love audi commercial superbowl	Hit en kenny love audi commercial superbowl.
79	feed epic sci fi car ad kia optimum super bowl commercial video trendhunter supe	Epic science feed car and kia optimal super bowl commercial video trendhunter supe.
79	worth daughter loved chrysler commercial watched time hulu save detroit	I mean, a real girl liked the Chrysler commercial and watched the time hulu save Detroit.
79	volkswagen star war commercial dominates super bowl twitter buzz	War star Volkswagen, the war ad, dominates the super bowl buzz twitter.
79	pug dorrito commercial best	Pug dorrito commercial best.
79	super bowl commercial	Super bowl commercial.
79	guru guide super bowl commercial favorite watch	Guru guide super bowl commercial watch favorite watch.
79	chrysler minute commercial worth penny	Advertising chrysler minute worth a penny.
79	super bowl prediction volkswagen commercial force beat audi goodnight commercial seo	Super bowl prediction volkswagen commercial force beat audi bon nuit commercial seo night.
79	pack vw superbowl darth vader commercial easily best well vw	Pack vw superbowl varth vader commercial as well vw good.
79	revenge pug doritos nailed super bowl commercial	Revenge pug doritos nailed super bowl commercial.
79	wait vw beetle great commercial superbowl commercial beetle bug	Wait VW large commercial superbowl commercial beetle beetle beetle beetle.
79	didn doritos commercial boring superbowl	The boring commercial superbowl doritos.
79	doritos didn superbowl commercial dead	Doritos has dead commercial superbowl.
79	commercial motorola xoom suck people apple tool sb superbowl	The commercial xoom suck people apple tool sb superbowl.
79	mercedes benz class coupe sl amg roadster revealed superbowl commercial tmr	Mercedes coupé class benz amg roadster revealed superbowl commercial tmr.
79	watch chevrolet commercial superbowl	Watch commercial Chevrolet Superbowl!
79	doritos commercial vote funniest superbowl commercial	It is important to note, however, that this does not mean that we do not have the resources to do so.
79	superbowl sucked pepsi max commercial prob best	Superbowl suck pepsi max commercial prob best.
79	favourite commercial superbowl volkswagen commercial force	Volkswagen Superbowl commercial favourite commercial strength.
79	view detriot chrysler superbowl commercial	See detriot chrysler superbowl commercial chrysler.
79	best ad super bowl darth vader passat commercial	The best ad for the Super Bowl for Vader Passat is the Vador Passat ad.
79	awesome bold superbowl commercial seriously going consider xoom tablet ipad	A bold advert for a superbowl that will seriously consider an Xoom ipad tablet.
79	motorola xoom super bowl commercial tip hat apple spot video	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak hat apple spot video.
79	eminem brisk super bowl commercial	Eminem bright super bowl commercial.
79	chevy cruze comm fb feed captain america hell carmax comm superbowl commercial	Chevy cruze comm fb feed U.S. captain Hell carmax comm superbowl commercial.
79	pepsi putting mobile play super bowl advertising marketing branding mobile pepsi superbowl pr	Pepsi put mobile play Super Bowl advertising marketing brand mobile pepsi superbowl pr.
79	budweiser wild west tiny dancer commercial definitely favorite superbowl	Budweiser Wild West mini commercial dancer definitely favorite superbowl.
79	vote favorite superbowl commercial poll don love	Vote in favour of a public opinion poll on the project.
79	car commercial boring volkswagon enjoyed superbowl spot	The superbowl spot was enjoyed by a boring commercial car.
79	darth vader volkswagen commercial best super bowl commercial youtube	Darth Vader Volkswagen commercial best Super Bowl commercial youtube youtube.
79	favorite superbowl motorola xoom tablet swipe apple tonight	Superbowl favorite motorola xoom tablet slide apple tonight.
79	chrysler air super bowl commercial	Commercial chrysler air super bowl.
79	thumb xoom super bowl commercial great dig earphone	Xoom Thumb Super Bowl commercial headphone great snoop.
79	missed chrysler riveting imported detroit superbowl ad eminem youtube	Chrysler missed superbowl imported from Detroit ad eminem youtube.
79	music featured motorola xoom super bowl commercial	The music featured motorola xoom super bowl commercial.
79	dragon cute drinking cola superbowl cocacola commercial	A cute dragon drinking cola superbowl, a commercial for Coca-Cola.
79	commercial going sunday super bowl favorite word beetle superbowl	Ads going Super Bowl Sunday favorite word beetle superbowl.
79	doritos commercial funniest	The funniest commercial Doritos.
79	sneak peak superbowl ad lover super bowl ad watch big game	Superbowl pic ad ad ad lover Super Bowl to watch big game.
79	volkswagen darth vader commercial good bet super bowl wager	Volkswagen darth vader commercial good bet Super Bowl bet.
79	inproductive minute brilliant volkswagen commercial aired superbowl trekkie	Unproductive minute brilliant Volkswagen advertisement broadcast superbowl trekkie trekkie.
79	check video chrysler eminem imported detroit super bowl commercial ad	Watch the Chrysler Eminem commercial video imported from Detroit Super Bowl.
79	completely freaky sense sony xperia play commercial kind awesome creepy thumb superbowl	The creepy Xperia sound plays the commercial genre, the creepy, scary superbowl sound.
79	great advertising vw passat darth vader commercial	Big vw passat darth vader commercial advert.
79	ffing football watching commercial st half doritos bridgestone faves superbowl	Playing football while watching the St. Doritos Bridgestone ads is a superbowl.
79	best commercial superbowl doritos guy saved best haha	Superbowl's best player Doritos saved the best haha ever.
79	worst best super bowl commercial video	Super Bowl's worst commercial video ever.
79	super bowl commercial report card ranking winner loser bleacher report	Super Bowl, commercial newsletter, winner ranking, loser report, binders, filing cabinets.
79	force strong great ad volkswagon superbowl commercial	To force great publicity for the Volkswagen brand superbowl.
79	youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Live video YouTube eminem commercial Super Bowl eminem.
79	audi green car superbowl commercial top ten super bowl commercial time	Superbowl audi green car Top 10 Super Bowl commercial Super Bowl commercial time.
79	love coke commercial dragon superbowl	J' loves the coke superbowl.
79	audi dream superbowl commercial	This is the new Audi Dream Superbowl.
79	volkswagen commercial force best commercial darthvader passat	Volkswagen commercial force best commercial darthvader passat.
79	decide win hyper masculine super bowl audience doritos super bowl ad	Deciding to win super men's Super Bowl doritos Super Bowl announces Super Bowl.
79	angry bird commercial superbowl afk kill	A commercial superbowl d'apos; angry bird kills.
79	youtube chili pepsi max super bowl commercial pepsi max super bowl commercial jamaal al din nfl	Youtube chili pepsi max commercial super bowl pepsi max commercial jamaal al din nfl.
79	face chrysler commercial freaked best superbowl lt	Chrysler commercial freaked out best superbowl lt.
79	commercial video eminem lipton brisk super bowl commercial	Super Bowl commercial video eminem lipton break.
79	love hate crime pepsi max commercial lol nice superbowl	J' loves hate crimes Pepsi max commercial lol super-cool super-bowl.
79	prudential whale chevy superbowl commercial	Prudent whale chevy superbowl commercial superbowl.
79	audi luxury prison break super bowl commercial	Audi Luxurious prison break super bowl commercial.
79	great commercial superbowl audi pretty good jab mercedes	Great commercial audio superbowl pretty good jab mercedes.
79	youtube video gm chevy super bowl commercial bumblebee	Youtube video gm chevy super bowl bumblebee commercial bumblebee.
79	audi super bowl commercial online video audi	Audi Super Bowl commercial video audi online.
79	favorite superbowl ad pepsi max	Superbowl favorite ad pepsi max.
79	budwieser commercial tiny dancer hate superbowl	Well, tiny commercial dancer Budwieser hates superbowl.
79	justin bieber roseanne barr super bowl ad wacky bunch superbowl commercial	It's called the Super Bowl and Wacky Bunch Super Bowl Commercial.
79	vw superbowl commercial imho winner sweet adorable	Vw superbowl advertising winner imho sweet adorable.
79	favorited youtube video gm chevy super bowl commercial bumblebee	Youtube favorite video gm chevy super bowl bumblebee commercial bumblebee.
79	advertising social medium technique combine super bowl tv commercial	Advertising of social medium technique combine super bowl tv commercial.
79	status chevy cruze super bowl ad love superbowl commercial check imabzzagenr	Chevy Cruze Super Bowl status ad love super bowl commercial check imabzzagenr.
79	super cute adzone volkswagen force superbowl ad vader kid think control car	Super cute adzone volkswagen force superbowl ad vader kid think control car.
79	chrysler super bowl commercial brilliant case haven	Chrysler Super Bowl commercial shiny case Haven.
79	chrysler commercial eminem best bad car terrible superbowl	Chrysler commercial eminem best bad car terrible superbowl terrible.
79	homerun ohio chrysler superbowl commercial struck chord detroiters	Homerun ohio chrysler superbowl advertising struck chord of detractors.
79	kia optimum epic ride big game commercial	Kia epic optimal ride ride big game commercial game.
79	superbowl force volkswagen commercial stellar mrx	Superbowl Volkswagen commercial stellar mrx force.
79	daddy prefers vw commercial messing mini darth superbowl dadstalking	Dad prefers that I' we're marketing a mini-superbowl stalking dads.
79	kia spent lot money optimum superbowl commercial	Kia spent a lot of money commercial superbowl.
79	doritos commercial raising dead best night superbowl nfl	Doritos ads raise dead best night superbowl NFL.
79	pepsi max people laughing commercial kind laugh american idol audition superbowl	Pepsi max people laughing at the advertising laugh American idol audition superbowl audition.
79	youtube video eminem lipton brisk super bowl commercial	Youtube video eminem lipton vivid, commercial Super Bowl.
79	budweiser spamming crappy commercial superbowl beer suck drink micros quit die	Budweiser spamming commercial superbowl crappy beer is sucking beverage microphones.
79	kia optimum commercial dumbest	Stupidest commercial optimum Kia.
79	check video bridgestone unexpected obstacle super bowl xlii commercial	Watch the Bridgestone video unexpected super bowl Xlii commercial xlii obstacle.
79	commercial winning audi time luxury prison pepsi max dieting wife husband superbowl	The winning ad audi times luxury prison Pepsi max diet husband superbowl woman.
79	top three super bowl commercial	The top three Super Bowl ad.
79	mercedes benz super bowl commercial	Mercedes Benz super bowl commercial.
79	eminem eminem lipton commercial super bowl bsckids	Eminem eminem lipton advert Super Bowl bsckids.
79	youtube video bud light hack job superbowl commercial	Youtube video bud job superbowl advertisement superbowl hacking.
79	superbowl audi commercial	Commercial superbowl audi.
79	volkswagen present best super bowl commercial going second version brill	Volkswagen presents the best Super Bowl advertising go second version Brill.
79	sony ericsson xperia play official super bowl commercial full launch coming february	Sony Ericsson xperia officially play Super Bowl commercial full launch from February.
79	watching superbowl darth vader commercial awesome love dude	Watching Superbowl Darth Vader commercial awesome love dude.
79	best worst super bowl commercial	The worst Super Bowl commercial ever.
79	pepsi max ad pepsi refresh message superbowl commercial	Pepsi max ad pepsi refresh message Superbowl commercial.
79	superbowl volkswagen commercial force	Volkswagen supererbowl commercial force.
79	superbowl commercial volkswagen force smaller darth vader	Superbowl commercial volkswagen force smaller darth vader.
79	superbowl pepsi commercial angry girlfriend pretty funny	Superbowl Pepsi commercial angry girlfriend pretty funny.
79	cc omg love commercial detroit superbowl brandbowl	Cc omg loves the commercial superbowl in Detroit.
79	lt vote budlight commercial thumb superbowl	Vote in favour of a commercial superbowl and commercial superbowl.
79	fave st half commercial doritos grandpa superbowl	Well, half the commercial doritos big-father superbowl.
79	super bowl commercial	Super bowl commercial.
79	doritos commercial clear doritos work superbowl	Commercial doritos clear doritos work superbowl.
79	lololol doritos pepsi max killing superbowl commercial	Lolol doritos pepsi max killing commercial superbowl.
79	newcar audia watch audi superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Newcar Audia watch the commercial Audi Superbowl youtube Blitz Channel.
79	physically congratulate pepsi woman physically harmed making commercial brandbowl superbowl	To physically congratulate the physically injured pepsi woman by doing commercial super bowl.
79	best superbowl commercial good game night good ad top superbow	The best superbowl commercial good night's game of the good game of the game; ad top de l' rainbow.
79	terrific mercedes benz commercial superbowl extended version promising future	The Mercedes benz commercial superbowl has been expanded, promising the future.
79	favorited youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Favorite live video eminem commercial Super Bowl YouTube.
79	vw black beetle commercial favorite super bowl ad night	Super Bowl night commercial favorite VW Black Beetle.
79	volkswagen commercial black beetle spot st century beetle cutting edg	Volkswagen is a commercial plant for the mountain pine beetle.
79	kia optimum epic ride super bowl commercial nfl fanhouse	Epic optimal Super Bowl fanhouse commercial nfl ride.
79	budlight commercial superbowl fingerscrossed	Fingers crossed; commercial sky-arc.
79	crash super bowl doritos pepsi max pepsico plan user generated commercial	Super bowl crash doritos pepsi max pepsico plan generated by l' commercial user.
79	stella artois superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Stella artois superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel.
79	eminem super bowl commercial damn chrysler commercial imported detroit	Eminem Super Bowl commercial chrysler imported from Detroit.
79	super bowl commercial coca cola commercial coke	Wow, super bowl commercial coke commercial coke commercial.
79	haha arod fed doritos commercial superbowl	Haha arod fed Doritos superbowl commercial.
79	doritos commercial guy lick cheese guy finger favorite superbowl commercial	Doritos commercial guy lick cheese guy favorite commercial Superbowl.
79	best commercial super bowl imported detroit best	The best commercial super bowl imported to Detroit is the best.
79	will write superbowl commercial someday vw take cake	J' will write an ad for the superbowl someday.
79	youtube present shawn moore soul reaching spreading love peace faith hope	Youtube present at the festival of l' love.
79	doritos funnyass commercial superbowl pug ftw	Como comicas commercial superbowl pug ftw commercial.
79	superbowl commercial big deal	Superbowl commercial big deal.
79	superbowl commercial going bud light doritos pepsi	Superbowl advertising go bud doritos pepsi light.
79	doritos super bowl commercial offensive video dorito	Doritos Super Bowl commercial offensive video dorito video.
79	kia commercial advertising superbowl commercial snake consuming	Kia commercial advertisement superbowl commercial snake consumption.
79	poseidon kia commercial awesome superbowl	Poseidon kia commercial awesome superbowl super cool.
79	doritos commercial redemption superbowl	Doritos superbowl commercial redemption of doritos.
79	watch audi superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look Audi Superbowl, the advertising channel youtube ad blitz.
79	hilarious super bowl commercial	Super Bowl hilarious commercial.
79	youtube video chevrolet camaro superbowl commercial al chevrolet hd	Youtube video chevrolet camaro superbowl commercial al chevrolet hd.
79	imported detroit excellent car commercial paying attention eminen damn superbowl commercial	Imported strait excellent commercial car paying attention eminen superbowl commercial whore.
79	greatest super bowl commercial bridgestone reply youtubeadblitz superbowl sb	The biggest Bridgestone super bowl answers youtubeadblitz superbowl sb.
79	watched pugattack hilarious superbowl commercial check vote attack	J' watched pugattack hilarious superbowl commercial check attack your attack.
79	okaaaay bowled super bowl well official bud light advert	Okaaaay at Super Bowl well official Bud announcer luminous announcer.
79	superbowl pepsi commercial best	Superbowl pepsi best commercial ever.
79	thi doritos superbowl commerical hot mess	These commercial doritos superbowl hot mess.
79	doritos best superbowl commercial lmao	Doritos is the best superbowl commercial lmao.
79	case haven brilliant motorola xoom ad super bowl	The case was Xoom engine brilliant ad Super Bowl.
79	chevy volt super bowl commercial discovery sb sbxlv	Chevy Volt Super Bowl commercial discovery sb sbxlv sbxlv.
79	doritos commercial super bowl banned sexy ban	The Doritos Super Bowl, a commercial super bowl, banned it.
79	volkswagen black beetle commercial teaser vw set air ad super bowl xlv	Volkswagen Black Beetle commercial teaser vw set air to super bowl xlv.
79	superbowl commercial winner vw vader xoom heard price bridgestone beaver	Superbowl commercial winner vw vader xoom heard price bridgestone beaver.
79	youtube mercedes benz super bowl commercial	Commercial Mercedes Benz super bowl YouTube.
79	superbowl commercial elantra psychedelic groupon wrong cocacola cool elantra win	Superbowl commercial psychedelic groupon cocacola cool elantra psychedelic elite win.
79	doritos son funny as superbowl commercial wack	Doritos son funny as superbowl wack ad.
79	lmao check funny commercial doritos pepsi max	Imao check funny commercial doritos pepsi max.
79	hella funnny drt superbowl funniest doritos commercial	Dr drnny drt drt superbowl funniest Doritos doritos advertisement.
79	super bowl xlv commercial lm	Super bowl xlv commercial lm lm.
79	watch coca cola superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look at the coca coca superbowl, the youtube ad blitz commercial chain.
79	doritos commercial dog best	Doritos, best commercial dog in the business.
79	youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Live video YouTube eminem commercial Super Bowl eminem.
79	best superbowl commercial year chrysler comeback	Best return from superbowl commercial year.
79	link superbowl ad motorola xoom tablet parody apple ad release feb	L'link superbowl ad motorola xoom tablet parody apple feb.
79	definitely forward superbowl commercial year esp steve martin cameo	Undoubtedly the commercial year of the superbowl at l'apos, with Steve Martin's cameo.
79	eminem helped plug commercial yesterday superbowl second superbowlxlv	Eminem helped put the ad yesterday superbowl second superbowlxlv.
79	hashtags tv ad superbowl audi launch commercial twitter hashtag	Hashtags TV Superbowl Audi commercial launch of Twitter hashtags.
79	loved ad chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported detroit	Ad ad chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported from Detroit.
79	nice check video chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported detroit	Great video control chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported from Detroit.
79	video volkswagen invades super bowl darth vader starwars superbowl	Video volkswagen invades super bowl darth vader starwars superbowl.
79	hahaha doritoes commercial best superbowl	Hahaha Dornitos is the best superbowl of all time.
79	volkswagen star war themed commercial superbowl	Volkswagen Star War commercial superbowl theme.
79	chrysler telling story well check chrysler commercial imported detroit	Chrysler tells well l' story of commercial Chrysler imported from Detroit.
79	doritos wit homo commercial time wit dat la superbowl	I mean, like, as gay as the super bowl.
79	doritos super bowl commercial funny second going overboard	"What; Doritos Super Bowl; ..."" Second time, I'm going through-over the edge."
79	superbowl commercial top number gt force volkswagen	Superbowl commercial top number gt force volkswagen.
79	super bowl commercial volkswagen favored win seo	Commercial Super Bowl volkswagen favored seo winner seo.
79	pepsi promotes domestic violence crime superbowl ad	Pepsi promotes the crime of domestic violence at the Super Bowl.
80	republican party debt gear	L' Republican party debt equipment.
80	rnc chair political vip super bowl republican national committee chairman reince priebus posted	Rnc political vip super bowl republican president of the national reince re priebus published.
80	rnc appoints chairman tampa convention effort visit tampa republican nati tampa fl	To nominate the President of the Convention of Tampa Visit of Tampa Republican Nati Tampa fl.
80	rnc money ronald reagan birthday	R.N.C. money Ronald Reagan Anniversary.
80	update michael steele resigns rnc	Update Michael Steele resigns RNC.
80	read open letter michael steele chairman republican national committee rnc tcot	Read open letter Michael Steele Chairman of the National Republican Committee.
80	rnc best shot knocking debt time race leading pack	C' is the best shot for the debt time trial.
81	black swan tonight amazing natalie portman talented actress bestmovieever blackswan lt	Black Swan tonight Natalie Portman talented actress best movie ever Blackswan.
81	watched black swan mindblowing watch natalie portman deserves oscar mila kunis love lt	Natalie Portman deserves to be named Oscar Mila Kunis, in love with him.
81	wowsa black swan movie intense stirring hope natalie portman win oscar role	Wowsa black swan intense movie hope Natalie Portman win Oscar-winning role.
81	black swan artistically perfect portman acting brilliant plot shallow doesn affect overwhelming experience	The black swan artistically perfect portman acting shiny shallow n&apos does not affect the overwhelming experience.
81	blackswan night amazing natalie portman will win oscar performance	Blackswan night amazing Natalie Portman will win an Oscar performance.
81	finished watching black swan twisted mental strain take embrace role natalie portman incredible	No more watching the twisted mental tension black swan take on the role of incredible Natalie Portman.
81	black swan amazing natalie portman deserves award doubt will	Natalie Portman, l' amazing black swan, deserves a prize.
81	black swan night london masterpiece portman oscar	The night of the black swan, Chief-d' London work Portman Oscar.
81	outstanding performance female actress natalie portman black swan sagawards	L&apos performance exceptional; actress Natalie Portman Black Swan Sagawards.
81	congratulation natalie portman golden globe sag black swan seriously phenomenal sagawards	Well, congratulations Natalie Portman Golden Globe Black sag Swan seriously phenomenal sagawards.
81	black swan drama purest form portman doesn win academy corrupt aronofsky created masterpiece blackswan	Portman's purest black swan drama wins apos; corrupt aronofsky academy created head-d' blackswan work.
81	obsessed natalie portman black swan amazed beautiful dancer	L' obsessed Natalie Portman Black Swan astonished the beautiful dancer.
81	natalie portman better win oscar best actress black swan movie amazing time	Natalie Portman better win the Oscar award for the best black swan movie amazing time.
81	black swan trippy natalie portman good performance	Natalie Portman, black swan tripping, good performance.
81	black swan good movie melodramatic natalie portman phenominal shoe best actress	The black swan good melodramatic Natalie Portman phenomenal best actress shoe.
81	spellbound black swan night budget gross growing natalie amazing hope sweep nomination	The bewitching black swan night budget is growing, and Natalie is an amazing candidate for the sweep of the apos; hope.
82	orange student dish school lunch white house chef orlando sentinel fl schoollunch letsmove	The orange cook of the cooking school, the white house chef orlando sentinelle schoollunch lets go.
82	charlottesville city school offering student vegetarian option lunch	L' Charlottesville municipal school offers students a vegetarian lunch.
82	kamut international welcome improvement school nutrition bill	The international bill on improving school nutrition is welcome.
82	healthy school food pay save attention going	The healthy food at school attracts less attention.
83	senator avoiding tea party caucus	The senator's avoiding the tea caucus now.
83	news sen paul tea party hold power hill predicted tea party movement	The news of Paulin's tea party has spread all over the world.
83	dc medium opt tea party tea party caucus remains vigilant teaparty tcot tlot gop dem	Tea caucus at l' average hour remains vigilant and teaparty tcot tlot gop dem tep.
83	antonin scalia charm tea party caucus simmi aujla politico	Antonin Scalia charm tea party caucus simmi aujla politico.
83	senate teabaggers desperate caucusing member teatards tea thursday	They're senate tea drinkers desperately caucusing their members' tea on Thursday.
84	exsteme makeover grabbing heart don text drive	Extreme relooking grabbing heart don't text drive.
84	texting driving pledge ive close wresting median interstate	Sending from apos; a text to a driving candidate five times closer to the median highway.
84	mann texting driving	Mann's texting to drive.
84	signed pledge will text drive awsome orange thumb ring	L' signed commitment will text orange ring with thumb.
84	don dangerous drink drive text drive	Don dangerous drink reader text reader.
84	follow johnny mac jeanne pledge text drive	Follow Johnny Mac Jeanne on the pledge text disc.
84	alex brown	Uh, Alex Brown.
84	mama texting drive damn raining	It's raining cats and dogs.
84	dont text drive	I don't have a text reader.
84	join campaign texting driving save life future will help	Please, join the campaign by sending a message to save your life.
84	sign text drive	To sign text reader.
84	luster texting driving	Well, it's a light text about the driving.
84	good app called auto text reply will auto text office car angel pledge don text drive	A good application called auto text response will auto text office because angel don don text drive.
84	teacher talking texting driving haaayy	The teacher is talking about a text message that drives haaayyy.
84	lt will text drive	There will be a text reader.
84	awful watched don text drive video driving class	The text-mode driving class of Don was horribly watched.
84	well cant drive thing will text drive	Well, don't drive the text reader thing.
84	worst person tonight stop will longer text drive	The worst person who'll stop tonight will have a longer text reader.
84	commit texting tweeting driving	S' please, send us a message.
84	day ago driving started text thought	There's started text thought one day.
84	podominick texting drive died	The podominick texting engine is dead!
84	texan driver promise text drive lt	The Texas driver will promise a text reader.
84	don text drive hey easily turn goodbye	Don text reader hey easily turn good-bye.
84	don text drive	Don't text drive.
84	dont text drive safe life safe yourselfs	N' send no text about security of life you-even.
84	seth godin texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argue wit	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
84	text driving drunk	Uh, drunk driving text.
84	justin bieber address danger texting driving extreme makeover music celebrity justin bieber	Justin Bieber s' address to danger by sending a text leading to Justin Bieber's extreme musical metamorphosis.
84	dangerous text drive besafe	This is a dangerous text reader.
84	dont text drive	I don't have a text reader.
84	seth godin news texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argu	We need phone calls, text messages, cell phones, phone calls, cell phones.
84	greg biffle justin bieber address danger texting driving extreme makeover mtv	Greg Biffle Justin Bieber danger address of driving extreme texto mtv transformation.
84	watching extreme makeover edition sad story texting driving text drive	Look at the' edition of extreme re-branding sad story texto leading text reader.
84	gonna driving time will text drive	The driving time will be the transmission time of the text.
84	don text drive remember	Don't remember the text reader!
84	video terror texting toronto gta news toronto sun	Terrorist video texto toronto gta news toronto sun.
84	dont text drive worldwide	Don't drive text around the world.
84	drive text	Launch drive text.
84	life waste text life shouldn text drive	Waste of text Life should drive the text.
84	twitition dont text drive remember alex brown	Twitition, which the text reader will remember from Alex Brown.
84	justin bieber extreme makeover fan kid teen warning text drive inspired touched	Justin Bieber extreme makeover fan Kid Adolescent Warning Text Drive inspired inspired hit.
84	watching extreme makeover edition story sad don text drive	Look at the apos; apogee history; extreme makeover edition sad Don text reader.
84	watched extreme makeover edition awsome lt	J' I just watched the makeover.
84	don text drive remember alex brown	The text reader doesn't remember Alex Brown.
84	save text save life don text driving text life imagine dream inspire	Recording text save life does text conduct text life imagine inspiring dream.
84	don text drive example cell phone driving backseat	Don text reader sample cell phone driving backseat.
84	pledge text drive	Donation pledge text reader.
84	hey dont text drive sake ur life sake love yall	Hey, hey, hey, don't go.
84	sign pledge text drive	Report the pledge text reader.
84	don text drive	Don't text drive.
84	don text drive pledge	Don't text drive promised.
84	texting driving good idea	T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T
84	mobile launch service osl	Mobile launch service osl osl.
84	remember alex brown	This is the first time you've had a chance to do this.
84	shouldn texted driving snowy foo	You know, we should text Snowy Foo while we're driving.
84	don text drive makeachange	Don't text drive makeachange at all.
84	sign pledge abc makeachange	To sign an abc makeachange oath.
84	textin driving remember alex brown teamfresh	The textin driver remembers Alex Brown, fresh off the team.
84	drive text include tweeting	Reader text includes tweets.
84	think extreme makeover edition great message tonight don text drive	Think extreme makeover edition grand message tonight Don text reader.
84	remember alex brown don text drive lt ambrat gt	Remember Alex Brown Don Text Drive lt ambrat gt.
84	bringing tear message heart don text drive	Bring the message of heart tears Don text reader Don text.
84	omg oprah plege wouldn text drive didn seriously lol xd bbl	Omg oprah plege would text reader n' seriously lol xd bbl xd seriously.
84	watching extreme makeover don text drive	Watch the extreme makeover Don text drive.
84	reading learn well knew dont text drive time donttextdrive	Read to learn well known whose time-reading text does not text text reader.
84	app called auto text reply will auto text office car angel pledge don text drive	Application called auto text reply will auto text office because angel don text drive.
84	florida car accident attorney texting ban state road safer	Florida car accident attorney, texting from and out; banned.
84	justin influence text drive	Justin will influence the text reader.
84	going text driving	I'm driving in text mode.
84	texting driving don mom	J' texts Don Mom's driving habits.
84	seth blog texting working texting working shouldn text driving talk	Work blog seth texto work texto work should text lead talk talk talk.
84	tune abc check extreme makeover	Check the apos' extreme finish; abc.
84	nightt twitterlandd remember text wait shawty lt	Nuitt twitterlandd remember text wait shawty ltt.
84	remember alex brown	This is the first time you've had a chance to do this.
84	don text drive	Don't text drive.
84	teen told wont text drive donor yeah sad reading photo caption choked	Teenagers said that there were no text donors, yeah sad reading photo caption smothered.
84	seriously guy dont text drive addicted texting phone cant driving	Seriously, the guy who's texting is not a phone addict, he can't drive.
84	watched extreme makeover tonight awesome apart	There's been an extreme makeover tonight.
84	smile katrina face extreme makeover aww seriously dont text drive	Katrina smile face to l' extreme makeover aww seriously including the text reader.
84	texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argue dog	S' texting while working should lead to talk mobile phone argue dog.
84	extreme makeover	An extreme makeover!
84	remembering alex brown	And I remember Alex Brown.
84	amazing gah sad cry eye text drive watching will	L' amazing Gah sad eye text drive watching Will.
84	pledge text driving	The pledge text drives it.
85	investor advisory firm call apple disclose ceo succession plan concern health apple chief	Apple's investment consulting firm released the CEO's succession plan for the health of the chief apple tree.
85	apple steve job newsweek	Apple Steve job newsweek.
85	internet news steve job medical problem affect apple stock latest internet news steve job	The medical problem of apples; use of apples; timeliness of apples; Internet affects the apple stock of the latest news; Internet.
85	ijsmblog week apple future steve job	Ijsmblog week apple future job Steve Steve.
85	potential replacement steve job tech idea steve job absent app	It's a good idea to have a team, a team, a team, a team, a team, a team.
85	potential replacement steve job electronics worked ibm year including senior role	L' replacement electronics worked for one year including a senior management role.
85	apple disclose succession plan ceo steve job influential proxy advisory firm i report	Apple discloses the succession plan of the company; employment of the company; consulting by proxy.
85	appropriate apple shareholder demanding steve job succession plan macabre tone	An Apple shareholder demanding a gruesome succession plan for Steve.
85	blog post potential replacement steve job apple	Blog posts potential replacement Steve job Apple.
85	potential replacement steve job	Steve's potential replacement position.
85	steve job health private matter joe wilcox betanewssadly reaffirm position stated du	Occupational health, a private matter Joe Wilcox Betanewssadly reaffirms the position of this paper.
85	netgear bos astonishing attack steve job	Netgear surprising bosante attack of Steve's work.
85	tim cook step steve job apple san francisco chronicle	Tim Cook Step Steve job Apple San Francisco chronic.
85	global cio apple face mounting pressure steve job succession plan	Global apple cio facing mounting pressure succession plan d' employment.
85	wired legendary steve job leave absence medical reason second time	C' is legendary Steve's second time s' absent for medical reasons.
85	recap steve job will good time apple	Let's go over Steve's work in good time apple.
86	bullet rescuer hit captain arai mahomed somali pirate captured south	Bullet rescue hit Captain Arai at home, Somali pirate captured in the south.
86	south korea target pirate incorporation anti piracy operation gulf aden op	South Korea aims to integrate the use of pirates into anti-piracy operations.
86	second tweet somali piracy sea economist	It's the first time I've heard of it, and it's the first time I've heard it.
86	iranian oil tanker escape pirate attack	There's a pirate attack on an Iranian tanker.
86	indian navy sink mother ship somali pirate arabian sea held fifteen pirate custody	Indian navy sinks Somali mother ship Arab pirate Sea D' Arabian held 15 guard pirate.
86	pirate battle free norwegian ship	Pirates are free to fight Norwegian ships.
86	indian navy coast guard rescue thai vessel pirate joint operation indian navy coast guard intercepted neutr	Guards-off the coast of the Indian Navy save a Thai pirate ship.
86	indian navy seizes pirate indian ocean mothership don care tnfisherman	Indian navy seizes Indian mother ship from island; ocean doesn't worry tnfisherman.
86	test case malaysia selva somali pirate captured international water malay	Case type Malaysia saltva somali pirate captured international malay water.
86	navy hunt pirate ship	Navy's chasing the pirate ship now.
86	navy destroys pirate mother ship arrest pirate indian navy coast guard joint operatio	The navy destroys the ship-pirate mother, the ship-mother, the ship-mother, the Indian navy, l' joint guard operation-coast.
86	indian navy arrest pirate drama high sea major anti piracy operation	And the Indian navy stops the pirate drama on the high seas.
86	best news somali pirate hijack german ship somali pirate hijacked german owned ship mv amirojkes	Better news than the pirate of l' air pirate pirate pirate pirate German pirate ship pirate pirate my friendrojkes ship owner.
86	somali pirate killed south korea rescue freighter crew south korean commando secure boat	The Somali pirate killed the crew of a rescue ship from the South.
86	well korean navy rescue hijacked crew kill pirate	Well, rescue of Korean Navy hijacked crew kill pirate kill.
86	somali pirate flown seoul somali men suspected hijacking south korean cargo ship arabian	Pirates of the Apos; airs&apos are taken from suspected men of Apos; hijacked a South cargo ship @-Korean.
86	trial pirate suspected hijacking south korean freighter samho jewelry arabian sea	The case involved a suspected hijacking of the South freighter-Korean Samho Arabian Sea jewellery.
86	indian navy capture pirate lakshwadeep island indian navy captured	The Indian navy captured the pirate, Lakshwadeep, on the island of India.
86	somali pirate expand motherships extend range game changer navy	Somali pirates expand mother ships, changing the navy game ranges.
86	somali pirate face life sentence lee hyo sik somali pirate captured south korean special	Lee hyo sik somali hijacker captured special South @-@Korean is facing the penalty of life imprisonment.
86	malaysia hold somali pirate saving ship	Well, Malaysia's holding something like a lifeboat.
86	south korea negotiating delivery somali breaking news south korea negotiating delivery	South Korea negotiating the delivery somali breaking news South Korea negotiating delivery.
86	singapore news somali pirate face prosecution malaysia kuala lumpur somali pirate captured	Singapore news somali pirate face the pursuit malaysia kuala lumpur somali pirate captured.
87	identity theft cost infographic long ago identity theft online	Uses; usurpation of images; identity costs money to users; infographic long ago; usurpation of images; online identity.
87	protecting financial info identity theft mail	Protection of financial information, theft of identity, mail theft.
87	identity theft cost infographic	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
87	identity theft social medium smith credit report refinance discovered	Detection of theft; identity theft; social communication; re-financing; uncovered black credit report.
87	attorney general office identity theft prevention tip west virginia attorney general darrell mcgraw	Attorney General of the office of theft prevention d' identity informs Virginia Attorney General @-@Western, Darrell Mcgraw.
87	identity theft cost infographic	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	colorado nation scammed state denver coloradan receive scam invitation	Nation colorado scam d'Etat coloradan receive scam invitation.
87	type identity theft dark dragon grownup identity theft	Identity theft; Identity theft; identity black dragon adult theft; identity adult theft; identity theft; identity theft.
87	identity theft cost create problem business deal reaching fake provider showz	The cost of identity theft creates problems for business to reach the fake Showz supplier.
87	thumbnail drive wi fi device convenient risky safe tip fb	L' thumbnail miniature player wi fi convenient security tip fb.
87	colorado nation scammed state identity theft protection expert warn informatio	Colorado nation defrauded of apo; state theft protection expert; identity warning information.
87	identity theft cost infographic	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	fact identity theft	Fact: identity theft.
87	reminder beware identity theft harm credit tip protect identity	Remind yourself that identity theft can affect credit.
87	identity theft steal social security number theft	Identity theft; identity theft social security number theft social security number theft.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
87	identity theft social security number	Identity theft social security number.
87	identity theft cost infographic	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	freemont tribune safety tip atm tip safety	Freemont security platform security tip security tip atm security tip.
87	identity theft cost comment	Comment on the cost of identity theft.
87	protect phishing scam	Protect them; phishing fraud.
87	apps equal chance identity theft	Calls equal chance of theft; identity card.
87	protect internet	The Canadian Journal of Public Health, Vol.
87	identity theft resource center protecting personal identifying idtheft identitytheft	Identity theft resource centre; identity theft protection; identity theft.
87	data privacy day roundup add ons tool tip protect online	The collection of the data protection day adds new tools for online protection.
87	protect laptop theft	Protect-you against laptop theft.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
87	identity theft cost infographic	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	apps equal chance identity theft leslie meredith start year company	Apps equals chance of flight; identity Leslie Meredith begins the company year.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
88	oscar nomination draw attention pa gas drilling gasland fracking	Oscar draws attention to gas drilling fracking gasland fracking.
88	today read concerned gasland movie stand set record straight	Today, Gasland's film stand set a new record.
88	oscar nominated gasland director josh fox gas drilling barnett shale dallas observer blog	Oscar appointed gazland director Josh Fox gas drilling Barnett shale Dallas blog observer.
88	gasland scare oscar nom best doc news junkie post read njp film review eco greedmachine	Gasland fear oscar name best doc news junkie post njp film criticism eco avidity machine.
88	industry boo oscar nod gasland	L' industry boo oscar nod gasland industry.
88	vote best documentary oscar poll express pls	Vote the best oscar documentary poll express pls pls.
88	gasland nominated academy award coga defends	The coga de l' academy appointed by Gasland defends the interests of the coga.
88	gasland oscar nod draw industry ire gasland documentary detail environmental impact process called fra	The production process; environmental impact; natural gas industry called fra is a documentary on the natural gas industry.
88	gas industry doesn gasland oscar nod figure fracking marcellus	L' gas industry makes a nod Oscar-winning marcellus fracturing gas.
89	pressure grows myanmar sanction call growing western sanction myanmar	The pressure increases the Myanmar sanction calls for Western Myanmar sanction.
89	pressure grows myanmar sanction afp	The pressure increases Myanmar's punishment.
89	gbagbo camp futile cut ivory coast economy reuters ivory coast laurent gbagbo will find way	Gbagbo camp futile ivory cup of l' coastal economy reuters ivory coast lago gbagbo will find the way.
89	wikileaks pushed uk sanction iranian bank cable view britain settin jpost	Wikileaks supported the Uk iranian cable view britain settin jpost settin.
89	suu kyi party urge west maintain myanmar sanction reuters	The suu kyi party urges the west to maintain the punishment myanmar reuters.
89	gbagbo camp futile cut ivory coast economy	Gbagbo camp futile cut ivory coastal Ivory economy.
89	toughens sanction belarus join eu widening sanction belarus leader follow	Sanctions harden the belarus join the sanctions of the belarus leader.
89	sanction dull tehran commercial image casual observer sanction irania	Allow Tehran commercial image boring occasional observer irania sanction.
89	belarus promise adequate response eu sanction belarus voiced readiness proportionate	Belarus promise adequate response to sanctions Belarus expressed state of readiness proportionate.
89	expert differ sanction debate	Sanctions debate differs from expert to expert.
89	toughens sanction belarus join eu widening sanction belarus leader	The sanctions harden the belarus join the apos; widening the sanctions of the belarus leader.
89	chamber commerce writes iran express opposition sanction capital loyalty homeland	The chamber business writes that Iran's opposition sanctions the loyalty of capital.
89	suu kyi party urge west maintain myanmar sanction reuters reuters party myanmar pro	His kyi party urges the west to maintain the punishment myanmar reuters party myanmar pro reuters.
